



CHICKEN CHICKEN 


Goosebumps - 53 
R.L. Stine 


1 


I hate chickens. 

They are filthy creatures, and they smell like... like... chickens. 

“Crystal, it’s your turn to feed the chickens,” Mom says. My least favorite 
words. 

I carry the seed bucket out to the backyard, and they come scurrying over, 
clucking and squawking and flapping their greasy wings. I hate the way they 
brush up against my legs as they peck the seeds off the ground. Their feathers 
are so rough and scratchy. 

My brother, Cole, and I are always trying to convince my parents to get rid 
of the chickens. “Just because we live on a farm doesn’t mean we have to have 
chickens,” I always say. 

“Right! We’re not farmers!” Cole agrees. “So why do we have to have 
those smelly chickens?” 

“It’s always been our dream,” Mom always replies. Blah blah blah. 

Cole and I have heard the dream story a thousand times. 

We’ve heard how Mom and Dad grew up in the Bronx in New York City. 
How they hated the noise and the dirt and the concrete. How they dreamed of 
leaving the city for good and living on a farm near a small country town. 

So, when Cole was two and I was four, we moved to Goshen Falls. Lucky 
us! The whole town is three blocks long. We have a cute little farm with a cute 
little farmhouse. And even though Mom and Dad are computer programmers— 
not farmers—we have a backyard full of chickens. 

Cluck. Cluck. That’s their dream. 

My dream is that Cole gets punished for mouthing off the way he always 
does. And his punishment is that he has to feed the chickens for the rest of his 
life. 

Everyone has to have a dream—right? 

“OWW!” A chicken pecked my ankle. That hurt! Their beaks are so sharp. 

I tossed a final handful of seed on the ground and hopped backward, away 
from the gross, clucking creatures. Their little black eyes glinted in the sunlight 
as they strutted over the grass. Pecking each other. Bumping each other out of 
the way as they dipped their scrawny heads for the food. 



I dropped the bucket in the back of the little barn we also use as a garage. 
Then I washed my hands under the cold water spigot at the side of the barn. 

I heard a low roar. A shadow rolled over the barn. I gazed up to see a small 
plane dipping under the puffy afternoon clouds. 

I took a deep breath. The tangy aroma of potatoes floated in the air. 

That’s what the farmers grow around here. Mostly potatoes and corn. 

I dried my hands on the legs of my jeans and hurried off in search of my 
brother. It was a sunny Saturday afternoon. Most of my friends from school were 
away on a 4-H club trip. 

Mom asked me to keep an eye on Cole. He’s ten, two years younger than 
me. But sometimes he acts like a four-year-old. It seems like he’s always finding 
new ways to get into trouble. 

I wandered through town. No sign of him. I asked Mrs. Wagner at the 
bakery if she’d seen him. Cole likes to stop in there and beg her for free 
doughnuts. 

Mrs. Wagner said she saw Cole and his friend Anthony heading out of town 
in the direction of Pullman’s Pond. 

Uh-oh, I thought. What are they planning to do at the pond? I started to the 

door. 

“I just love your hair, Crystal,” Mrs. Wagner called. “It’s such a beautiful 
deep shade of red. You should be a model. Really. You’re so tall and thin.” 

“Thanks, Mrs. Wagner!” I called as the door closed behind me. I wasn’t 
thinking about my hair or being a model. I was thinking about Cole and Anthony 
and the pond. 

I trotted the rest of the way through town. Waved to Mr. Porter standing in 
the window of the Pic ’n’ Pay. Then I turned off the street and followed the dirt 
path that led to Pullman’s Pond. 

I didn’t have to go far to find Cole and Anthony. They were hiding behind 
the long hedge at the edge of Vanessa’s property. 

I gazed beyond the hedge to the falling-down old farmhouse where Vanessa 
lives. 

Who is Vanessa? I guess you might say she is the most interesting person in 
Goshen Falls. And the most weird. 

Actually, Vanessa is like someone from a horror movie. She is kind of 
pretty, with long, straight black hair and a pale, white face. She dresses all in 
black. She wears black lipstick and black fingernail polish. 



Vanessa is a mystery woman. No one knows if she’s young or old. 

She keeps to herself. I’ve hardly ever seen her in town. She lives in her old 
farmhouse right outside of town with her black cat. 

Naturally, everyone says she is some kind of sorceress. 

I’ve heard all kinds of stories about Vanessa. Frightening stories. Most of 
the kids in Goshen Falls are scared of her. But that doesn’t stop them from 
playing tricks on her. 

Kids are always daring each other to sneak up to Vanessa’s house. It’s kind 
of a game everyone plays. Sneak up to her house, tap on the window, make her 
cat screech. Then run away before Vanessa sees you. 

“Hey—Cole!” I called in a loud whisper. I ducked my head as I ran along 
the hedge. If Vanessa was home, I didn’t want her to see me. 

“Hey, Cole—what’s up?” 

As I came nearer, I saw that Cole and Anthony weren’t alone. Two other 
kids huddled behind the hedge. Franny Jowett and Jeremy Garth. 

Cole raised a finger to his lips. “Ssshhhh. Vanessa is in there.” 

“What are you doing?” I demanded. I saw that Franny and Jeremy held 
plastic water pitchers in their hands. “Is that lemonade or something?” 

They shook their heads solemnly. 

“Some kids dared them to fill Vanessa’s mailbox with water,” Cole 
explained. 

“Huh?” I gasped. I stared at Franny and Jeremy. “You’re not going to do it 
—are you?” 

“They have to,” Cole answered for them. “A dare is a dare.” 

“But that’s so mean!” I protested. 

My brother snickered. “The mailbox is right next to the front door. No way 
they won’t get caught.” 

Franny and Jeremy are blond and pale. Now they looked even paler than 
usual. Jeremy made a soft, choking sound. Franny gripped her pitcher tightly and 
peered over the hedge at the black metal mailbox on its tilted pole. 

“You accepted the dare. Are you going to wimp out?” Cole demanded. 

Franny and Jeremy glanced at each other nervously. They didn’t reply. 

“Don’t do it,” Anthony suddenly chimed in. 

We all turned to Anthony. He’s short and chubby and has a round face and 
very short black hair. He wears red-framed glasses that are always slipping down 
his little pug nose. 



“Don’t do it,” Anthony repeated. 

“Why n-not?” Franny stammered. 

“Didn’t you hear what happened when Vanessa caught Tommy Pottridge?” 
Anthony asked in a hushed whisper. “Didn’t you hear what she did to him?” 
“No!” Franny and Jeremy declared together. 

I felt a tremble of fear run down my back. “What did Vanessa do to 
Tommy?” I demanded. 



2 


I peered over the tall hedge. Did something move in Vanessa’s front window? 

No. Just a glint of sunlight on the windowpane. 

We huddled closer to Anthony. Even though it was a warm spring day, I 
suddenly felt chilled. “What did Vanessa do to Tommy?” I repeated in a whisper. 

“She caught him sneaking up to her house,” Anthony reported. “She did 
some kind of magic spell on him. She made his head blow up like a balloon.” 

“Oh, come on!” I exclaimed, rolling my eyes. 

“No—really!” Anthony protested. “His head was huge. And it got all soft 
and squishy. Like a sponge.” 

Cole laughed. 

Anthony clamped a hand over Cole’s mouth. “It’s true!” he insisted. 
“Vanessa gave him a big, soft, spongy head. That’s why we don’t see Tommy 
around anymore!” 

“But the Pottridges moved away!” Franny cried. 

“That’s why they moved,” Anthony replied. “Because of Tommy’s head.” 

We all froze for a moment, thinking about Anthony’s story. I tried to picture 
Tommy with a big, squishy head. 

Cole broke the silence. “Give me that!” he cried. He grabbed the water 
pitcher from Jeremy’s hands. “I’ll fill up her mailbox. I’m not scared.” 

“No way!” Jeremy protested. He wrestled the pitcher away from my 
brother. Then he turned to Franny. “We’re doing it—right? We were dared, so we 
have to do it—right?” 

Franny swallowed hard. “I guess,” she choked out. 

“All right!” Cole cheered, slapping them both on the back. Franny nearly 
dropped her pitcher. “You can do it! Lots of kids play tricks on Vanessa. And 
they don’t get squishy heads.” 

“I still think it’s mean to fill someone’s mailbox with water,” I protested. 
“And it’s not worth the risk.” 

No one wanted to listen to me or my warnings. 

Franny and Jeremy tiptoed to the end of the hedge. Then they began slowly 
making their way over the tall, weed-choked grass. 

They carried their plastic water pitchers in both hands in front of them. And 



they kept their eyes on the tilted mailbox to the right of the front door of 
Vanessa’s farmhouse. 

Cole, Anthony, and I crept out from behind the hedge to watch. I held my 
breath and stared at the front window, looking out for Vanessa. 

But the glare of yellow sunlight filled the windowpane. I couldn’t see a 
thing. 

Franny and Jeremy seemed to be moving in slow motion. It was taking 
them forever to cross the lawn to the mailbox! 

A million tiny white gnats flew over the tall grass. Swirling and dancing in 
the sunlight, the gnats sparkled like jewels. 

Franny and Jeremy walked right through them. Their eyes didn’t leave the 
mailbox. 

The two boys and I stepped a little closer, eager to see better. 

No sign of anyone inside the house. 

We stepped even closer. 

At last, Jeremy pulled down the metal mailbox lid. He and Franny raised 
their plastic pitchers. 

They both lowered the pitchers to the mailbox. 

And poured. 

The water made a soft splashing sound as it hit the metal mailbox. 

Franny emptied her pitcher. Jeremy had nearly emptied his. 

Then the front door swung open—and Vanessa burst out. 

She wore a flowing black dress. Her straight black hair flew wildly behind 
her. Her black-lipsticked lips were open in an angry cry. 

The cat screeched shrilly from somewhere in the house. 

Franny dropped her pitcher. She bent to pick it up. 

Changed her mind. 

Ran. 

Jeremy was already diving into the bushes at the far side of the house. 
Franny ran close behind him. 

Cole, Anthony, and I hadn’t moved. 

We stood in the grass. Frozen. Watching Vanessa. 

I gasped when I saw Vanessa’s furious stare. 

I turned to Cole and Anthony. “Why is she staring like that at us?” I choked 
out. “Does she think we did it?” 



3 


My whole body stiffened. As if Vanessa’s eyes were shooting out some kind of 
laser ray. 

I forced myself to spin away. And I started to run. 

Cole and Anthony were at my sides. Our sneakers thudded heavily over the 
dirt path. We kicked up clouds of dirt as we ran. A blur of green and brown, the 
fields appeared to tilt and sway around me. 

We ran through town without stopping. Without saying a word. Without 
even looking at each other! 

Mrs. Wagner stepped out of the bakery. She started to say hello. I caught the 
shocked expression on her face as the three of us ran past her without slowing 
down. 

We ran until we reached my house. We burst through the gate, slamming it 
open so hard, the whole fence shook. I pushed open the front door with my 
shoulder, and all three of us staggered into the living room. 

Gasping for breath, I dropped to my knees on the carpet. 

Cole and Anthony collapsed onto the couch. 

We struggled to catch our breath. I brushed my hair back off my sweaty 
forehead. The clock on the mantel chimed. Three o’clock. 

Cole and Anthony burst out laughing. 

I narrowed my eyes at them. “What’s so funny?” I demanded breathlessly. 

That made them laugh even harder. 

“What’s so funny, guys?” I repeated. I climbed to my feet and pressed my 
hands into my waist, waiting for an answer. “Why are you laughing?” 

“I don’t know!” Cole answered finally. 

“I don’t know, either!” Anthony echoed. 

And they both laughed again. 

“You’re crazy,” I muttered, shaking my head. “That wasn’t funny. It was 
scary.” 

Cole pulled himself up. His expression turned serious. “Did you see the 
way Vanessa stared at us?” 

“She didn’t see Franny and Jeremy,” Anthony said. “She only saw us.” He 
pulled off his glasses and cleaned them on his T-shirt sleeve. The short black hair 



on his round head glistened with sweat. 

I felt a chill. “What if Vanessa decides to do something terrible to us?” I 
demanded. “You two won’t be laughing then.” 

Cole pulled himself up even straighten He ran a hand back through his 
wavy blond hair. Cole is tall and even skinnier than me. Sometimes I think he 
looks like a grasshopper. 

“Crystal, what do you mean?” he demanded softly. 

“I mean, if Vanessa thinks we were the ones who filled her mailbox with 
water, maybe she’ll pay us back. You know. Make our heads swell up or 
something.” 

“But we didn’t do anything!” Anthony protested. “We have to tell her it was 
Franny and Jeremy.” 

“Snitch,” Cole muttered, grinning at his friend. 

“Maybe she won’t give us a chance to explain,” I said. “Maybe she’ll just 
do something horrible to us.” 

I started to the kitchen. “You guys want something to drink?” 

I didn’t hear their replies. 

I pulled open the fridge and took out a bottle of iced tea. 

A second later, I opened my mouth in a loud scream of pain. 



4 


“Crystal—what happened?” Cole came running into the kitchen. 

I shuddered in pain. “Ohhhh.” 

“What happened ?” he cried. 

I shook my hand, trying to shake away the throbbing. “The fridge door,” I 
managed to choke out. “I—slammed it on my hand.” 

I shook my hand some more. Then I tested each finger. I could move them. 
Nothing broken. 

I raised my eyes to Cole. “Why are you grinning?” I demanded. 

“You didn’t slam your hand,” he replied. “Vanessa did!” 

Anthony giggled from the doorway. 

“Cole—you’re not funny!” I screeched. I wrapped my fingers around his 
scrawny neck and pretended to strangle him. But my hand still hurt. I had to let 

go- 

“Vanessa cursed you,” Anthony said, picking up where Cole had left off. 
“Now your hand will probably swell up to the size of a cantaloupe.” 

“And it will get soft and squishy like Tommy’s head,” Cole added gleefully. 
“Soft and squishy—like your brainl” 

“Not funny! Not funny!” I insisted. I admit it. I felt a little afraid. I didn’t 
like kidding around about this stuff. 

My hand ached and burned. I opened the freezer and stuck it inside. “What 
if Vanessa really has powers?” I asked them. “What if she really did make me 
slam the door on my hand?” 

Cole and Anthony raised their hands in front of them and began moving 
them back and forth, as if casting spells on me. “You are a sponge head !” Cole 
cried, lowering his voice, trying to sound like a real sorcerer. “You will mop up 
the dinner dishes with your head!” 

That’s when Mom and Dad walked in. 

“What on earth—?” Mom cried. “Crystal—why do you have your hand in 
the freezer?” 

“Oh. Uh...” I slid my hand out and closed the freezer door. “Just cooling 
off,” I said. 

Mom narrowed her eyes at me. “Cooling off one hand?” 



“Actually, I slammed a door on it,” I told her. 

“Vanessa slammed a door on it,” Cole corrected. 

“Vanessa?” Dad asked, crossing to the sink. 

“You mean that strange woman who lives outside of town?” 

“Have you been pestering that poor woman again?” Mom demanded. 
“Don’t you kids have anything better to do than sneak around and play tricks on 
her?” 

“We didn’t do anything,” Cole said. “Really.” 

“That’s the truth,” Anthony chimed in. 

“Then why did you mention Vanessa?” Mom asked Cole. 

I decided I’d better change the subject. “Where were you two?” I asked my 
parents. 

“Out back. Trying to decide where to put the fence for the vegetable 
garden,” Dad replied. He was washing his hands in the kitchen sink, something 
Mom always scolds him for. 

“If we didn’t have chickens, you wouldn’t need a fence,” I grumbled. “I 
think you should get rid—” 

“That reminds me,” Mom interrupted. “Cole, some of the chickens 
wandered all the way to the back. Would you go out and round them up, please?” 

“Chicken Roundup!” I exclaimed gleefully. I slapped Cole on the back. 
“Congrats! Your favorite job!” 

“But that’s not fair! I did the chicken roundup last time!” Cole wailed. “It’s 
Crystal’s turn!” 

“I fed them this morning,” I declared. “And it wasn’t even my turn. 
Besides, it’s easier for you to round them up. Because you look like a big 
rooster!” 

Everyone laughed except Cole. He grumbled and shook his head. Then he 
grabbed Anthony and pulled him outside to help with the chicken roundup. 

A few seconds later, I could hear a lot of clucking and squawking back 
there. And I could hear the boys shouting and complaining. 

Did you ever try to herd chickens? 

It isn’t easy. 

My hand ached all day from slamming it in the fridge door. And every time it 
ached, I thought of Vanessa. 

And I pictured her cold eyes, staring at the boys and me. 



She isn’t going to do anything to us, I told myself. She can ’t do anything to 
us. Those stories about Vanessa can’t be true. 

I kept repeating this to myself. But that night, I had trouble falling asleep. 

I kept seeing a shadow move against my bedroom wall. The shadow of a 
cat. 

I climbed out of bed and pulled down the window blind. Now the room was 
bathed in total darkness. No shadows on the wall. 

I still couldn’t fall asleep. 

I stared wide-eyed into the blackness. 

“Crystal, go to sleep,” I instructed myself. “You are scaring yourself for no 
reason.” 

A creaking sound made me jump. 

A crack of gray light at my bedroom door. 

Another creak—and the streak of light grew wider. 

I swallowed hard. 

I watched the door slowly slide open. 

Staring in silence, I realized that someone was creeping into my bedroom. 

Someone wearing a black veil. And a long black dress. 

Vanessa! 



5 


I opened my mouth to scream. But only a low moan came out. 

I started to jump out of bed. But where could I run? 

She slid silently toward me, arms reaching out as if ready to grab me. Her 
face was hidden behind the heavy black veil. 

How did she get in the house? 

What is she going to do to me? 

The frightening questions fluttered through my mind. 

She leaned over my bed. Her hands moved to my throat. 

“No!” I choked out. 

I reached up. Pushed away her hands. Grasped her veil in both hands. And 
tugged it off. 

Cole! 

In the gray light from the open doorway, I could see his grin. 

“Cole—you jerk!” I shrieked. 

I tossed the veil down. Dove for him. Tried to tackle him to the floor. 

But I missed—and tumbled out of bed. 

“Cole—you creep! You scared me to death!” 

I don’t think he heard me over his gleeful laughter. 

I scrambled to my feet. He dodged away from me. Still cackling, he backed 
up to the doorway. “You really thought it was Vanessa!” he cried. 

“Did not!” I lied. “You just scared me, that’s all.” 

“Did too!” he insisted. “You thought it was Vanessa. You really thought she 
had come to pay you back!” 

“Did not! Did not!” I cried angrily. 

He made hand motions as if casting a spell. “Abracadabra! You’re a sponge 
head!” 

He started laughing again. He really thought he was a riot. 

“I’ll pay you back!” I promised him. “Really. I’m going to pay you back!” 

Shaking his head, he made his way out of the room, the long black skirt 
trailing over the floor. With an angry growl, I picked up the veil and heaved it 
after him. 



I punched my pillow furiously. Why did I let him fool me like that? Now 
he’d tell everyone in school that I thought Vanessa was sneaking into my room. 

My heart still pounding, I climbed back into bed. I felt so angry, it took me 
hours to fall asleep. And when I finally drifted off, I dreamed about a cat. 

An ugly black cat with bright yellow eyes and a blood-red tongue. 

The cat hunched in an all-white room. But then the room became my room. 

In the dream, the cat moved to the end of my bed. It opened its mouth wide. 
The bright red tongue darted over its yellow teeth. 

And then the cat began to screech. 

A sharp, painful sound—like fingernails dragged over a chalkboard. 

It screeched. And screeched. Its mouth opened wider. Its yellow eyes 
flamed. 

I couldn’t stand the sound. In the dream, I saw myself cover my ears with 
both hands. 

But the shrill screeching grew even louder. 

The cat floated closer. Closer. Opened its jaws wide, as if to swallow me. 

I woke up, stunned by the sudden silence. 

The dream had been so real. I expected to see the screeching cat standing 
on my bedcovers. 

Bars of yellow sunlight fell through the window blinds onto my floor. I saw 
the crumpled black veil beside the door. 

No cat. 

I stretched and climbed out of bed. Yawning, I got dressed for school. 

Mom was setting down a bowl of cornflakes and a glass of orange juice for 
me when I reached the kitchen. “Sleep well?” she asked. 

“Not at all,” I grumbled. I dropped into my seat at the breakfast table. “First 
I couldn’t get to sleep. Then I had an annoying nightmare.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. She crossed to the sink and began pouring water into the 
coffeemaker. 

I thought about telling her about Cole’s dumb joke. But I decided not to. 
Mom would only start asking us again about what we were doing at Vanessa’s 
house yesterday. 

“What are you doing after school, Crystal?” she asked, clicking on the 
coffeemaker. “Maybe you can come home and rest up then.” 

“No way,” I replied, swallowing a mouthful of cornflakes. “I’ve got 
basketball practice. Coach Clay says she’s going to give me extra playing time. I 



told her how tired I am of being the sixth girl. I want to be a starter. But I never 
get enough playing time to show how good I am.” 

Mom turned to me. She blew a strand of brown hair off her forehead. 
“Maybe that’s why you couldn’t sleep last night,” she said. “Maybe you were 
nervous about basketball practice.” 

I shrugged. I didn’t want to tell her the real reason. 

I heard Cole clomping down the stairs. Mom pulled out a cereal bowl for 

him. 

“When are you going to buy a birthday present for Lucy-Ann?” Mom asked 
me. “You know her birthday party is Saturday.” 

Lucy-Ann is one of my best friends. She has been talking about this 
birthday—her thirteenth!—for weeks. She’s so excited about becoming a 
teenager. 

“Maybe I’ll go shopping tomorrow after school,” I replied. 

“What are you going to get her?” 

I opened my mouth to answer, but Cole came charging into the room. 

One look at his face—and Mom and I both gasped. 

“Cole!” Mom cried. 

“My f-face...” he stammered. 

His cheeks and forehead were covered with big sores. Ugly red blotches. 
“It... hurts...” he groaned. He turned to me. “Vanessa,” he murmured. 
“Vanessa did this to me.” 



6 


Cole dropped to his knees and covered his face with his hands. 

I jumped up from my chair. “Cole—?” 

“I’ll call the doctor!” Mom cried. “Or should I dial 911?” She bent over 
Cole. “Does it really hurt? Are you really in pain?” 

Cole slowly lowered his hands. And as he did, I saw the broad grin on his 

face. 

And I saw that his hands had smeared the red blotches on his cheeks. 
“Cole!” I screamed furiously. 

Mom’s mouth dropped open. She had one hand on the phone, ready to call 
the doctor. 

“Red marker pen,” Cole said through his grin. Then he burst out laughing. 
“Aaaagggh!” I let out a furious cry—and heaved my cereal spoon at him. It 
bounced off his chest and clattered across the linoleum floor. 

“Not funny!” I screamed. 

Mom shook her head. “Cole, you really scared me.” She sighed. 

Cole stood up and pointed at me. “Crystal, you really believed Vanessa did 
it to me,” he accused. 

“Your jokes are just stupid!” I cried. “I’m never going to believe you again. 
Even if you get hit by a truck, I won’t believe you!” 

I spun around and stormed out of the kitchen. 

Behind me, I could hear Mom telling Cole, “You really have to stop scaring 
your sister.” 

“Why?” Cole asked. 

I grabbed my backpack, tore out of the house, and slammed the door behind 
me. 

I forced Vanessa from my mind. 

I didn’t think about her once that whole day. 

In fact, I didn’t think about her until the next time I saw her. 

And that’s when all the frightening stuff really started. 



7 


“Is that Lucy-Ann’s cake?” Cole asked. 

“Well, it says HAPPY BIRTHDAY, LUCY-ANN on it,” I replied. “So 
what’s your guess, genius?” 

Cole, Anthony, and I had our noses pressed against the window of the 
bakery. Several white-frosted birthday cakes were on display. Lucy-Ann’s stood 
in the middle of the shelf, ready to be picked up for her party on Saturday. 

I saw Mrs. Wagner waving to us from behind the counter inside the store. I 
waved back to her. Then I checked my watch. 

“Hey—I’m late,” I told the boys. “I’ve got to buy a present for Lucy-Ann. 
Then I’ve got to get home and study my math.” 

I hurried toward the Mini-Mart on the corner next to the grocery. My plan 
was to buy Lucy-Ann a new CD. At the end of the block, Mr. Horace’s old 
hound sprawled in the middle of Main Street, lazily scratching his mangy ear 
with a back paw, looking as if he owned the town. 

I heard Cole and Anthony laughing behind me. I turned and made a shooing 
motion with both hands. “Take a walk, guys. You don’t have to tag along with 
me.” 

They ignored me, as usual. 

Cole slipped an egg from his pocket. His eyes flashed mischievously. 
“Think fast!” he cried. He tossed the egg at Anthony. 

Anthony cupped his hands and caught the egg. Without a pause, he tossed it 
back to my brother. 

“Oh, please,” I begged. “Not this stupid game.” 

Cole had to stretch—but he caught the egg in one hand. 

This is one of their games that drives me crazy. They throw an egg back and 
forth, back and forth as they walk. Each time they throw it, they stand a little 
farther apart from each other. 

The idea is to see how far they can toss the egg without breaking it. 

The answer usually is: not too far. 

One of them always ends up with egg splattered all over him. Once I made 
the mistake of trying to dive between them and intercept the egg. Too bad I 
intercepted it with my forehead. 



“Please, guys,” I begged. “Go do your egg toss somewhere else—okay?” 

Cole backed up into the middle of the street. A few feet away, Mr. Horace’s 
old hound yawned and rolled onto his back. I saw two men in overalls pulling 
enormous burlap bags of feed from the Feed Store across the street. 

“Yo!” Cole called—and heaved the egg high in the air. 

Anthony raised a hand to shield his eyes from the sun. He backed up, back, 
back—nearly to the grocery store. 

And the egg plopped down on top of his head. 

What a disgusting craaack it made. Really gross. 

“Huh?” Anthony uttered a startled gasp. And yellow goo started to flow 
down his forehead and the sides of his hair. 

“Sorry. It got away from me!” Cole cried. But he couldn’t keep a straight 
face. He burst out laughing. 

Anthony let out an angry growl and charged at Cole. 

Cole dodged away from him and ran up onto the sidewalk. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” I shouted. 

Roaring like an angry lion, Anthony dove at my brother and pinned him 
against the grocery store window. “You did that on purpose!” he shouted. 

“No way! It was an accident!” Cole replied, laughing. 

Anthony lowered his egg-gloppy head and head-butted Cole in the chest. 

“Ooof!” My brother let out a groan. 

Anthony pulled back his head and prepared another head butt. 

Cole glanced down at his T-shirt. It was drenched in sticky egg yolk. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” Shrieking at them, I dove between them. I grabbed 
Anthony’s shoulders and tried to tug him off Cole. 

I didn’t see Vanessa step out of the grocery store. 

None of us did. 

“Get off 7” I begged Anthony. I gave him a hard tug. 

And all three of us bounced hard into Vanessa. 

First I saw her black dress. Then I saw her pale face. Saw her dark eyes go 
wide with surprise. 

I saw her mouth fall open. Her hands fly up. 

And two bags of groceries bounced to the sidewalk. 

I heard one bag rip. And I heard cans and bottles clatter onto the street. 

The sound of shattering glass made me turn to the street. I saw a puddle of 
deep red ketchup that had leaked from a broken ketchup bottle. A carton of eggs 



lay open and shattered in the gutter. 

I still had Anthony’s shoulders gripped in both hands. A shiver ran down his 
body. He pulled free of me with a hard jerk. 

“Sorry!” he cried to Vanessa. “I’m really sorry!” 

Then he jumped over some of her groceries—and went running into the 
street. 

“Whooooa!” Anthony cried out as he tripped over the hound dog. He went 
down face first on the pavement on top of the dog. 

The dog didn’t make a sound. It hardly moved. 

Anthony struggled to his feet. Then he roared off behind the Feed Store. He 
disappeared without ever looking back. 

“Oh, wow,” I murmured, staring down at the ruined groceries all over the 
street. “Oh, wow.” 

Cole stood beside me, breathing noisily, shaking his head. 

The dog loped over slowly, favoring one leg. He lowered his head and 
began licking egg yolk off the pavement. 

I turned to Vanessa and nearly gasped when I saw the look of fury on her 
cold, pale face. 

As her eyes locked on mine, I felt as if I’d been stabbed—by an icicle. 

A shiver of fear made me take a step back. I grabbed Cole’s arm. I started to 
pull him away. 

But Vanessa stepped forward, her long black dress sweeping along the 
sidewalk. She pointed to Cole with a slender finger tipped in black nail polish. 
Then she pointed at me. 

“Chicken chicken,” she whispered. 



8 


A smile spread over Vanessa’s black-lipsticked lips as she rasped those words at 
us. 

“Chicken chicken.” 

I gasped as if I’d been slapped. 

The street tilted in front of me. Then it started to spin. 

What on earth did she mean? Why did she say that? 

Cole and I didn’t wait to ask her. Our sneakers thudded the pavement as we 
took off, running at full speed. 

I glimpsed the old hound dog, still lapping up egg yolk from the street. And 
I glimpsed Vanessa’s angry face for one more brief second. 

And then Cole and I whipped around the corner, sped past the post office 
and the dry cleaner, and ran all the way home. 

I didn’t glance back once. And I didn’t say a word until we were safely in 
the kitchen. 

I collapsed onto a kitchen stool. Cole ran the cold water in the sink and 
splashed it over his face and hair. 

We were both panting and wheezing, too breathless to speak. I wiped the 
sweat off my forehead with my arm. Then I crossed to the fridge and pulled out a 
small bottle of water. Twisting off the cap, I tilted it to my mouth and drank it 
down. 

“We should have stayed,” I finally managed to sputter. 

“Huh?” Cole turned to me. He had water dripping down his red face. The 
front of his T-shirt was soaked. 

“We should have stayed and helped Vanessa pick up her groceries,” I told 

him. 

“No way!” Cole protested. “She’s crazy! Did you see the look on her face?” 

“Well... we knocked down all of her groceries,” I said. 

“So? It was an accident,” my brother insisted. “Accidents happen all the 
time, right? But she... she wanted to destroy us!” 

I rubbed the cool bottle against my pounding forehead. “Why did she say 
that to us?” I asked, thinking out loud. “Why did she whisper like that?” 

Cole changed his expression. He reached out his hand and pointed a finger 



at me. Then he did a pretty good Vanessa imitation. “Chicken chicken!” he 
rasped, shaking his finger at me. 

“Stop it!” I snapped. “I mean, really. Stop it, Cole. You’re giving me the 
creeps.” 

“Chicken chicken,” he whispered again. 

“Come on. Give me a break,” I pleaded. I crushed the plastic bottle in my 
hand. “It’s just so weird,” I murmured. “Why did she say that word? Why?” 

Cole shrugged. “Because she’s crazy?” 

I shook my head fretfully. “She isn’t crazy. She’s evil,” I said. I wrapped my 
arms around myself. “I just have this feeling that something horrible is going to 
happen now.” 

Cole rolled his eyes. “Crystal—what could happen?” 



9 


“Did you buy a present for Lucy-Ann?” Mom asked at dinner. 

I swallowed a forkful of spaghetti. “Well... actually... no.” 

She gazed up at me in surprise. “But I thought you went into town to buy 
her a CD.” 

“Pass the Parmesan cheese,” Dad interrupted. So far, those were his only 
words this evening. Guess he had a bad day at work. 

“I don’t understand,” Mom insisted. “What did you do after school, 
Crystal?” 

“Nothing, Mom.” I sighed. “Can we change the topic?” 

“You have spaghetti sauce all over your chin,” Cole pointed out. 

I made a face at him. “Very helpful,” I muttered. “Guess I’ve been sitting 
across the table from you for too long. I’m picking up your habits.” 

He stuck out his tongue at me. He had half a meatball on his tongue. Very 
mature. 

“I forgot to ask you about basketball practice yesterday,” Dad chimed in. 
“How did that—” 

“Bad topic!” I interrupted. 

Mom set down her fork. She blew a strand of hair off her forehead. “Guess 
every topic is a bad one tonight, huh?” 

“Maybe,” I grumbled, lowering my eyes to my plate. I shook my head. “I 
was terrible at practice. Coach Clay gave me a chance, and I played like a perfect 
klutz.” 

“No one’s perfect,” Cole chimed in. 

“Cole, be quiet,” Mom scolded. 

“Doesn’t anyone want to hear about my sprained thumb?” Cole whined. 

“No,” Mom shot back. “Be quiet.” She turned back to me. “You didn’t play 
well?” 

“I—I tripped over my own dribble. Twice,” I stammered. “And I missed an 
easy layup. The ball didn’t even touch the rim.” 

“Well... next time...” Dad started. 

“But this was my big chance to show I can be a starter!” I cried. “And I 
blew it. I just felt so tired. I hadn’t slept the night before. And... and...” 



“You’re still the sixth player,” Mom said soothingly. “You’ll get a chance.” 

“Do you have team practice tomorrow?” Dad asked, helping himself to 
more salad. 

I shook my head. “No. Tomorrow afternoon is chorus practice. Cole has it, 
too. You know. The chorus is performing for the junior high graduation next 
month.” 

“I get to sing two solos,” Cole bragged. “I’m the only fifth grader in the 
chorus—and I’m the only one with perfect pitch.” 

“No one’s perfect,” I reminded him. I know. It was a really lame joke. No 
one laughed. 

Mom lowered her eyes to Cole’s hand. “How did you sprain your thumb?” 
she asked. 

“I didn’t,” Cole replied. “I was just trying to get into the conversation.” 

Mrs. Mellon, the music teacher, was a tiny, birdlike woman. She always wore 
gray sweaters and gray skirts or pants. With her feathery gray hair and snipped 
beak of a nose, she always reminded me of a sparrow. Or maybe a chirping 
chickadee. 

She called us her canaries. 

Greene County Middle School wasn’t big enough to have a music room. So 
the chorus met after school in a corner of the auditorium stage. 

There were eight kids in the chorus. Four boys and four girls. Mostly sixth 
graders, with a few younger kids like Cole thrown in. It was hard to put a chorus 
together in such a small school. 

Mrs. Mellon was late. So the boys shot paper clips across the stage at each 
other with rubber bands. And the girls talked about how dumb the boys were. 

When Mrs. Mellon finally arrived, her hands fluttering tensely at her 
feathery hair, she wanted to get right down to business. “Our performance is two 
weeks from tonight,” she announced fretfully. “And we really don’t know what 
we’re doing—do we?” 

We all pretty much agreed that we needed a lot more rehearsal time. Lucy- 
Ann, who is our only soprano, raised her hand. “Maybe we could lip-synch some 
songs,” she suggested. “You know. From records.” 

Everyone laughed. 

I studied Lucy-Ann. I wasn’t so sure she was joking. 

“No fooling around this afternoon,” Mrs. Mellon said sternly. “Let’s see 



how much we can get done when we’re being serious.” 

We sang our warm-up scales. We were interrupted when a large black 
spider dropped from the rafters into Lucy-Ann’s curly blond hair. She shrieked 
and staggered back. And she began shaking her head wildly and tugging at her 
curls with both hands. 

Finally, the spider dropped onto the stage floor, and Cole tromped on it. 

“Isn’t that bad luck or something?” a boy named Larry called to my brother. 

Cole shrugged and scraped the sole of his shoe against the floor. 

“Let’s begin with ‘Beautiful Ohio’,” Mrs. Mellon suggested, ignoring the 
whole spider problem. She shuffled sheet music on her music stand. “That’s the 
one that gave us so much trouble last time.” 

“It’s the high part that’s the problem,” Lucy-Ann chimed in. 

“It’s your voice that’s the problem!” Larry teased Lucy-Ann. I think he has 
a crush on her. He’s always insulting her. 

Mrs. Mellon cleared her throat. “Please, folks. Serious. Serious.” She turned 
to Cole. “Have you been practicing your solo?” 

“Oh, yeah. Sure,” my brother lied. 

“Then let’s try it,” Mrs. Mellon suggested. “Remember, Cole—you wait 
three beats before you come in.” 

“No problem,” Cole told her. 

At the last rehearsal, he didn’t do it right once. 

Mrs. Mellon raised her arms. Smiled. And fluttered her hands, her signal for 
us to start. 

We began to sing “Beautiful Ohio”. It’s kind of a drippy song, but I like to 
sing the high part. 

“Very good. Very good,” Mrs. Mellon encouraged us as we sang, a tight 
smile on her face. 

It did sound pretty good. 

Until Cole began his solo. 

I saw him take a deep breath. He stepped forward. Waited for three beats. 
Opened his mouth. 

And sang: “BLUCK BUCK BUCK BLUUUCK BLUCK.” 

“Huh?” Mrs. Mellon gasped. 

We all stopped singing. I stared hard at my brother. 

He had a confused expression on his face. He kept clearing his throat. 

“Sing the words, Cole,” Mrs. Mellon instructed sternly. “You do know the 



words—right?” 

Cole nodded. 

“Let’s begin with the chorus just before Cole’s solo,” she told us. 

We began again. As I sang, I kept my eyes on my brother. 

I saw him count off the three beats. Then: 

“BLUCK BLUCK BLUCK CLUCK BUCK!” 

What was he trying to prove? 

Larry laughed. But no one else did. 

Cole kept rubbing his neck and clearing his throat. His face was bright red. 

“Areyou okay?” I mouthed the words to him. 

He didn’t answer me. 

“Cole—please!” Mrs. Mellon pleaded. “Stop fooling around. We really 
haven’t time.” She frowned at him. “You have a beautiful voice. I know you can 
sing this. Will you please do your part?” 

She raised her hands. “Begin on three,” she told him. “One... two... 
three...” She began conducting with one hand. “Now let’s hear your best,” she 
urged. 

“BLUCK BLUCK BUCK BUCK BUCK!” my brother clucked in a high, 
silly voice. 

I stepped away from the other girls and rushed up to him. “Cole—what is 
the big idea?” I cried furiously. “Why are you doing that?” 

“BLUCK BLUCK BUCK CLUCK BLUCK,” he replied. 



10 


Later, I was up in my room, wrapping Lucy-Ann’s birthday present. I glanced to 
the doorway and saw Cole standing there tensely. 

His blond hair stood up straight on top of his head. He was wiping his 
sweaty hands on the front of his T-shirt. 

“What do you want?” I asked sharply. “I’m busy.” I folded a corner of the 
birthday wrapping paper and taped it down over the CD case. 

Cole cleared his throat, but didn’t reply. 

I shook my head at him. “You ruined the whole rehearsal,” I told him. 

“It wasn’t my fault!” he cried shrilly. 

“Hah!” I slammed my scissors down on the desk. “You refused to sing. You 
stood there clucking like a hen! Whose fault was it?” 

“You don’t understand—” Cole croaked, tenderly rubbing his throat. 

“No, I don’t,” I interrupted angrily. “You know, we’re all tired of your 
dumb jokes. Especially me. You just think you’re so funny all the time, Cole. 
But you’re really such a pain.” 

“But I wasn’t being funny!” he protested, stepping into the room. He 
walked up to the desk and fiddled nervously with the tape dispenser. “I didn’t 
want to cluck like that. I—I couldn’t help it.” 

I rolled my eyes. “For sure,” I muttered. 

“No—really, Crystal. I—I think Vanessa made me do it! I think she made 
me cluck like that!” 

I laughed. “I’m not stupid, you know,” I told him. “I may fall for the same 
joke of yours once or twice. But I’m not going to fall for it again.” 

“But Crystal—” 

“It wasn’t funny,” I repeated. “And it wasn’t fair for you to ruin the whole 
rehearsal for everyone.” 

“You don’t understand!” Cole protested. “It wasn’t a joke. I really had to 
cluck. I—” 

“Out!” I shouted. I made shooing motions with both hands. “Out of my 
room—now!” 

His face turned bright red. He started to say something. Changed his mind 
with a defeated sigh. Turned and slumped out of my room. 



“Anything for a joke, huh, Cole?” I murmured to myself. 

I’m usually not that mean to my brother. But this time he deserved to be 
taught a lesson. 

I finished wrapping the present. Then I did homework until bedtime. 

I turned out the light and was climbing between the sheets when I heard a 
chicken clucking. 

That’s weird, I thought. I never hear the chickens at night. They’re all 
locked in their coop. 

“Cluuuuck bluuuuuck. ” 

Sitting up, I stared across the dark room to the open window. My curtains 
fluttered in a soft breeze. A triangle of pale moonlight slanted over the carpet. 

Did the chicken coop door come open? I wondered. 

Did a chicken escape somehow? 

“Bluuck bluuck buuck. ” 

The cry seemed to be coming from close to the house, beneath my bedroom 
window. 

Watching the fluttering curtains, I climbed out of bed and crossed the room 
to the window. The moonlight washed over me, cold and silvery. 

“Bluck bluck cluck. ” 

I leaned on the window ledge. Peered down to the ground. 

And gasped. 



11 


Nothing down there. 

No chicken. 

I stared at the silvery ground. Then moved my eyes to the long chicken 
coop beside the garage. It sort of looked like a long, low, wooden doghouse. The 
door was shut tight. Nothing moved inside its tiny round windows. 

“Bluuuuck bluuuck. ” 

Feeling confused, I pulled my head inside. Where was that clucking coming 
from? 

From inside? 

“Cluuck cluuuck. ” 

Yes. I could hear it through the wall. The wall to my brother’s room next 

door. 

Why is he doing that? I asked myself, climbing back into bed. Why is he in 
there clucking in the middle of the night? 

What is he trying to prove? 


* * * 


I knew Lucy-Ann’s birthday party would be fun. Lucy-Ann always throws great 
parties. 

She comes from a big farm family. She has seven brothers and sisters. 

Their big farmhouse is always filled with great smells—chickens roasting, 
pies baking. Lucy-Ann’s parents are the most successful farmers in Goshen 
Falls. And they’re really nice people, too. 

Lucy-Ann invited the whole class to her party, and about two dozen of her 
relatives. It was a beautiful spring afternoon. And a lot of people were already 
hanging out in the yard in front of the tall, white farmhouse when I arrived. 

Lucy-Ann has a lot of little cousins. As I hurried up the gravel drive, I saw 
a bunch of them hanging around the side of the utility barn. Lucy-Ann’s dad was 
giving tractor rides, and the little kids were jumping up and down, wrestling 
each other in excitement, waiting their turns. 

I met Lucy-Ann at the top of the drive and handed her the wrapped-up CD. 



She studied the square-shaped box and grinned. “Wow. I’ll never guess 
what this is!” she joked. 

“Okay, okay. So I’m not too original,” I replied with a shrug. 

“You don’t know what a perfect present it is,” she said as we began to walk 
across the grass to the others. “Mom and Dad got me a Discman for my birthday 
—but no CDs.” 

I laughed. “Well, now you’ve got one,” I said. “At least I know you don’t 
already have it!” 

Lucy-Ann’s expression turned serious. “Are you going to chorus rehearsal 
tomorrow morning?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. We really need to practice.” 

“I’ll be a little late,” Lucy-Ann said. “We usually don’t get back from 
church till after eleven-thirty.” She frowned. “Did you talk to your brother? Why 
did he act like such a total jerk yesterday? What was all that horrible clucking? 
Did he think it was funny or something?” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I guess.” Then I added with a sigh, “No way I can 
explain my brother. Sometimes I think he’s from Mars.” 

Lucy-Ann laughed. “Tell me about it,” she muttered. “I’ve got four 
brothers!” 

I waved to a couple of girls from my class who were leaning against the 
broad trunk of an old maple tree. I walked over to talk to them. 

I like a lot of kids in my class, although I don’t get to see some of them 
outside of school. You see, Goshen Falls is so tiny, and we have the only middle 
school for miles. So kids are bussed to our school from all over the county. 

That means some of my friends live over thirty miles away. When I want to 
call them at night, it’s a long-distance call! 

It was a nice party. We stayed outside the whole time. Lucy-Ann cranked up 
the volume on her tape player, and we all danced. I mean, all the girls danced. A 
couple of the boys joined in. But most of them stood on the grass, making jokes 
about those who were dancing. 

I really had fun—until birthday cake time. 

And then the fun turned to horror. 



12 


As the afternoon sun started to lower itself behind the farmhouse, Lucy-Ann’s 
mom carried out the birthday cake. Actually, she carried out two cakes—one 
vanilla from the bakery and one chocolate that she baked herself. 

“With so many kids in our family,” Lucy-Ann explained to me, “no one 
could ever decide what kind of cake everyone liked best. So Mom always has to 
bake an extra for every birthday!” 

We all grabbed plates and gathered around the long, white-tableclothed 
table to sing “Happy Birthday” to Lucy-Ann. Beside the two cakes stood a 
blueberry pie about the size of a pizza! 

It took a long while to light the candles on both cakes. The wind kept 
gusting and blowing some of the candles out. 

Finally, Lucy-Ann’s parents got them all lighted, and we sang “Happy 
Birthday”. Lucy-Ann looked really pretty standing behind the cakes, the 
flickering candlelight dancing over her face and curly blond hair. 

She seemed to be staring at me as we sang. 

And I suddenly realized that something was wrong. 

That loud clicking sound I heard—it was coming from me! 

My lips were clicking together noisily as I sang. 

As soon as the song ended, I rubbed my lips with my finger. They felt very 
dry. Sort of cracked and dry. 

“Crystal—what kind of cake?” Lucy-Ann was asking. I gazed up to see her 
and her mother slicing the cakes. 

I held my plate up. “A little bit of both?” I couldn’t decide, either. 

Balancing my plate and fork in one hand, I walked off to join some friends. 
“Looks good,” I said. 

I mean, I tried to say it. But it came out, “Tcccck tccccck. ” Sort of a metal 
click. 

I ran my tongue over my lips. So dry. 

“Tcccck tcccccck. ” 

I tried to chew a forkful of cake. But each bite made that loud clicking 
sound. 

I licked my lips again. 



Tried to chew. 

I started to choke. I couldn’t chew the cake. 

“Ckkkkkkk tccccck. ” 

A few kids were staring at me. 

“Crystal, are you okay?” someone asked. 

I clicked a reply. Then I hurried to Lucy-Ann at the table. “Do you have any 
Chap Stick?” I demanded shrilly. 

My lips clicked as I talked. She struggled to understand me. 

“Chap Stick?” I repeated. “Chpsttttccck?” 

She nodded, narrowing her eyes to study me. “In the medicine chest. 
Downstairs bathroom on the left.” She pointed. 

I set down my cake plate and took off, running across the grass. I pulled 
open the screen door and flew into the house. It smelled sweet inside, from all 
the cake and pie baking. 

I turned to the left, into the hallway I knew my way. I’d spent a lot of hours 
with Lucy-Ann here. 

The bathroom door stood open. I stepped inside, clicked on the light, and 
shut the door behind me. 

Then I dove to the medicine cabinet and gazed into the mirror. 

It took my eyes a few seconds to adjust. But when I could finally focus on 
my lips—I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror. 



13 


Bright red, my lips poked out from my face. 

I ran a finger across them. Both lips were bumpy. Hard and bumpy. 

I tapped my lips with my finger. It made a soft click. 

My lips were hard. They didn’t feel like skin anymore! They felt as hard as 
fingernails! 

“Tcccck tcccck. ” 

I clicked them. Opened and closed my mouth. Staring hard at the ugly 
reflection in the mirror. 

Had my lips grown some sort of crust? Were my real lips underneath? 

I raised both hands and struggled to pull the crusty part off. 

But no. No crust. The hard lips were attached to my face. 

“Oww!” I gasped. My lips clicked shut. 

“What is happening to me? It—it’s like a bird beak! I can’t let anyone see 
me like this!” I cried out loud. 

I banged the mirror with both fists. This can’t be happening! I told myself 
in a complete panic. It can ’t\ 

I tried to pull the hard beak lips off one more time. 

“Crystal—calm down. Calm down!” I instructed myself. I took a deep 
breath and forced myself to turn away from the mirror. 

It’s an allergic reaction, I decided. 

That’s all. I ate something I am allergic to. 

It will disappear in a few hours. And if it doesn’t disappear, Dr. Macy will 
know how to shrink the lips back to normal and make them soft again. 

I took another deep breath. My whole body was shaking. I was trembling so 
hard, my lips were clicking. 

I shut my eyes. Then I turned back to the mirror. I opened them, praying my 
real lips would be back. 

But no. 

“A bird beak,” I murmured in a shaky whisper. “It looks like a bird beak.” 

Click click. 

I ran my tongue over the bumpy lips. 



Ow. The hard lips scratched my tongue. 

I can’t let anyone see me like this! I decided. I’ll sneak out the front door 
and run home. I’ll explain to Lucy-Ann later. 

I shut off the light and pulled the bathroom door open a crack. No one in the 
house, I saw. 

Everyone was still out in the back, enjoying the cakes and pie. 

Will I ever enjoy cake again? I wondered. 

Or will I have to pull up worms from the ground and suck them through my 
bird lips? 

Sickening thoughts. 

I crept along the living room. Then pushed open the front door—and 
escaped. 

As I ran to the road, I could hear the happy voices from behind the house. 
Kids were laughing and shouting over the boom of dance music. 

I turned and started running full speed toward home. I hoped no one could 
see me. 

The sun had sunk behind the trees. Evening shadows reached across the 
ground toward me. 

My lips clicked as I ran. My heart pounded. I ran all the way home without 
slowing down once. Luckily, I didn’t run into anyone I knew on the street. 

Mom and Dad’s car was gone. I ran up the driveway and into the house 
through the kitchen door. 

Cole turned shakily from the sink. “Crystal—!” he cried. I could tell 
instantly that something was wrong. 

I turned my face away. I didn’t want him to see my ugly bird mouth. 

But he rushed forward, grabbed my arm, and turned me around. “Mom and 
Dad aren’t home,” he murmured. “I—I have to show you something.” 

“Cole—what is it?” I demanded, my lips clicking. “Why are you —click 
click —wearing that bath towel around your neck?” 

“I... need help,” he replied, lowering his eyes. 

He slowly unwrapped the blue bath towel. Then he slid it off his neck. 
“Look,” he insisted. 

I gasped. 

Feathers! 

He had white feathers poking out from his neck and shoulders. 



14 


“Cole—when did this happen?” I shrieked. 

“BLUCCCK BLUUUCK BUCCCCK,” he clucked, his eyes wide with 
horror. 

“Stop it!” I cried angrily. “This is no time for your stupid clucking!” 

And then I realized that he had tricked me again. The feathers weren’t 
really growing from his body. He had glued them on or something. 

“BLUUUCK. I... can’t... stop the clucking!” he choked out, rubbing his 
throat. 

“Yeah. Sure,” I replied, rolling my eyes. I reached out and plucked a white 
feather from the back of his neck. 

I expected the fake feather to slide off easily. 

But my brother’s hands shot up. “OUCH!” he screamed. 

The tip of the feather left a small hole in his skin. I grabbed a big feather on 
his shoulder—and pulled it. 

“Hey—careful!” Cole cried, moving away from me. “BLUUUCK 
CLUUUCK. That really hurts!” 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “They’re real! You... you’re really growing —click 
click —feathers!” 

“Uh... uh... uh...” Cole started to whimper. His feathery shoulders shook 
up and down. 

“Take it easy,” I told him. I guided him gently into his room. “I’ll pull them 
off. I’ll be really careful. You’ll be okay.” 

I made him sit down on the edge of the bed. I leaned over him and started to 
pluck out the white feathers. I tried to be as gentle as I could. But he jumped 
each time I tugged one out. 

“We’ve got to tell Mom and Dad,” he said softly, his eyes lowered to the 
floor. “Ouch.” 

“They’re almost all out,” I told him. I plucked a long one off the back of his 
neck. He jumped. “No problem. You will look perfectly normal.” 

“But we’ve still got to tell Mom and Dad,” he insisted. 

“Do you think they’ll believe us?” I asked. My hard lips clicked with each 
word. 



Cole gazed up at me. “Hey—what’s up with your lips?” 

“Oh—I—uh...” I covered them with one hand. “Just chapped,” I said. 
“Very chapped.” 

I don’t know why. I didn’t want to let him know that weird things were 
happening to me, too. 

“You look disgusting!” Cole exclaimed. “Yuck!” 

It seemed to cheer him up a lot. 

I tugged the last two feathers out as hard as I could. 

“Hey—!” he cried out angrily. He rubbed a hand over the back of his neck. 

I stepped back. White feathers covered the bed and floor. “You’d better pick 
them up,” I clicked. 

He clucked in reply. 

I still had one hand over my mouth. I didn’t need any more comments from 
him about how disgusting my lips looked. I hurried to the bathroom to find some 
cream for them. 

Mom and Dad stayed out very late. Cole and I tried to stay awake because we 
wanted to talk to them. But finally, we gave up and went to bed. 

Sunday morning I woke up late. The sun was already high in the sky. 
Orange sunlight washed over my room from the open window. A soft breeze 
ruffled my feathers. 

Huh? Feathers? 

“Ohhhh.” I sat up with a groan. My neck itched like crazy. My arms itched, 

too. 

I blinked myself awake. And stared at the white feathers up and down my 
arms. 

I opened my mouth to scream. But all that came out was a choked “goggle 
goggle goggle. ” Like a clucking hen. 

I leaped out of bed and hurtled to the dresser mirror. I pulled down the top 
of my nightshirt and gasped. My shoulders and arms were covered with fluffy, 
white and brown feathers. 

I brushed my hand over my lips. They had grown even harder. Hard as 
bone. 

I saw something move in the mirror. I twirled around to find Cole in my 
bedroom doorway. 

“Crystal—” he clucked. He staggered into the room. White feathers bristled 



on his shoulders and under his chin. They had grown back. 

“Look at me!” I clicked. 

“BLUCCK BLUCCCCK,” Cole replied. 

I turned back to the mirror and started frantically pulling off my feathers. It 
hurt each time. But I didn’t care. I wanted them off! 

It didn’t take long. I plucked them all off. Then I gathered them up and 
tossed them into the wastebasket. Then I helped Cole remove his feathers. 

His lips had hardened during the night. His fingernails had grown. His 
hands suddenly looked sort of like claws. 

“Vanessa,” he murmured. 

I stared at him. I knew instantly what he meant. 

I had been thinking the same thing all along. Remembering the horrible 
moment we spilled Vanessa’s groceries. 

“Yes,” I agreed. “I didn’t want to admit it. I didn’t want to believe it. But 
Vanessa did this to us. Vanessa is BLUUUUCCK BLUCCCK turning us into 
chickens.” 

“Chicken chicken,” he clucked. 

I heard clattering sounds downstairs in the kitchen. Mom and Dad! 

“We have to BLUUUUCK tell them!” I cried. “We have to tell them 
everything!” 

Cole and I both bolted for the bedroom door at the same time. We squeezed 
through together. Then we ran side by side down the hall. 

I could hear Mom’s voice from the kitchen. 

Cole and I started calling to her as we hurried down the stairs. 

“Mom—we need BLUUUCCK help!” I cried. “It’s Vanessa. She really 
does have BLUUUCCK CLUUCK powers!” 

“She’s turning us into chickens!” Cole called to Mom as we reached the 
downstairs hall and went running to the kitchen. “We’re growing feathers and 
everything!” 

“It’s the truth!” I cried. “You’ve got to help us. Cole and I—BLUUUCK— 
we’re both turning into chickens!” 

“That’s good news,” Mom replied calmly “I need two more chickens for the 
barbecue this afternoon.” 



15 


“Huh?” 

“Barbecue us?” 

Cole and I both gasped. Was Mom joking? 

As soon as we burst into the kitchen, I realized that Mom wasn’t talking to 
us. She was on the phone. She had her back to us and was drumming her 
fingernails on the Formica counter beside the phone. 

My eyes swept over the kitchen. It was cluttered with pans and serving 
bowls, cut-up lettuce and tomatoes, a bag of potatoes, bottles of barbecue sauce, 
and a pile of chicken parts on a tray beside the sink. 

What a mess! 

“Mom—we... we CLUUUCK BLUUUCK have to talk to you!” I 
sputtered. 

She turned, still talking, and waved. She said a few more words, then hung 
up the phone. “You two slept so late,” she said, frowning at the wall clock. “It’s 
nearly noon, and our guests will be here in an hour or two.” 

“Mom—” I started. 

She wiped her forehead with the back of her hand and moved toward the 
sink. “Did you forget we’re having a big barbecue this afternoon? We’re having 
at least twenty guests, and—and—” She gestured to the pile of chicken parts. 

The sight of them made my stomach turn. 

“Cluuucck bluuuck,” Cole murmured. 

I stepped over to the sink. “We have to talk to you,” I said, taking Mom’s 
arm. “Cole and I—we have a problem. Areal problem.” 

“About the chorus practice you missed this morning?” Mom interrupted. 
She took a small brush and began slapping barbecue sauce on the chicken parts. 
Then she tossed each part in a big china bowl. 

“No, Mom. I—” 

“That was Mrs. Mellon on the phone,” Mom continued. “She wondered 
where you were. She was calling to make sure you two were okay.” 

“We’re not okay,” I said solemnly. 

“She’s such a nice woman. She’s bringing two barbecued chickens of her 
own this afternoon. For people who don’t like them hot and spicy the way I 



make them.” 

She turned to me. “Crystal, you can help me cut up the peppers.” 

“Mom—please!” Cole cried. “Stop talking about the chickens!” 

“We have something to tell you,” I said. 

“Your dad is out back, getting the barbecue grills ready,” Mom said, 
brushing red sauce on a wing. “Oh! Ice! We have to remember to buy ice!” 

“Mom—Cole and I are turning into chickens,” I told her. 

She laughed. “Ice and paper plates,” she murmured. “I don’t want to use 
real plates. Too much of a mess.” 

“No. Really!” I grabbed her arm. The brush fell into the chicken bowl. 

“Crystal—I really don’t have time,” Mom sighed. She blew a strand of hair 
off her forehead and picked up the brush. “You and Cole should get yourself 
some breakfast—or lunch. Then see if you can help your dad.” 

“BLUUUUCK!” Cole exclaimed. 

“Listen to me, Mom,” I begged. “Do you hear Cole clucking like that?” 

“Yes. Very nice clucking,” she murmured, tossing a leg into the bowl. 

“Do you see my lips?” I demanded. “Vanessa is doing this to us. We 
bumped Vanessa and spilled her groceries. So she is turning us CLUUUUCK 
into chickens.” 

“Please, you two,” Mom groaned. “Can’t you see how frantic I am? I don’t 
have time to—” 

She stopped when she glimpsed my lips. “Yuck! Those are really chapped.” 

“They’re not chapped!” I screamed. “I’m growing a beak!” 

“CLUUUCK BLUUUCK,” Cole added. 

Mom tossed up her hands. “Go put some cream on your lips, Crystal. And 
keep out of my way, okay? I don’t have time for jokes today. If you’re not going 
to help, just don’t make more trouble.” 

I turned to Cole. He shook his head unhappily. 

We both slumped out of the room. “Do you think Dad will listen to us?” 
Cole asked weakly. 

I clicked my lips. “I don’t think so,” I muttered. “He’s as busy as Mom is.” 

“Then what can we do?” Cole asked. He scratched his neck. Were the 
feathers growing back already? 

An idea popped into my head. “Anthony!” I cried. 

“Huh? What about him?” Cole demanded. 

“Anthony was with us!” I explained. “The same thing is probably 



happening to him. He’s probably changing into a chicken like us.” 

Cole rubbed his chin hard. “Cluuuuck. Bluuuuck. Yeah. Probably.” 

“So if all three of us tell our story to Mom and Dad, then maybe they’ll 
believe us!” I cried. 

“It’s worth a try,” Cole agreed excitedly. “Let’s hurry over to Anthony’s 
house.” 

We each grabbed a glass of orange juice. And a Pop-Tart, which we ate raw. 
Then we ran out the front door and headed to Anthony’s house. 

We had run less than a block when we bumped into Vanessa. 



16 


Well. This time we didn’t really bump into her. 

I saw her before Cole did, hurrying toward us on the other side of the street. 
Despite the heat, she was dressed all in black. She wore a black cotton shawl 
over the shoulders of her black dress. It fluttered behind her as she strode along 
the sidewalk. 

“Oh—it’s her!” Cole whispered, poking me in the side. 

We both stopped in the middle of the sidewalk and stared open-mouthed as 
she approached. 

Would she say something to us? 

Could I work up the nerve to say something to her? 

My heart pounded. My lips clicked nervously. 

Cole’s head started bobbing up and down on his neck. Just like a chicken. 
He let out a frightened cluck. 

My poor brother. 

Seeing him like that made me forget my fear. “Vanessa—!” I shouted. 

She kept walking, taking those long, gliding strides of hers. Her shawl 
fluttered behind her. 

“Vanessa—!” I repeated her name. 

She had a look of solemn concentration on her face. I don’t think she had 
even seen Cole and me. 

Finally, she stopped. She stared across the street at us as if she didn’t 
recognize us. 

“BLUUUUCK BLUUUCK!” my brother clucked angrily. 

That brought a smile to her black-lipsticked lips. She laughed, and her dark 
eyes flashed. 

She brushed back her straight, black hair. “Bluck bluck to you, too!” she 
called. “Chicken chicken!” Then she turned and hurried along the sidewalk. 

“Bluuuck—wait!” Cole called after her. His head bobbed frantically up and 
down. 

“You have to help us!” I cried, my hard lips clicking. 

Vanessa began walking faster. Her black hair flew behind her. She didn’t 
look back. 



We found Anthony fiddling around with a golf club in his front yard. He had 
borrowed one of his dad’s putters. And he had scooped out a hole in the middle 
of the grass. 

We watched him sink a long putt as we ran across the front lawn. He 
flashed us two thumbs up. “Awesome, huh? I’ve been practicing.” 

“Awesome,” I muttered. I was still thinking about Vanessa, still feeling 
really upset and frightened. 

“Bluuck buuck,” Cole said. 

Anthony narrowed his eyes at him. “What’s up, guys? My parents are going 
to your barbecue. But I have soccer practice.” 

Anthony pulled the ball from the hole and carried it a few feet away. He set 
it down, then leaned over the putter and prepared to putt again. 

“Anthony, has anything weird been happening to you?” I blurted out. 

“Yeah,” Cole chimed in. “In the last two days—anything really weird?” 

Anthony swung the golf club. It made a solid thwock as the club hit the ball. 
The ball sailed across the grass and stopped a few inches from the hole. 

Anthony raised his eyes to us. “Yeah,” he replied. “Something weird has 
been happening. How did you know?” 

“Because BLUUUCK the same weird thing has been happening to us,” I 
told him. 

He stared hard at me. “Huh?” 

Cole and I nodded. 

Anthony made a face. He pretended to study his golf club. “You mean you 
suddenly started putting really well, too?” he asked. 

It was our turn to be surprised. “Putting? What does putting have to do with 
it?” I cried. 

“Well, that’s what’s so weird,” Anthony replied. “Before this weekend, I 
was a lousy putter. Really bad news. I couldn’t even play mini-golf!” 

“So what?” Cole chimed in. 

“So this weekend I’m really good at it,” Anthony continued. He twirled the 
club in his hand. “All of a sudden, I’m not a bad putter. Don’t you think that’s 
weird?” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

“What about growing feathers?” Cole demanded. “And what about your 


lips?” 



Anthony’s face filled with confusion. Then he turned to me. “What’s with 
your brother? Is he going totally mental or what?” 

“Are you clucking all the time?” Cole asked Anthony. 

Anthony laughed. He cut it short quickly. “I don’t get it. Is this a joke or 
something, guys?” 

I pulled my brother to the driveway. “He doesn’t know what we’re talking 
about,” I whispered. “For some reason, it isn’t happening to him.” 

Cole’s head bobbed up and down. He let out a low cluck. 

“Let’s go,” I said. “Anthony isn’t going to be any help.” 

“I don’t get the joke,” Anthony repeated. 

“See you BLUUUCK later!” I called to him. I started pulling Cole down the 
street. “We’ve got to help out with the barbecue.” 

“Maybe I can come after soccer practice,” Anthony called. “Save me some 
chicken!” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered unhappily. 

Guests were already arriving for the barbecue. I recognized my aunt Norma’s red 
Honda in the driveway. And I saw the Walker family from down the block, 
heading around the side of the house to the back. 

I ducked in through the front door and ran up to my room. I wanted to tell 
Mom what was happening to Cole and me. But I knew she was too busy. She 
wouldn’t listen. 

I closed the bedroom door carefully behind me. I didn’t want anyone to see 
me until I checked myself out. 

Sure enough, I found white and brown feathers sticking out from my neck 
and shoulders. 

The feathers had just poked through the skin. So it was really hard to pull 
them out. I had to use tweezers for the smaller ones. 

Pluck. 

Pluck. 

Pluck.... 

Ow. Did that hurt! 

I heard voices from down in the backyard. And through my bedroom 
window, I could see swirling smoke from the barbecue grills. 

Ugh. I had always loved the aroma of barbecuing chicken. But now it 
sickened me. I felt my stomach lurch. I gagged. I held my hand over my mouth 



—my beak!—and waited for the nausea to fade. 

I’ll stay up in my room, I decided. I won’t go downstairs. 

But then I heard Mom calling me from the kitchen. 

“Com-ing!” I yelled. I had no choice. I had to go down there. 

I crossed my fingers on both hands. My fingers suddenly felt so bony, so 
scraggly. My nails were long and pointed. Maybe no one will notice what is 
happening to me, I prayed. 

I made my way slowly downstairs to the kitchen. Mom had her hair tied up 
in a bun. She wore a long white apron, covered with barbecue sauce stains. 

She was mixing a big bowl of salad. But she stopped when I slipped into 
the room. “Crystal, where have you been? Guests are arriving. I need you to go 
out and be a hostess while I finish up in here.” 

“Okay, Mom. No problem,” I replied. I let out a couple of soft clucks. 

“See if there is enough ice,” Mom instructed. “And tell your dad he may 
need more charcoal. We—” 

She stopped suddenly, with a gasp. 

She stared out the window. “Crystal—what on earth is your brother doing 
out there?” 

I stepped up beside her and gazed out the window. “Oh, no!” I cried. 

I couldn’t believe what I saw. 



17 


Cole had climbed into the area fenced off for the chickens. He was down on his 
elbows and knees. There were chickens all around him. 

“What is he doing?” Mom repeated, raising a hand to one cheek. 

I knew what he was doing. But I knew this wasn’t the time to tell Mom. Not 
with twenty guests waiting for their dinner. 

I peered out the window. Cole was pecking seeds off the ground. 

I watched him lower his head to the gravel. I watched his lips open and his 
tongue slide out. I watched him suck up some chicken feed. His head bobbed up 
as he swallowed it down. 

“Why is your brother acting so dumb in front of company?” Mom asked, 
shaking her head. “Does he think that’s funny?” 

“I don’t know, Mom,” I replied. Cole’s head lowered, and he sucked up 
more seed from the gravel. 

People were laughing at him. Some just stared in confusion. 

“Well, go out there and stop him,” Mom ordered, turning back to the salad 
bowl. “Pull him away from the chickens and drag him into the house, Crystal. I 
want an explanation from him.” 

“Okay, Mom,” I murmured. 

I watched Cole pecking at seeds for a few seconds more. Then I made my 
way out the kitchen door and crossed the yard to the chicken area. 

“Cole?” I called softly. I stepped over the wire fence. “Cluuuck Cluuuck 
Cole?” 

I really did plan to bring him into the house to Mom. 

I really did plan to drag him away from there. 

But those seeds looked so delicious! 

I bumped some chickens out of the way. Then I dropped down on my 
knees, lowered my head—and started pecking away. 

The next day in school, I don’t think I heard a word anyone said. I couldn’t stop 
thinking about the barbecue. 

Of course, all of our guests thought what Cole and I did was some kind of a 
joke. They didn’t get the joke. But they knew it had to be a joke. 



Mom and Dad were really angry. They needed us to help out. But we were 
too busy pecking seeds with the chickens. 

Later, Mom was really upset when Cole and I refused to eat any of her 
barbecued chicken. “It was always your favorite!” she cried. 

Not anymore, I thought sadly. 

The idea of eating a chicken made my insides feel as if they were turning 
inside out! 

The next morning, I needed Cole’s help in pulling all the feathers from my 
neck and shoulders. Some big white feathers had poked out of my back, and I 
couldn’t reach them. 

It took us each twenty minutes to pluck out all the feathers that had grown 
during the night. We hid them in my sweater drawer. We didn’t want Mom or 
Dad to see them before we had a chance to explain. 

The school day went so slowly. My neck and back kept itching. I prayed 
that feathers wouldn’t grow while I was in school. 

And I prayed that none of my teachers would call on me in class. I was 
clucking more and more. It was becoming a real struggle to talk. 

My team had a basketball game in the gym after school against a girls’ team 
from the next county. I had looked forward to it all week. But now I just wanted 
to hurry home before any kids saw me clucking or pecking seeds from the 
playground. 

I dropped my books in my locker. And I was sneaking to the front door of 
the school—when Coach Clay turned the corner. “Crystal, I was looking for 
you!” she cried. 

“Cluck?” I replied. 

“Hilary has a bad cold. I’m going to let you start at forward today,” she told 
me. 

“Cluck—” I started. 

But she didn’t give me a chance to reply. She placed her hands on my 
shoulders, turned me around, and marched me to the locker room. “I know 
you’re going to be great,” she said. “Go get changed.” 

“Cluck,” I told her. Normally, I’d be totally pumped! I was going to be the 
starting forward. This is what I had dreamed about all year! 

As I changed into my uniform, the other girls all came over to slap me high 
fives and wish me good luck. 

Maybe I can do it, I told myself. Maybe I will play really well. Maybe I can 



show them just how good a player I am. 

But as soon as the game started, I knew I was in trouble. 
Big trouble. 



18 


Our team won the opening jump. I turned and began running to the other team’s 
basket. 

I leaned forward as I ran. My head bobbed up and down. 

Up and down. Up and down. 

Low clucks escaped my throat. 

I tried to straighten up. But I couldn’t. 

Our center took a shot. Missed. We all started to run back to the other 
basket. 

“Nooooo,” I moaned. 

To my horror, I realized that I couldn’t run without bobbing my head. 

I glanced to the sideline—and saw Coach Clay staring at me. “Crystal— 
what are you doing?” she called. 

I heard some kids laughing at me. 

“Crystal—stop goofing,” Gina, the other forward, scolded me. 

The action moved to our opponents’ basket, and I ran down court. My head 
bobbed up and down. I realized I was running stiff-legged. My knees no longer 
bent! 

The ball came sailing toward me. 

I couldn’t catch it. My hands were tucked under my armpits. My elbows 
were poked out like wings. 

I let out a loud cluck as the ball bounced off my shoulder. 

My head bobbed up and down. 

My teammates were yelling angrily at me. On the sideline, I saw Coach 
Clay shaking her head. Girls on the other team were laughing. 

Down the court. I tried to pry my hands from my armpits as I ran. My head 
bobbed. My lips clicked. 

I glanced down—and stopped. 

No! 

My legs. 

White feathers were sprouting up and down my legs. 

And everyone could see them. 



I heard a whistle blow. The referee called a time out. 

My teammates ran toward our bench. I took off in the other direction. I ran 
out of the gym and out of the school. 

I wanted to run and run and never stop. 

I hid in my room during dinner. I was so depressed—and frightened. I wanted to 
tell Mom and Dad everything. But what if they didn’t believe me? What if they 
thought it was all a joke? 

After dinner, Mom and Dad had to go to school for a Parents Association 
meeting. Cole and I waited until we heard the car pull away. Then we waddled 
downstairs to the living room. 

We were down on our knees, pecking crumbs in the rug. 

My body was covered with white and brown feathers. It would take hours 
to pull them all off. 

“I—CLUUUUCK—I’m so scared,” Cole stammered. 

“Me, too,” I confessed. I pecked at a big chunk of lint. 

“Crystal, what are we going to do?” Cole asked softly. 

I started to say, “I don’t know.” 

But I suddenly knew exactly what we had to do. 



19 


We crept out into a cool, windy night. The swirling wind ruffled my feathers. Up 
above, a pale half-moon kept sliding behind wispy clouds. 

Cole and I walked along the street that led to town. We tried to hurry. But 
our legs felt stiff, and our knees were hard to bend. 

Car headlights swept over the street toward us. We slipped behind a low 
hedge and hid, clucking softly. We didn’t want anyone to see us like this. And 
we didn’t want anyone to ask us where we were going. 

We passed through town, making our way along the backs of stores. Trees 
hissed and shook as the wind picked up. The air grew heavy and moist. I felt a 
few raindrops on my forehead. 

A sweet aroma made me take a deep breath. It came from the bakery. I 
realized that Mrs. Wagner must be baking doughnuts for tomorrow morning. 

A sad cry escaped my beak. Would I ever be able to taste a doughnut again? 
Or would I spend the rest of my life pecking my food off the ground? 

Cole and I turned onto the dirt path that led to Vanessa’s old farmhouse. 
The night grew darker—and colder—as soon as we moved away from town. 

Our shoes plodded heavily over the hard dirt path. A few minutes later, I 
could see the black outline of Vanessa’s house against the gray sky. 

“What are we CLUUUCK going to say to her?” Cole demanded softly. 

I brushed a raindrop off my eyebrow. My hand felt rough and scratchy, my 
fingers hard as bone. 

“I’m going to BLUUUCK tell her how sorry we are,” I replied. “I’m going 
to tell her we didn’t mean to knock over her groceries. That it was all a big 
accident. And we’re sorry we didn’t stay and help her pick them up. 
CLUUUUCK.” 

We stepped up to Vanessa’s wooden fence. The gate had been left open. It 
banged in the wind. 

I raised my eyes to the house. It hung over the tall grass like a low, dark 
creature. No lights on anywhere. 

Had she already gone to sleep? 

“I—I don’t bluuuck think she’s home,” Cole whispered. 

“Of course she’s home,” I replied sharply. “Where else would she cluuuuck 



be? There’s nowhere to go at night in Goshen Falls.” 

We stepped through the gate. I tried to latch it behind us to stop it from 
banging. But the latch was broken. 

“What do we say after we apologize?” Cole asked, hanging back. 

I placed a hand on his shoulder and guided him along with me to the front 

door. 

“Then we beg her to remove the spell,” I clucked. “We beg her to change us 
back to the way we were.” 

“Do you think she’ll do it?” he asked in a tiny voice. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “But we’ll soon find out.” 

I knocked on the front door. 



20 


No answer. 

The gate banged behind us. Startled, Cole and I both jumped. 

I took a deep breath and pounded my scraggly fist on the door again. 

We waited, staring straight ahead. Listening to the harsh whisper of the 
trees, and to the banging gate. 

Silence in the house. 

I uttered a sigh of disappointment and turned to my brother. “You were 
right. Vanessa isn’t home.” 

We backed away from the house. Clouds floated away from the moon. The 
front window glinted with silvery moonlight. 

“Let’s peek inside,” I urged. 

We made our way to the window. Standing on tiptoes, we peered into the 
living room. 

In the silvery light, I stared at the dark shapes of furniture. Old-fashioned, 
high-back chairs. A long couch covered with pillows. Bookshelves from floor to 
ceiling. 

Everything was very old-looking. But I didn’t see anything strange or 
frightening. 

Then a stack of books caught my eye. They were piled on a small, square 
table beside the couch. The books were big and thick. And even in the pale light, 
I could see that their covers were old and cracked. 

Squinting into the room, I spotted two more of them, lying open on the low 
coffee table in front of the couch. 

“Cole—” I whispered, my heart starting to pound. “See those old books? 
Do you think they are books about magic?” 

“Huh?” He pressed his face against the glass. “What do you mean?” 

“You know. Bluuuck. Books about magic spells. Sorcery books. They look 
like they could be old spell books—don’t they?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. Maybe.” 

I plucked a white feather from under his chin. 

“Owww!” he yelped. “Why’d you do that?” 

I shrugged. “Sorry. It was bothering me.” I turned my face back to the 



window and stared at the old books. 

“Let’s go,” Cole urged, tugging my arm. “She isn’t here.” 

“But those books are here,” I replied, tugging myself free. “And if they are 
spell books, maybe we could find the right book. You know. Bluuuuck. With the 
right spell. And we could change ourselves back to normal!” 

Cole rolled his eyes. He clicked his beak. “Yeah. Sure. Then maybe I’ll flap 
my arms and lay an egg!” 

“Don’t be sarcastic,” I scolded him. “It may be a bad idea. But at least it’s 
an idea.” 

I pulled him to the front door. I turned the knob—and pushed. 

The heavy door creaked open. 

“Bluuuuck. Let’s just take a quick peek at those books,” I told my brother, 
stepping into the cool darkness of the house. “What have we got to lose?” 

I pulled Cole into the front hall. The house smelled of coffee and peppery 
spices. Sort of a sweet-sharp aroma. 

I led the way into the living room. Silvery light flooded in through the front 
window. 

The floorboards groaned beneath my shoes. I stopped beside the couch and 
stared at the pile of old books. 

I reached out for the book on top of the stack—when a furious shriek made 
me stop. 

“Ohhh!” I pulled my hand back. 

“Vanessa—!” Cole cried. 



21 


My breath caught in my chest. My heart skipped a beat. 

I spun around—and saw Vanessa’s cat leap onto the high back of an old 
armchair. 

The cat’s eyes flashed, golden in the pale light. It bared its teeth again in 
another angry hiss. 

“I—I thought it was Vanessa,” Cole murmured in a choked voice. “That cat 
cluuuuck doesn’t want us here.” 

“Well, we’re not staying long,” I told the cat. I motioned for Cole to come 
over to the couch. “Help me check out these books. If we find the right one...” 

As Cole passed by the chair, the cat swiped its claws at him. 

“Hey—!” Cole ducked away from it. 

“Cats don’t like chickens,” I whispered. 

I picked up one of the open books on the coffee table. I raised it close to my 
face and tried to read the title in the dim light. 

The print was smudged. The heavy cover was cracked with age and covered 
in a layer of dust. “I can’t read it,” I told Cole. 

I saw him move to the wall. “I’ll turn on a light,” he suggested. 

The cat hissed again. 

“No—don’t!” I called. “No light. If Vanessa comes back, we don’t want her 
to see us.” 

I rubbed my finger over the title. And tried to focus on it. 

“Hey—I don’t believe it!” I cried happily. 

“What is it, Crystal?” Cole called. “Did you find—” 

Before I could answer, the ceiling light flashed on. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out when I saw Vanessa standing by the wall. 



22 


I stumbled back. 

The book dropped from my hand. It thudded heavily on the floor at my feet. 

“Vanessa, I—” 

I swallowed hard. 

And realized I was staring at a painting. A huge oil portrait of Vanessa, 
hanging on the wall. 

“Oh, wow!” I cried. “That painting—it’s almost life-sized. I thought—” 

I turned to Cole. He stood by the light switch, staring at the big portrait. 

“Did you click on the light?” I demanded. 

“Yes,” he replied. “Sorry. I didn’t mean to bluuuck bluuuck scare you. I 
thought it would help you read the book title.” 

The book title! 

“Cole—I think I found the right book!” I cried. “The very first book I 
picked up.” 

I bent down and excitedly lifted the old book from the floor. 

Yes! 

“Cole—look!” I exclaimed, holding up the front cover. “It’s called Chicken 
Chicken Chicken. This has to be it! If I can find the spell that Vanessa used 
inside this book—” 

“Then maybe we can reverse it!” Cole cried. 

A loud bang from the front of the house made us both jump. The black cat 
screeched and jumped off the chair back. It scurried silently from the room. 

“Was that the gate—or was it Vanessa?” I cried. 

Cole clicked off the light. We listened, frozen in place. I gripped the old 
book closely to my chest. 

Silence now. Then another bang. Just the fence gate in the wind. 

“Let’s get out of here,” I whispered, raising my eyes to the front door. 

“Bluuuuck,” Cole replied. He turned and began walking stiff-legged to the 
door. Even in the dim light, I could see that a thick tuft of feathers had grown on 
the back of his neck. 

Vanessa’s cat stood on the hallway floor, arching its back as if ready to 



attack. We edged past it carefully. 

“Nice kitty. Nice kitty,” I murmured. 

Its angry expression didn’t change. 

I pushed open the door. The gusting wind caught it and nearly blew the 
door handle out of my hand. Cole and I stepped outside. I tugged the door shut. 

I carried the heavy book against my chest as we made our way home. We 
leaned into the wind. My hair fluttered up behind me like a pennant. 

Goshen Falls stood in darkness. All of the stores close early. The only 
bright lights were at the self-serve gas station on the first corner. 

Cole and I half-walked, half-trotted down the center of the street. I couldn’t 
wait to get home and find the spell that Vanessa had used on us. 

Finally, our house rose into view. The driveway was still empty. Mom and 
Dad hadn’t returned yet from their meeting at school. 

Good! I thought. Maybe I can find the spell and change Cole and me back 
to normal before they get home. 

I led the way up the stairs to my room, still clutching the book to my chest. 
Cole closed the door behind us. 

I dropped onto the edge of my bed and spread the big book on my lap. Cole 
stood beside me, clucking softly. Staring down at me as I rapidly flipped through 
the old pages, squinting hard at the tiny type. 

“Well?” Cole demanded impatiently. “Is it in there? Is the spell in there?” 

I didn’t reply. I turned the pages furiously, my eyes running down each 
column. Faster. Faster. I turned page after page, my heart pounding. 

“Well?” my brother demanded. “Well?” 

I slammed the book shut in disgust. 

“Noooooo!” I wailed. I tossed the book onto the bed. 

“Cole,” I cried, shaking my head sadly, “we’ve made a horrible mistake.” 



23 


Cole uttered a squawk of horror. The white and brown feathers on the back of his 
neck stood up on end. 

“Crystal—what’s wrong?” he choked out. 

“It’s the wrong book!” I cried, jumping up from the bed. I left a pile of 
feathers where I’d been sitting. “It’s a cookbook! It’s a whole book of chicken 
recipes!” 

“Yuck!” Cole cried. 

The idea sent a wave of nausea up from my stomach. My arms suddenly 
itched. I gazed down and saw white feathers curling up from the skin. 

“We have to go back there,” I told my brother. My beak clicked loudly. It 
stretched out in front of my chin now. My teeth were sinking into my gums, 
about to disappear completely. I really had to struggle to form words. 

Cole swallowed hard. “Go back?” 

“Before it’s too late,” I whispered. “Before we’re completely chicken—not 
human at all.” 

He gulped and didn’t reply. 

I hoisted up the book and started waddling to the bedroom door. I stopped 
in shock when I glimpsed my reflection in the dresser mirror. 

My eyes! My head! 

My eyes had changed into small, round circles. And the shape of my head 
was changing, too. Growing narrow. My eyes were far apart now, moving to the 
sides of my head. 

“No! Oh, noooooo!” I opened my beak in a mournful wail. 

“Come on—let’s hurry!” Cole urged. He grabbed my hand. Feathers 
brushed feathers. The backs of our hands had sprouted a thick layer of short, 
white feathers. 

“Yes. Hurry!” I repeated, bobbing my head up and down. 

We made our way down the stairs and out the door. Back out into the dark, 
wind-swirled night. 

I had a strong urge to bend down and peck some gravel from the driveway. 
But I fought it off and trotted to the street. 

We had to hurry back there. Back to Vanessa’s house. 



Would we make it in time? 


The trip was normally a ten-minute walk. But it took Cole and me much longer. 
Partly because our chicken legs were so stiff. And partly because it’s a lot harder 
to see where you’re going when your eyes are on different sides of your head! 

The gusting winds softened a little as we finally reached Vanessa’s 
farmhouse. Pale moonlight cast shadows over the broken shingled roof. 

The windows were still dark. We leaned on the fence, catching our breath 
and studying the house. No sign that she had returned home. 

Clutching the heavy recipe book to my chest, I pushed past the gate and led 
the way to the front door. Once again, it opened easily. Cole and I stepped inside, 
inhaling the strange, spicy fragrance of the house. 

“Cluuuuck, Vanessa?” I called. “Hello? Anyone home?” 

A pair of yellow eyes glared at us from the banister. The black cat let out a 
yawn. Not at all surprised to see us back. And from the way it stared at us, not at 
all pleased to have its home invaded once again. 

“She isn’t here,” Cole whispered. “Let’s bluuuck bluuuck hurry.” 

I dropped the recipe book on the coffee table and turned to the stack of 
books beside the couch. As I turned, a bowl on the coffee table caught my 
attention. 

Sunflower seeds! 

I couldn’t resist. I poked my head into the bowl and began sucking the tasty 
seeds into my beak. 

“Crystal—what are you doing?” Cole cried in a hoarse whisper. “Get away 
from there!” 

He grabbed a book from the stack and began frantically pawing through it. I 
pecked up a few more seeds. Then I grabbed a book, too. 

Cole let out a triumphant squawk. “These books—they’re all magic books!” 
he declared. 

“You’re bluuuck right,” I agreed. “Hundreds and hundreds of magic spells.” 

Cole flipped rapidly through the pages of his book. His eyes were 
practically spinning! “How will we ever find the right one?” he demanded. 

“I think I just found it,” I told him. 

I carried the book to the window and held it up to the moonlight to see it 
better. 

Yes! 



“What does it say?” Cole asked excitedly. He dropped his book and came 
bobbing across the room to me. 

“It’s a whole cluuuuck page of chicken spells,” I replied, holding the book 
up to the window. “This one is called 'Human into Chicken’. That sounds right 
—doesn’t it?” 

“No. Find ‘Chicken into Human’!” Cole exclaimed. 

My eyes swept over the pages. “No such thing,” I told him. “We’ll just have 
to reverse the ‘Human into Chicken’ spell.” 

“Well, go ahead!” he cried, his feathery head bobbing up and down 
excitedly. “Reverse it! Do it! What do we have to do?” 

I saw that he was so excited, he couldn’t stand still. He tucked his hands 
under his armpits, stuck out his elbows to form wings—and began clucking 
round and round in a circle. 

“Cole—bluuuck bluuck bluuuck!” I scolded. 

He ignored me and kept clucking away. Flapping his arms and making a 
small circle over the floor. 

I turned back to the book and carefully read the spell. It didn’t look too 
hard. It didn’t call for any special ingredients. It was just a bunch of words that 
had to be said rapidly. And the spell caster had to cluck a lot and do a simple 
dance. 

Then, according to the book, you point at the poor victims and whisper, 
“Chicken chicken!” 

Just as Vanessa had done to us. 

“It looks pretty easy,” I told Cole. “Stop dancing around, and I’ll bluuuck 
try it.” 

He stopped his frantic flapping and circling. He turned to me. “Don’t forget 
to cluuuck bluuck,” he called. 

I knew what he meant. He was reminding me to do the spell backwards. 

Hmm... I glanced over the spell. That wasn’t going to be so easy. But I had 
no choice. I had to try it. 

Balancing the heavy, old book in one hand, I pointed to Cole, then to 
myself, with my free hand. “Chicken chicken,” I whispered. 

Okay. That was the very end of the spell. 

I lowered my eyes to the bottom of the page. And I started to read the 
words, going up: “Cluck cluck chick. Chick cluck cluck chick.” 

The spell instructed me to take three steps forward and two to the right. Sol 



took two steps to the left, then three steps back. 

I moved my scrawny chicken finger over the words, being careful to read 
them in reverse order: 

“Chick cluck chick cluck. Cluck cluck chick.” 

Then, following the instructions backwards, I took two giant steps, then 
three steps to the right. I flapped my arms and clucked four times. 

Then I read the first words of the spell at the top of the page: “Cluck cluck 
chick cluck. Cluck chick cluck.” 

That was it. 

That was the whole spell. I had done it completely backwards. 

Would it work? Would reversing Vanessa’s spell turn Cole and me back to 
normal? 

Would it do anything at all? 

Yes. 

Suddenly, I began to feel strange. My arms and legs began to itch like crazy. 
The feathers up and down my arms shot straight out. 

The book fell from my hand and thudded loudly to the floor. 

Egg-shaped spots sparkled in front of my eyes. 

When the spots faded, the room turned purple and started to tilt. 

“Hey—something is happening!” Cole cried in a tiny voice. He sounded 
far, far away. 

Yes, something is happening, I agreed, grabbing the window ledge to keep 
from falling. 

Something is happening. 

But what? 



24 


I felt so dizzy. The room rocked and swayed. 

The floor suddenly appeared so far away. I blinked. Once. Twice. 

The floor still seemed a mile below. 

“Cluck cluck, Cole—?” I turned to my brother. Then I let out a shrill 
squawk of horror. 

Now I knew why the floor seemed so far down. Cole and I had GROWN! 

We weren’t chickens anymore. We were BIIIIIG chickens! 

“I—I’m as big as a horse!” I cried. 

I gazed up. The ceiling was only an inch or two above my head. 

Cole uttered a startled moan. His whole body trembled. Enormous feathers 
shook free and fell to the floor. He flapped his arms, and more feathers tumbled 
off him. 

I saw Vanessa’s black cat back into the hallway. Its yellow eyes were wide 
with fear. It arched its back and raised its tail and hissed at us furiously. 

I took a step toward Cole. My big, feathery body bobbed in front of me. “I 
—I must have bluuuuuck done something wrong!” I told my brother. 

Cole hopped up and down, bobbing his head. He clicked his beak, but no 
sound came out. Finally, he choked out, “Crystal—try again.” 

Yes. He was right. I had to try to reverse the spell again. 

Maybe I couldn’t turn us back into humans. But I might be able to shrink us 
back to our normal size. 

I bent over to find the book on the floor. It was hard to find. I was so tall, 
the book looked about the size of a CD case! 

It wasn’t easy to pick it up, either. It kept sliding out from my scraggly 
chicken fingers. 

It seemed like hours before I managed to find the spell again. Then I raised 
the little book up close to my right eye and began to perform the spell backwards 
once again. 

Please, please, I prayed. Let me get it right this time. Please, let Vanessa’s 
spell reverse itself. 

I finished up with the final: “Cluck cluck chick cluck. Cluck chick cluck.” 

Would it work? 



I heard Cole let out a choked cluck from across the room. 

Once again, I began to feel weird. The egg-shaped spots sparkled in front of 
my eyes, blinding me with their brightness. 

I shut my eyes. 

I could feel the room tilting and swaying. 

I tried to grab hold of something. But my hands grasped only air. 

“Ooooh!” I let out a low moan as I felt myself start to fall. Yes. I was 
falling... falling... 

When I opened my eyes, I didn’t know where I was. The room had 
disappeared. I was surrounded by darkness. Surrounded by... 

Whoa! 

I gazed up at the book. The book of spells—it rested beside me on the floor. 
But it had grown! The book was taller than me! 

“Cheep cheep!” I cried. 

“Cheep cheep cheep,” I heard Cole’s tiny reply. 

I spun around to find him. “Cheep?” 

“Cheep cheep!” 

He was a little yellow chick! I swallowed hard. I knew what that meant. 
That meant that I was also a tiny yellow chick! 

I had reversed the spell—too much! 

I struggled to speak—but I could only make a tiny cheep cheep sound. My 
tiny feet clicked on the wooden floor. 

“Cheep cheep?” Cole asked. The poor little guy sounded so frightened. 

My tiny heart was pounding in my feathery yellow chest. I suddenly felt so 
angry. Why was this happening to us? Why did Vanessa think she had a right to 
do this to us? 

I pecked my little beak furiously against the floor. I had no other way of 
letting out my anger. 

But I didn’t have much time to be angry. 

A dark blur of motion made me raise my eyes. 

I saw the giant shadow. No. It was Vanessa’s cat. The cat perched on the 
desk next to an old-fashioned-looking typewriter. 

Its tail smacked the typewriter as the cat dropped to the floor. 

It crossed the room quickly, silently—and rose up over me, its eyes glowing 
with excitement. 

It pulled back its lips, revealing its enormous teeth. 



“Cheep cheep!” I squeaked. I froze in fear. 

The cat pounced. 

I felt its front paws wrap around my tiny, soft body. 
Then the paws began to squeeze. 



25 


I tried to kick. I tried to thrash my arms. Tried to wriggle free. 

But I was helpless against the giant cat. 

Its big paws squeezed me until I could barely breathe. 

Then it grabbed my head in its paws. 

And lifted me—up. Up. 

The cat dangled me in the air for a few seconds. 

I wanted to scream. 

I wanted to break free. 

But I was helpless. Too weak and tiny to do anything. 

The cat’s eyes flashed as it dangled me in front of its face. Then it opened 
its mouth wide—and stuffed me inside. 

Ohhhh. The cat’s hot breath roared over me. The inside of its mouth felt so 
hot, so disgustingly sticky and wet. 

“Cheep cheep cheeeep!” I squealed. 

The cat bounced me around on its tongue. 

And then—to my surprise—spit me out. 

I fell hard onto my side on the floor. Behind me, I could hear Cole cheeping 
weakly. 

I scrambled to my feet. I wanted to run. 

But the cat grabbed me again. Lifted me high off the floor in its rough 
paws. 

I saw the cat’s head, tilted at an angle. I saw a gleam of silvery drool on its 
fangs. Felt its hot, sour breath roll over me once again. 

The cat raised me high. Higher. 

Is it going to swallow me this time? I wondered. 

Is it going to shove me into its mouth and swallow me? 

No. The purring creature let me drop back to the floor. 

I landed on my back. My tiny feet clawed the air. 

Before I could scramble to my feet, the cat picked me up again—this time 
by the foot. It swung me from side to side in front of its open mouth. 

It’s playing with me, I realized. 



The cat is playing with its food! 

And when it’s finished playing... then it will eat me! 

I could hear Cole cheeping down on the floor. The cat held me in one paw, 
dangling me in front of its face. Then it began batting me with its other paw, 
making me spin. 

The spinning made me dizzy. I shut my eyes as the cat dropped me once 
again to the floor. 

I landed on my side and lay there. I felt so weak, so frightened. I didn’t 
even try to move. 

Panting hard, I waited for the cat to pounce again. Waited to feel its claws 
wrap around me. Waited to be lifted into the air again. 

Waited... 

When it didn’t pounce, I lifted my head. I struggled to focus. 

Where was it? 

I could hear my brother cheeping in terror somewhere across the floor. 

I climbed slowly to my feet. I ruffled my feathers, which were wet and 
sticky from being inside the cat’s mouth. 

Where was the cat? Why did it stop torturing me? 

The lights flashed on. 

“Eeeeep!” I uttered a shrill shriek as a big face lowered itself toward me. 

Vanessa! 

“Well, well!” her voice boomed in my tiny ears. “What have we here?” 

Her hand swooped down and grabbed me off the floor. 



26 


She swooped me up, then picked up Cole, too. She perched us in the palm of her 
hand and held us close to her pale face. A pleased smile spread across her black- 
lipsticked lips. 

“I see you found my spell book, little duckies,” she teased. “Let me guess. 
You must be Crystal and Cole.” 

Cole and I cheeped loudly and hopped up and down in protest. 

Vanessa laughed. “You’re both so cute!” she exclaimed. “What a shame I 
had to teach you a lesson.” She tsk-tsked. 

“Cheep cheep!” I squeaked. 

I wanted to ask why she had done this to Cole and me. I wanted to promise 
her that no matter what it was we had done—we’d never do it again. I wanted to 
demand that she change us back—now. 

But all I could do was cheep ! 

“What should I do with you two?” Vanessa asked, her dark eyes flashing. 
“Should I send you back out? It’s a long way to your house from here. You’d 
probably be eaten before you got there.” 

“Cheeeeep!” Cole and I pleaded. 

How could we communicate with her? How could we talk to her? How? 

I suddenly had an idea. 

The old typewriter on the desk. Vanessa was holding Cole and me right 
above it. 

I glanced down. A sheet of white paper lay curled in the typewriter. Yes! I 
thought. Yes! Our only chance. 

I didn’t take another second to think about it. 

I leaped from Vanessa’s palm. And landed with a hard plop on the desktop. 

“Hey, chickie—!” I heard Vanessa’s startled cry. She lowered her hand to 
pick me up again. 

But I jumped onto the typewriter keys. Lowered my head. And began 
pecking away with my hard little beak. 

I pecked a V Then I hopped up to the left and pecked an A. As Vanessa’s 
hand swooped to grab me, I slid back down to the bottom row and pecked an N. 

Vanessa’s hand stopped inches above me. Could she see what I was doing? 



Did she figure out that I was typing her a message? 

The E was nearly at the top of the keyboard. I stumbled on the keys and 
nearly typed the wrong letter. But I hit the E, then backed up a step and pecked 
two S’s. 

I glanced up. Yes! She was watching. She had Cole resting in her palm. She 
leaned over the desk, and her dark eyes stared down at the sheet of paper. 

I was gasping for breath by the time I finished. My little heart was 
pounding. It was such hard work! But I typed the whole message: 

VANESSA, WE’RE REALLY SORRY. WE DIDN’T MEAN TO SPILL 
YOUR GROCERIES. WE CAME TO APOLOGIZE. 

I dropped weakly onto the desktop. So exhausted, I could barely move. 

I turned and raised my eyes to Vanessa. 

Would she help us? Would she accept our apology? Would she change us 
back to normal? 

Vanessa brought her face down close to me. “Your apology is a little too 
late,” she said coldly. “There’s nothing I can do.” 



27 


Cole uttered a pitiful “Cheep.” 

I raised myself up with a sigh. Then I stumbled back wearily onto the 
typewriter keys. 

PLEAS, I pecked out. 

I was so tired, I didn’t have the strength to push down the E at the end. 

I gazed up hopefully at Vanessa. She stared down at the word I had typed. 
She tapped her chin with her black fingernails. 

“Well...” she said finally. “I like the way you say ‘please’.” She lifted me 
up gently and set me down in her palm beside Cole. 

“Politeness is so important,” Vanessa said, holding us up to her face. 
“Especially for young people. That’s what I care about more than anything else 
in the world. Good manners.” 

Her dark eyes narrowed at us. “That day in front of the grocery,” she 
scolded, “you didn’t apologize for crashing into me. So I had no choice. I had to 
punish you.” She studied us, tsk-tsking. 

So that’s why Anthony wasn’t turned into a chicken, too! I realized. Before 
he ran away, Anthony had called out to Vanessa that he was sorry. 

If only Cole and I had apologized then! We wouldn’t be peeping little 
chicks today. 

But how were we to know that Vanessa was such a manners freak? 

She carried us over to a tall bookshelf and held us close to the books. “Do 
you see my collection?” she asked. “All etiquette books. Dozens and dozens of 
manners books. I have dedicated my life to manners.” 

She gazed at us sternly. “If only kids today weren’t so rude. I wish I could 
help you two. I really do. But your apology came too late. Far too late.” 

She set us both down on the desk. I guess her hand was getting tired. She 
mbbed it tenderly with her other hand. 

Now what? I wondered. 

Was she going to send us home like this? Vanessa was right. Cole and I 
would never make it. Some dog or cat or raccoon would turn us into dinner 
before we went a block or two. 

I cheeped in panic. My tiny feathers stood straight up. What could we do? 



I had one last, desperate idea. 

One more time, I climbed onto the typewriter keyboard. And I began to 
type... 

THANK YOU FOR EXPLAINING TO US. AND THANK YOU FOR 
TRYING TO TEACH US TO BE POLITE. YOURS TRULY, COLE AND 
CRYSTAL 

I said it was a desperate idea. About as desperate as a chicken can get. But I 
stared up at Vanessa, watching her read it. Hoping... hoping... 

“I don’t believe it!” Vanessa exclaimed. She tore the sheet of paper from the 
typewriter and read it again. “A thank-you note!” she cried. “You wrote me a 
thank-you note!” 

She gazed down at Cole and me with a broad smile. “No kids today ever 
write thank-you notes!” she cried. “This is the politest thing I ever saw!” 

She danced around with it. “A thank-you note! An actual thank-you note!” 

And then she turned. Pointed a finger at Cole, then at me. Mumbled some 
words. And pointed again. 

“Whooooa!” I cried, feeling my body grow. I felt like a balloon inflating. 
The little yellow feathers fell away. My hair grew back. My arms... my hands! 

“YAAAAAY!” I cried. Cole joined my happy cheer. 

We were back! Vanessa had changed us back—to us\ 

We pinched each other, just to make sure. Then we tossed back our heads 
and laughed. We were so happy! 

Vanessa laughed, too. We all laughed gleefully together. 

Then Vanessa turned and started toward the kitchen. “Let me get you both a 
drink,” she offered. “I know how thirsty these spells can make a person.” 

“Thank you!” I cried, remembering how important politeness was to 
Vanessa. 

“Yes—thank you!” Cole added loudly. 

We grinned at each other. We pinched each other again. Skin! Real skin— 
with no feathers! 

I moved my lips. I licked them with my tongue. Soft, human lips that didn’t 
click. 

Vanessa returned with two glasses of soda. “I know kids like cola,” she 
said. She handed a glass to me and a glass to Cole. “Drink up,” she urged. 
“You’ve been through a lot.” 

I did feel terribly thirsty. I took a few long sips of the cola. It felt cold and 



tingly on my tongue. Wonderful! Better than seeds off the carpet. 

Wow. I was so happy to be me again. 

I raised my eyes and saw Cole tilt his glass to his mouth and drink the soda 
down. He was really thirsty! 

When he finished, he lowered his glass—and let out the loudest burp I ever 
heard! 

Cole burst out laughing. 

I couldn’t help myself. 

It was such a funny burp, I started laughing, too. 

I was still laughing when Vanessa stepped in front of me. 

What is her problem? I wondered. 

Then she pointed her finger, first at Cole, then at me. And whispered, “Pig 

Pig-” 




DON’T GO TO 
SLEEP! 

Goosebumps - 54 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Klonk! “Ow! The Klingon got me!” 

I rubbed my head and kicked my life-sized photo of a Klingon—one of 
those warlike aliens on Star Trek —out of the way. I’d been reaching for one of 
my favorite books, Ant Attack on Pluto, when the big hunk of cardboard fell off 
the top shelf and klonked me on the head. 

I kicked the Klingon again. “Take that, you evil piece of cardboard!” 

I was fed up. My stuff kept attacking me. 

My room was packed with junk. Things were always leaping off the walls 
and whacking me on the head. This wasn’t the first time. 

“Uhn!” I gave the Klingon another kick for good measure. 

“Matthew Amsterdam, twelve-year-old geek.” My older brother, Greg, 
stood in my bedroom doorway, murmuring into a tape recorder. 

“Get out of my room!” I grumbled. 

Greg totally ignored me. He always does. 

“Matt is skinny, small for his age, with a round, piglike baby face,” he said. 
He was still talking into the tape recorder. 

“Matt’s hair is so blond that, from a distance, he almost looks bald.” Greg 
spoke in a deep, fake voice. He was trying to sound like the guy who describes 
animals on those nature shows. 

“At least I don’t have a Brillo pad sitting on my head,” I cracked. 

Greg and my sister, Pam, both have wiry brown hair. Mine is white-blond 
and really thin. Mom says my dad had the same hair as me. But I don’t 
remember him. He died when I was a baby. 

Greg smirked at me and went on in that Wild Kingdom voice. “Matt’s 
natural habitat is a small bedroom filled with science-fiction books, models of 
alien spacecraft, comic books, dirty socks, rotten pizza crusts, and other 
geekazoid stuff. How can Matt stand it? Scientists are puzzled by this. 
Remember, geeks have always been a mystery to normal humans.” 

“I’d rather be a geek than a nerd like you,” I said. 

“You’re not smart enough to be a nerd,” he shot back in his regular voice. 

My sister, Pam, appeared beside him in the doorway. “What’s happening 
here in Geek World?” she asked. “Did the mother ship finally come for you, 



Matt?” 

I threw Ant Attack on Pluto at her. 

Pam is in tenth grade. Greg is in eleventh. They gang up on me all the time. 

Greg spoke into his tape recorder again. “When threatened, the geek will 
attack. However, he is about as dangerous as a bowl of mashed potatoes.” 

“Get out!” I yelled. I tried to close the door, but they blocked it. 

“I can’t leave,” Greg protested. “I have a school project. I have to watch 
everybody in the family and write a paper about how they act. It’s for social 
studies.” 

“Go watch Pam pick her nose,” I snapped. 

Pam knocked Greg aside and pushed her way into the room. She grabbed 
me by the neck of my Star Trek T-shirt. 

“Take that back!” she ordered. 

“Let go!” I cried. “You’re stretching out my shirt!” 

“Matthew is very touchy about his geek clothes,” Greg mumbled into the 
recorder. 

“I said, take that back!” Pam shook me. “Or I’ll sic Biggie on you!” 

Biggie is our dog. He’s not big—he’s a dachshund. But he hates me for 
some reason. 

With everybody else—even total strangers—he wags his tail, licks their 
hands, the whole bit. With me, he growls and snaps. 

Once Biggie sneaked into my room and bit me in my sleep. I’m a heavy 
sleeper—it takes a lot to wake me up. But believe me, when a dog bites you, you 
wake up. 

“Here, Biggie!” Pam called. 

“Okay!” I cried. “I take it back.” 

“Good answer,” Pam said. “You win the noogie prize!” She started 
knocking me on the head. 

“Ow! Ow!” I gasped. 

“The geek’s sister gives him noogies to the head,” Greg commented. “Geek 
says, 'Ow’.” 

Finally Pam let me go. I stumbled and collapsed on my bed. The bed 
knocked against the wall. A pile of books rained down on me from the shelf over 
my head. 

“Give me that tape recorder for a second,” Pam said to Greg. She snatched 
it from him and yelled into the microphone. “The geek is down! Thanks to me, 



Pamela Amsterdam, the world is safe for cool people again! Woo! Woo! Woo!” 

I hate my life. 

Pam and Greg use me as their human punching bag. Maybe if Mom were 
around more, she’d be able to stop them. 

But she is hardly ever around. She works two jobs. Her day job is teaching 
people how to use computers. And her night job is typing at a law firm. 

Pam and Greg are supposed to be taking care of me. They take care of me, 
all right. 

They make sure I’m miserable twenty-four hours a day. 

“This room stinks,” Pam groaned. “Let’s get out of here, Greg.” 

They slammed the door behind them. My model space shuttle fell off the 
dresser and crashed to the floor. 

At least they left me alone. I didn’t care what mean things they said, as long 
as they went away. 

I settled on my bed to read Ant Attack on Pluto. I’d much rather be on the 
planet Pluto than in my own house—even with giant ants shooting spit rays at 
me. 

My bed felt lumpy. I shoved a bunch of books and clothes to the floor. 

I had the smallest bedroom in the house—of course. I always got the worst 
of everything. Even the guest room was bigger than my room. 

I didn’t understand it. I needed a big room more than anybody! I had so 
many books, posters, models, and other junk that there was barely room for me 
to sleep. 

I opened my book and started reading. I came to a really scary part. Justin 
Case, a human space traveler, was captured by the evil ant emperor. The ant 
emperor closed in on him, closer, closer... 

I shut my eyes for a second—just a second—but I guess I fell asleep. 
Suddenly I felt the ant emperor’s hot, stinking breath on my face! 

Ugh! It smelled exactly like dog food. Then I heard growling. I opened my 

eyes. 

It was worse than I thought. Worse than an ant emperor. It was Biggie— 
ready to spring! 



2 


“Biggie!” I screamed. “Get off me!” 

Snap! He attacked me with his gaping dachshund jaws. 

I dodged him—he missed me. I shoved him off the bed. 

He snarled at me and tried to jump back up. He was too short. He couldn’t 
reach the bed without taking a running leap. 

I stood on the bed. Biggie snapped at my feet. “Help!” I yelled. 

That’s when I saw Pam and Greg in the doorway, laughing their heads off. 

Biggie backed up to take his running jump. “Help me, you guys!” I begged. 

“Yeah, right,” Pam said. Greg doubled over laughing. 

“Come on,” I whined. “I can’t get down! He’ll bite me!” 

Greg gasped for breath. “Why do you think we put him on your bed in the 
first place? Ha-ha-ha-ha!” 

“You shouldn’t sleep so much, Matt,” Greg said. “We thought we had to 
wake you up.” 

“Besides, we were bored,” Pam added. “We wanted to have some fun.” 

Biggie galloped across the room and leaped onto the bed. As he jumped up, 
I jumped down. I scurried across the floor—slipping on comic books as I ran. 

Biggie raced after me. I ducked into the hallway and slammed the door just 
before he got out. 

Biggie barked like crazy. 

“Let him out, Matt!” Pam scolded me. “How can you be so mean to poor, 
sweet Biggie?” 

“Leave me alone!” I shouted. I ran downstairs to the living room. I plopped 
myself on the couch and flicked on the TV. I didn’t bother to surf—I always 
watch the same channel. The Sci-Fi channel. 

I heard Biggie bounding down the steps. I tensed, waiting for him to attack. 
But he waddled into the kitchen. 

Probably going to eat some disgusting doggie treats, I thought. The fat little 
monster. 

The front door opened. Mom came in, balancing a couple of bags of 
groceries. 



“Hi, Mom!” I cried. I was glad she was home. Pam and Greg cooled it a 
little when she was around. 

“Hi, honey.” She carried the bags into the kitchen. “There’s my little 
Biggie!” she cooed. “How’s my sweet little pup?” 

Everybody loves Biggie except for me. 

“Greg!” Mom called. “It’s your turn to make dinner tonight!” 

“I can’t!” Greg yelled from upstairs. “Mom—I’ve got so much homework 
to do! I can’t fix dinner tonight.” 

Sure. He was so busy doing his homework, he couldn’t stop driving me 
crazy. 

“Make Matt do it,” Pam shouted. “He’s not doing anything. He’s just 
watching TV.” 

“I have homework too, you know,” I protested. 

Greg came down the steps. “Right,” he said. “Seventh-grade homework is 
so tough.” 

“I’ll bet you didn’t think it was easy when you were in seventh grade.” 

“Boys, please don’t fight,” Mom said. “I’ve only got a couple of hours 
before I have to go back to work. Matt, start dinner. I’m going to go upstairs and 
lie down for a few minutes.” 

I stormed into the kitchen. “Mom! It’s not my turn!” 

“Greg will cook another night,” Mom promised. 

“What about Pam?” 

“Matt—that’s enough. You’re cooking. That’s final.” She dragged herself 
upstairs to her bedroom. 

“Rats!” I muttered. I opened a cabinet door and slammed it shut. “I never 
get my way around here!” 

“What are you making for dinner, Matt?” Greg asked. “Geek burgers?” 

“Matthew Amsterdam chews with his mouth open.” Greg was talking into his 
stupid tape recorder again. We were all in the kitchen, eating dinner. 

“Tonight the Amsterdams have tuna casserole for dinner,” he said. “Matt 
defrosted it. He left it in the oven too long. The noodles on the bottom are 
burned.” 

“Shut up,” I muttered. 

Nobody said anything for a few minutes. The only sounds were forks 
clicking against plates and Biggie’s toenails on the kitchen floor. 



“How was school today, kids?” Mom asked. 

“Mrs. Amsterdam asks her children about their day,” Greg said to the tape 
recorder. 

“Greg, do you have to do that at the dinner table?” Mom sighed. 

“Mrs. Amsterdam complains about her son Greg’s behavior,” Greg 
murmured. 

“Greg!” 

“Greg’s mother’s voice gets louder. Could she be angry?” 

“GREG!” 

“I have to do it, Mom,” Greg insisted in his normal voice. “It’s for school!” 

“It’s getting on my nerves,” Mom said. 

“Mine too,” I chimed in. 

“Who asked you, Matt?” Greg snapped. 

“So cut it out until after dinner, okay?” Mom asked. 

Greg didn’t say anything. But he set the tape recorder on the table and 
started to eat. 

Pam said, “Mom, can I put my winter clothes in the closet in the guest 
room? My closet is packed.” 

“I’ll think about it,” Mom said. 

“Hey!” I cried. “She has a huge closet! Her closet is almost as big as my 
whole room!” 

“So?” Pam sneered. 

“My room is the smallest one in the house!” I protested. “I can hardly walk 
through it.” 

“That’s because you’re a slob,” Pam cracked. 

“I’m not a slob! I’m neat! But I need a bigger bedroom. Mom, can I move 
into the guest room?” 

Mom shook her head. “No.” 

“But why not?” 

“I want to keep that room nice for guests,” Mom explained. 

“What guests?” I cried. “We never have any guests!” 

“Your grandparents come every Christmas.” 

“That’s once a year. Grandma and Grandpa won’t mind sleeping in my little 
room once a year. The rest of the time they’ve got a whole house to themselves!” 

“Your room is too small to sleep two people,” Mom said. “I’m sorry, Matt. 
You can’t have the guest room.” 



“Mom!” 

“What do you care where you sleep, anyway?” Pam said. “You are the best 
sleeper in the world. You could sleep through a hurricane! ” 

Greg picked up the tape recorder. “When Matt isn’t propped up in front of 
the TV, he is usually sleeping. He is asleep more than he’s awake.” 

“Mom, Greg talked into the tape recorder again,” I tattled. 

“I know,” Mom said wearily. “Greg, put it down.” 

“Mom, please let me switch rooms. I need a bigger room! I don’t just sleep 
in my room—I live there! I need a place to get away from Pam and Greg. Mom 
—you don’t know what it’s like when you’re not here! They’re so mean to me!” 

“Matt, stop it,” Mom replied. “You have a wonderful brother and sister, and 
they take good care of you. You should appreciate them.” 

“I hate them!” 

“Matt! I’ve had enough of this! Go to your room!” 

“There’s no room for me in there!” I cried. 

“Now!” 

As I ran upstairs to my room, I heard Greg say in his tape recorder voice, 
“Matt has been punished. His crime? Being a geek.” 

I slammed the door, stuffed my face in a pillow, and screamed. 

I spent the rest of the evening in my room. 

“It’s not fair!” I muttered to myself. “Pam and Greg get whatever they want 
—and I get punished!” 

Nobody is using the guest room, I thought. I don’t care what Mom says. I’m 
sleeping there from now on. 

Mom left for her night job. I waited until I heard Pam and Greg turn out the 
lights and go to their rooms. Then I slipped out of my room and into the guest 
room. 

I was going to sleep in that guest room. And nothing was going to stop me. 

I didn’t think it was that big a deal. What was the worst thing that could 
happen? Mom might get mad at me. So what? 

I had no idea that when I woke up in the morning, my life would be a 
complete disaster. 



3 


My feet were cold. That was the first thing I noticed when I woke up. 

They were sticking out from under the covers. I sat up and tossed the 
blanket down over them. 

Then I pulled the blanket back up. Were those my feet? 

They were huge. Not monster huge, but huge for me. Way bigger than 
they’d been the day before. 

Man, I thought. I’d heard about growth spurts. I knew kids grew fast at my 
age. But this was ridiculous! 

I crept out of the guest room. I could hear Mom and Pam and Greg 
downstairs, eating breakfast. 

Oh, no, I thought. I slept late. I hope no one noticed that I didn’t sleep in my 
room last night. 

I went to the bathroom to brush my teeth. Everything felt a little weird. 

When I touched the bathroom doorknob, it seemed to be in the wrong place. 
As if someone had lowered it during the night. The ceiling felt lower too. 

I turned on the light and glanced in the mirror. 

Was that me? 

I couldn’t stop staring at myself. I looked like myself—and I didn’t. 

My face wasn’t so round. I touched my upper lip. It was covered with blond 
fuzz. And I was about six inches taller than I’d been the day before! 

I—I was older. I looked about sixteen years old! 

No, no, I thought. This can’t be right. I’ve got to be imagining this. 

I’ll just close my eyes for a minute. When I open them, I’ll be twelve again. 

I squeezed my eyes shut. I counted to ten. 

I opened my eyes. 

Nothing had changed. 

I was a teenager! 

My heart began to pound. I’d read that old story about Rip Van Winkle. He 
goes to sleep for a hundred years. When he wakes up, everything is different. 

Did that happen to me? I wondered. Did I just sleep for four years straight? 

I hurried downstairs to find Mom. She’d tell me what was going on. 



I raced downstairs in my pajamas. I wasn’t used to having such big feet. On 
the third step, I tripped over my left foot. 

“Noooo!” 

THUD! 

I rolled the rest of the way down. 

I landed on my face in front of the kitchen. Greg and Pam cracked up—of 
course. 

“Nice one, Matt!” Greg said. “Ten points!” 

I dragged myself to my feet. I had no time for Greg’s jokes. I had to talk to 
Mom. 

She sat at the kitchen table, eating eggs. 

“Mom!” I cried. “Look at me!” 

She looked at me. “I see you. You’re not dressed yet. You’d better hurry or 
you’ll be late for school.” 

“But, Mom!” I insisted. “I’m—I’m a teenager!” 

“I’m all too aware of that,” Mom said. “Now hurry up. I’m leaving in 
fifteen minutes.” 

“Yeah, hurry up, Matt,” Pam piped up. “You’ll make us late for school.” 

I turned to snap back at her—but stopped. She and Greg sat at the table, 
munching cereal. 

Nothing weird about that, right? 

The only thing was, they looked different too. If I was sixteen, Pam and 
Greg should have been nineteen and twenty. 

But they weren’t. They weren’t even fifteen and sixteen. 

They looked eleven and twelve! 

They’d gotten younger! 

“This is impossible!” I screeched. 

“This is impossible!” Greg echoed, making fun of me. 

Pam started giggling. 

“Mom—listen to me!” I cried. “Something weird is going on. Yesterday I 
was twelve—and today I’m sixteen!” 

“You’re the weirdo!” Greg joked. He and Pam were cracking up. They were 
just as obnoxious now as they were when they were older. 

Mom was only half-listening to me. I shook her arm to get her attention. 

“Mom! Pam and Greg are my older brother and sister! But now suddenly 
they’re younger! Don’t you remember? Greg is the oldest!” 



“Matt has gone cuckoo!” Greg cracked. “Cuckoo! Cuckoo!” 

Pam fell on the floor laughing. 

Mom stood up and set her plate in the sink. “Matt, I don’t have time for 
this. Go upstairs and get dressed right now.” 

“But, Mom—” 

“Now!” 

What could I do? Nobody would listen to me. They all acted as if 
everything was normal. 

I went upstairs and got dressed for school. I couldn’t find my old clothes. 
My drawers were full of clothes I’d never seen before. They all fit my new, 
bigger body. 

Could this be some kind of joke? I wondered as I laced up my size-ten 
sneakers. 

Greg must be playing some crazy trick on me. 

But how? How could Greg get me to grow—and get himself to shrink? 

Even Greg couldn’t do that. 

Then Biggie trotted in. 

“Oh, no,” I cried. “Stay away, Biggie. Stay away!” 

Biggie didn’t listen. He ran right up to me—and licked me on the leg. 

He didn’t growl. He didn’t bite. He wagged his tail. 

That’s it! I realized. Everything has really gone crazy. 

“Matt! We’re leaving!” Mom called. 

I hurried downstairs and out the front door. Everybody else was already in 
the car. 

Mom drove us to school. She pulled up in front of my school, Madison 
Middle School. I started to get out of the car. 

“Matt!” Mom scolded. “Where are you going? Get back in here!” 

“I’m going to school!” I explained. “I thought you wanted me to go to 
school!” 

“Bye, Mom!” Pam chirped. She and Greg kissed Mom good-bye and 
hopped out of the car. 

They ran into the school building. 

“Stop fooling around, Matt,” Mom said. “I’m going to be late for work.” 

I got back into the car. Mom drove another couple of miles. She stopped... 
in front of the high school. 

“Here you are, Matt,” Mom said. 



I gulped. High school! 

“But I’m not ready for high school!” I protested. 

“What is your problem today?” Mom snapped. She reached across the front 
seat and opened my door. “Get going!” 

I had to get out. I had no choice. 

“Have a good day!” she called as she pulled away. 

One look at that school and I knew—I was not going to have a good day. 



4 


A bell rang. Big, scary-looking kids poured into the school building. 

“Come on, kid. Let’s move it.” A teacher pushed me toward the door. 

My stomach lurched. This was like the first day of school—times ten! 
Times a zillion! 

I wanted to scream: I can’t go to high school! I’m only in the seventh grade! 

I wandered through the halls with hundreds of other kids. Where do I go? I 
wondered. I don’t even know what class I’m in! 

A big guy wearing a football jacket marched up to me and stuck his face in 
my face. 

“Um, hello,” I said. Who was this guy? 

He didn’t move. He didn’t say a word. He just stood there, nose to nose 
with me. 

“Um, listen,” I began. “I don’t know what class to go to. Do you know 
where they keep the kids who are about—you know—my age?” 

The big—very, very big—guy opened his mouth. 

“You little creep,” he muttered. “I’m going to get you for what you did to 
me yesterday.” 

“Me?” My heart fluttered. What was he talking about? “I did something to 
you? I don’t think so. I didn’t do anything to you! I wasn’t even here yesterday!” 

He laid his huge paws on my shoulders—and squeezed. 

“Ow!” I cried. 

“Today, after school,” he said slowly, “you’re going to get it.” 

He let me go and walked slowly down the hall as if he owned the place. 

I was so scared, I dove into the first classroom I came to. 

I sat in the back. A tall woman with dark, curly hair stepped in front of the 
blackboard. 

“All right, people!” she yelled. Everybody quieted down. “Open your books 
to page one fifty-seven.” 

What class is this? I wondered. I watched as the girl next to me pulled a 
textbook out of her bag. I looked at the cover. 

No. Oh, no. 



It couldn’t be. 

The title of the book was Advanced Math: Calculus. 

Calculus! I’d never even heard of that! 

I was bad at math—even seventh-grade math. How could I do calculus? 

The teacher spotted me and narrowed her eyes. 

“Matt? Are you supposed to be in this class?” 

“No!” I cried, jumping up from my seat. “I’m not supposed to be in this 
class, that’s for sure!” 

The teacher added, “You’re in my two-thirty class, Matt. Unless you need 
to switch?” 

“No, no! That’s okay.” I started backing out of the room. “I got mixed up, 
that’s all!” 

I hurried out of there as fast as I could. Close one, I thought. I won’t be 
back at two-thirty, either. 

I think I’ll cut math class today. 

Now what do I do? I wondered. I wandered down the hall. Another bell 
rang. Another teacher—a short, dumpy man with glasses—stepped into the 
hallway to close his classroom door. He spotted me. 

“You’re late again, Amsterdam,” he barked at me. “Come on, come on.” 

I hurried into the classroom. I hoped this class would be something I could 
handle. Like maybe an English class where you read comic books. 

No such luck. 

It was an English class, all right. 

But we weren’t reading comic books. We were reading a book called Anna 
Karenina. 

First of all, this book is about ten thousand pages long. Second, everybody 
else had read it, and I hadn’t. Third, even if I tried to read it, I wouldn’t 
understand what was going on in a million years. 

“Since you were the last one to class, Amsterdam,” the teacher said, “you’ll 
be the first to read. Start on page forty-seven.” 

I sat down at a desk and fumbled around. “Um, sir”—I didn’t know the 
guy’s name—“um—I don’t have the book with me.” 

“No, of course you don’t,” the teacher sighed. “Robertson, would you 
please lend Amsterdam your book?” 

Robertson turned out to be the girl sitting next to me. What was with this 
teacher, anyway? Calling everybody by their last names. 



The girl passed her book to me. “Thanks, Robertson,” I said. She scowled 
at me. 

I guess she didn’t like being called Robertson. But I didn’t know her first 
name. I’d never seen her before in my life. 

“Page forty-seven, Amsterdam,” the teacher repeated. 

I opened the book to page forty-seven. I scanned the page and took a deep 
breath. 

That page was covered with big words. Hard words. Words I didn’t know. 

And then long Russian names. 

I’m about to make a big fool of myself, I realized. 

Just take it one sentence at a time, I told myself. 

The trouble was, those sentences were long. One sentence took up the 
whole page! 

“Are you going to read or aren’t you?” the teacher demanded. 

I took a deep breath and read the first sentence. 

“The young Princess Kitty Shcherb—Sherba—Sherbet—’” 

Robertson snickered. 

“Shckerbatskaya,” the teacher corrected. “Not Sherbet. We’ve been over all 
these names, Amsterdam. You should know them by now.” 

Shckerbatskaya? Even after the teacher pronounced it for me, I couldn’t say 
it. We never had words like that on our seventh-grade spelling tests. 

“Robertson, take over for Amsterdam,” the teacher commanded. 

Robertson took her book back from me and started reading out loud. I tried 
to follow the story. It was something about people going to balls and some guys 
wanting to marry Princess Kitty. Girl stuff. I yawned. 

“Bored, Amsterdam?” the teacher asked. “Maybe I can wake you up a bit. 
Why don’t you tell us what this passage means?” 

“Means?” I echoed. “You mean, what does it mean?” 

“That’s what I said.” 

I tried to stall for time. When would this stupid class be over, anyway? 

“Um—mean? What does it mean,” I murmured to myself, as if I were 
thinking really hard. “Like, what is the meaning of it? Wow, that’s a tough one 

All the other kids turned in their seats and stared at me. 

The teacher tapped his foot. “We’re waiting.” 

What could I do? I had no idea what was going on. I went for the foolproof 



escape. 

“I have to go to the bathroom,” I said. 

Everybody laughed except the teacher. He rolled his eyes. 

“Go ahead,” he said. “And stop by the principal’s office on your way back.” 

“What?” 

“You heard me,” the teacher said. “You’ve got a date with the principal. 
Now get out of my class.” 

I jumped up and ran out of the room. Man! High-school teachers were 
mean! 

Even though I was being punished, I was glad to get out of there. 

I never thought I’d say this, ever. But I wanted to go back to junior high! I 
wished everything would go back to normal. 

I wandered through the hall, looking for the principal’s office. I found a 
door with a frosted-glass window. Letters on the window said, MRS. MCNAB, 
PRINCIPAL. 

Should I go in? I wondered. Why should I? She’s only going to yell at me. 

I was about to turn around and leave. But someone was coming toward me 
down the hall. 

Someone I didn’t want to see. 

“There you are, you little creep!” It was the big guy from this morning. 
“I’m going to pound your face into the ground!” 



5 


Gulp. 

Suddenly the principal’s office didn’t seem so scary. This guy—whoever he 
was—would never hurt me in the principal’s office. 

“You’ll be needing plastic surgery when I’m finished with you!” the guy 
yelled. 

I opened the principal’s door and slipped inside. 

A big woman with steely gray hair sat behind a desk, writing something. 

“Yes?” she said. “What is it?” 

I paused to catch my breath. Why was I there again? 

Oh, yeah. English class. 

“My English teacher sent me,” I explained. “I guess I’m in trouble.” 

“Sit down, Matt.” She offered me a chair. She seemed kind of nice. She 
didn’t raise her voice. “What’s the problem?” 

“There’s been some kind of mistake,” I began. “I don’t belong here. I’m not 
supposed to be in high school!” 

She frowned. “What on earth are you talking about?” 

“I’m twelve years old!” I cried. “I’m a seventh grader! I can’t do this high 
school work. I’m supposed to be in middle school!” 

She looked confused. She reached out and pressed the back of her hand to 
my forehead. 

She’s checking to see if I have a fever, I realized. I must sound like a 
maniac. 

She spoke slowly and clearly. “Matt, you’re in eleventh grade. Not seventh 
grade. Can you understand me?” 

“I know I look like an eleventh grader,” I said. “I can’t do the work! Just 
now, in English class? They were reading a big, fat book called Anna something. 
I couldn’t read the first sentence!” 

“Calm down, Matt.” She stood up and went to a file cabinet. “You can do 
the work. I’ll prove it to you.” 

She pulled out a file and opened it. I stared at it. It was a school record, with 
grades and comments. 

My name was written at the top of the chart. And there were my grades, for 



seventh grade, eighth grade, ninth grade, tenth grade, and the first half of 
eleventh. 

“You see?” Mrs. McNab said. “You can do the work. You’ve gotten mostly 
B’s, every year.” 

There were even a few A’s. 

“But—but I haven’t done this yet,” I protested. What was going on? How 
did I end up so far in the future? What happened to all those years? 

“Mrs. McNab, you don’t understand,” I insisted. “Yesterday, I was twelve. 
Today I woke up—and I was sixteen! I mean, my body was sixteen. But my 
mind is still twelve!” 

“Yes, I know,” Mrs. McNab replied. 



6 


“Yes, I know you read a lot of science fiction,” Mrs. McNab said. “But you don’t 
expect me to believe that silly story—do you?” 

Mrs. McNab folded her arms and sighed. I could tell she was losing 
patience with me. 

“You have gym class next, don’t you,” she said. 

“What?” 

“This is all some kind of joke, right?” She glanced at my schedule, stapled 
to the file. 

“I knew it,” she muttered. “You do have gym next. And you’re trying to get 
out of it.” 

“No! I’m telling the truth!” 

“You’re going to that gym class, young man,” she said. “It starts in five 
minutes.” 

I stared at her. My feet felt glued to the floor. I should have known she 
wouldn’t believe me. 

“Are you going?” she asked gruffly. “Or do I have to take you to the gym 
myself?” 

“I’m going, I’m going!” I backed out of the office and ran down the hall. 
Mrs. McNab stuck her head out the door and called, “No running in the halls!” 

Pam and Greg always said that high school was bad, I thought as I trotted to 
the gym. But this is a nightmare! 

Tweet! The gym teacher blew his whistle. “Volleyball! Line up to pick teams.” 

The gym teacher was a stocky guy with a black toupee. He chose a couple 
of team captains, and they started picking teams. 

Don’t pick me. Don’t pick me, I silently prayed. 

One of the captains, a blond girl named Lisa, picked me. 

We lined up at the volleyball nets. The other team served. The ball flew at 
me like a bullet. 

“I got it! I got it!” I cried. 

I reached up to hit the ball back. 

Klonk! It knocked me on the head. 



“Ow!” I rubbed my sore head. I’d forgotten—my head was much higher 
now than it used to be. 

“Wake up, Matt!” Lisa yelled. 

I had a feeling I wasn’t going to be very good at volleyball. 

The ball came flying at us again. “Get it, Matt!” someone called. 

I reached up higher this time. But I tripped over my giant feet and fell 
— oof !—on top of the guy standing next to me. 

“Watch it, man!” the guy shouted. “Get off me!” Then he clutched his 
elbow. “Ow! I hurt my elbow!” 

The teacher blew his whistle and hurried over to the guy. “You’d better go 
to the nurse,” he said. 

The guy hobbled out of the gym. 

“Way to go, Matt,” Lisa said sarcastically. “Try to do something right this 
time, okay?” 

I turned red with embarrassment. I knew I looked like a jerk. But I wasn’t 
used to being so tall! And having such big feet and hands. I didn’t know how to 
control them. 

I got through a few rounds without messing up. Actually, the ball didn’t 
come near me. So I didn’t have the chance to mess up. Then Lisa said, “Your 
serve, Matt.” 

I knew this was coming. I’d been watching everybody else serve so I’d 
know what to do. 

This time I won’t mess up, I vowed. I’m going to serve this ball and get a 
point for my team. Then they won’t be angry at me for making us lose. 

I tossed the ball in the air. I punched it as hard as I could with my fist, 
trying to get it over the net. 

WHAM! I hit that ball harder than I’d ever hit anything. It whizzed through 
the air so fast, you could hardly see it. 

SMACK! 

“Ow!” 

Lisa doubled over, clutching the side of her head. 

“Why did you have to hit it so hard?” Lisa cried, rubbing her head. 

The teacher looked her over. “You’ll have a nasty bruise there,” he said. 
“You’d better go to the nurse too.” 

Lisa glared at me and stumbled away. 

The teacher gave me a funny look. “What’s the matter, kid?” he asked. 



“Don’t know your own strength? Or just out to get your classmates, one by 
one?” 

“I—I didn’t do it on purpose,” I stuttered. “I swear I didn’t!” 

“Hit the showers, kid,” the teacher said. 

I hung my head as I dragged myself to the locker room. 

This day can’t get any worse, I thought. There’s no way. 

Still, why take chances? 

It was lunchtime. I had half a day of school to go. 

But I wasn’t going to stick around. 

I didn’t know where to go or what to do. I only knew I couldn’t stay in that 
school. 

High school was horrible. If I ever got back to my normal life, I’d 
remember to skip this part. 

I left the gym and raced out of the school building as fast as I could. Down 
the hall. Out the door. 

I glanced back. Was that big guy chasing me? Did the principal see me 
sneak out? No sign of anyone. Coast clear. Then— oof! Oh, no. Not again! 



7 


I bumped into someone. I bounced backwards and landed with a thud on the 
ground. 

Ow! What happened? 

A girl sat sprawled on the sidewalk. Books were scattered around her. 

I helped her up. “Are you okay?” I asked. 

She nodded. 

“I’m really sorry,” I said. “I’ve been doing that all day.” 

“That’s all right.” The girl smiled. “I’m not hurt.” 

She wasn’t a high-school girl—she looked about my age. I mean, the age I 
thought I was. Which was twelve. 

She was pretty, with long, thick blond hair in a ponytail. Her blue eyes 
sparkled at me. 

She bent down to pick up her stuff. 

“I’ll help you,” I offered. I reached down to pick up a book. 

CLONK! My head bumped into hers. 

“I did it again!” I cried. I was getting sick of this. 

“Don’t worry about it,” the girl said. She picked up the rest of the books. 
“My name is Lacie,” she told me. 

“I’m Matt.” 

“What’s the matter, Matt?” she asked. “Why are you in such a hurry?” 

What could I tell her? That my whole life had turned inside out? 

Then the school door burst open. Mrs. McNab stepped outside. 

“I’ve got to get out of here,” I replied. “I’ve got to get home. See you.” 

I ran down the street before Mrs. McNab could spot me. 

I collapsed on the couch. It had been a terrible day. At least I made it home 
before that big guy beat me up. 

But what was I going to do tomorrow? 

I watched TV until Pam and Greg came home from school. 

Pam and Greg. I’d forgotten all about them. 

They were little kids now. And they seemed to expect me to take care of 



them. 

“Fix us a snack! Fix us a snack!” Pam chanted. 

“Fix your own snack,” I snapped back. 

“I’m telling Mommy!” Pam cried. “You’re supposed to fix us a snack! And 
I’m hungry!” 

I remembered the excuse Pam and Greg had always used to get out of doing 
stuff for me. 

“I’ve got homework to do,” I said. 

Oh, yeah, I realized. 

I probably really do have homework to do. 

High-school homework. 

It’s going to be impossible for me. 

But if I don’t do it, I’ll be in trouble tomorrow. 

In more ways than one, I thought, remembering that big guy. What did I 
ever do to him, anyway? 

When it was time for bed, I headed to my old room. But Pam was sleeping in 
there. 

So I went back to the guest room. I climbed into bed. 

What am I going to do? I worried as I let my eyes close. 

I don’t know what’s happening. 

I can’t do anything right. 

Is this what my life is going to be like—forever? 



8 


I opened my eyes. Sunlight poured in through the window. It was morning. 

Oh, great, I thought. Time for another fabulous day of high school. 

I shut my eyes again. I can’t face it, I thought. Maybe if I stay in bed, ah my 
problems will go away. 

“Matt! Time to get up!” Mom called. 

I sighed. Mom would never let me stay home from school. There was no 
way out. 

“Matt!” she shouted again. 

Her voice sounds funny, I thought. Higher than usual. 

Maybe she’s not so tired for once. 

I dragged myself out of bed. I set my feet on the floor. 

Wait a minute. 

My feet. 

I stared at them. They looked different. I mean, they looked the same. 

They weren’t big anymore. I had my old feet back! 

I looked at my hands. I wiggled my fingers. 

It was me! I was my old self again! 

I ran into the bathroom to check the mirror. I had to make sure. 

I flipped on the light. 

There I was—a puny little twelve year old! 

I hopped up and down. “Yippee! I’m twelve! I’m twelve!” 

All my problems were solved! I didn’t have to go to high school! 

I didn’t have to face that big bully! 

The nightmare was over! 

Everything was okay now. I was even looking forward to seeing Pam and 
Greg and Biggie as their crabby old selves again. 

“Matt! You’re going to be late!” Mom shouted. 

Does she have a cold or something? I wondered as I quickly dressed and 
ran downstairs. She really did sound different. 

I practically skipped into the kitchen. “I’ll have cereal today, Mom—” 

I stopped. 



Two people sat at the kitchen table. A man and a woman. 
I’d never seen them before. 



9 


“I fixed you some toast, Matt,” the woman said. 

“Where’s my mother?” I asked. “Where are Pam and Greg?” 

The man and woman stared blankly at me. 

“Feeling a little off today, son?” the man said. 

Son? 

The woman stood up and bustled around the kitchen. “Drink your juice, 
honey. Your dad will drop you off at school today.” 

My dad? 

“I don’t have a dad!” I insisted. “My father has been dead since I was a 
baby!” 

The man shook his head and bit into a piece of toast. “They told me he’d 
get weird at this age. But I didn’t know how weird.” 

“Where are they?” I demanded. “What did you do with my family?” 

“I’m not in the mood for jokes today, Matt,” the man said. “Now let’s get 
moving.” 

A cat crept into the kitchen. It rubbed against my legs. 

“What’s this cat doing here?” I asked. “Where’s Biggie?” 

“Who’s Biggie? What are you talking about?” the woman said. 

I was starting to get scared. My heart was pounding. My legs felt weak. 

I sank into a chair and gulped my juice. “Are you saying that—you’re my 
parents?” 

The woman kissed me on the head. “I’m your mother. This is your father. 
That’s your cat. Period.” 

“I have no brothers or sisters?” 

The woman raised an eyebrow and glanced at the man. “Brothers and 
sisters? No, darling.” 

I cringed. My real mother would never call me “darling”. 

“I know you want a brother,” the woman went on. “But you really wouldn’t 
like it. You’re just not good at sharing.” 

I couldn’t stand this any longer. 

“Okay, stop right there,” I demanded. “Stop fooling around. I want to know 



right now—why is this happening to me?” 

My “parents” exchanged looks. Then they turned back to me. 

“I want to know who you are!” I cried, trembling all over. “Where is my 
real family? I want answers—now!” 

The man stood up and grabbed me by the arm. “Get in the car, son,” he 
commanded. 

“No!” I screamed. 

“Joke is over. Now get in the car.” 

I had no choice. I followed him to a car—a shiny new one, not my real 
mother’s old piece of junk. I climbed in. 

The woman ran outside. “Don’t forget your books!” she called. She pushed 
a backpack through the open window at me. Then she kissed me again. 

“Ugh!” I cringed. “Stop it!” I didn’t know her well enough to let her kiss 
me. 

The man started the car and pulled out of the driveway. The woman waved. 
“Have a good day at school!” 

They’re serious, I realized. They really think they’re my parents. 

I shuddered. 

What was happening to me? 



10 


One day I’m a normal twelve year old. The next day I’m suddenly sixteen. 

Then the next day I’m twelve again—except I live in a completely different 
family! 

I stared out the window as “Dad” drove. We passed through a neighborhood 
I’d never seen before. 

“Where are we going?” I asked in a tiny voice. 

“I’m taking you to school. What did you think—we were going to the 
circus?” the man replied. 

“This isn’t the way to school,” I said. 

The man just snorted and shook his head. He didn’t believe me. 

He pulled up in front of a junior high school—but not mine. I’d never seen 
this place before. 

“Okay, son. Have a nice day.” The man reached across me and opened the 
car door. 

What could I do? I climbed out of the car. 

“Dad” drove off. 

Now what? I thought. I’m twelve again—but I’m at a totally different 
school. 

Am I awake? 

I kicked myself in the shin to test it. Ow! That hurt. 

I figured that meant I was awake. 

Kids poured into the school building. I followed them in. I didn’t know 
what else to do. 

Ahead of me I saw a girl with a long, thick blond ponytail. She turned 
around and smiled at me. 

She looked familiar. Where had I seen her before? 

“Hi,” I said to her. 

“Hi,” she said back. Her blue eyes sparkled at me. 

“I’m Matt.” I was still racking my brains trying to figure out where I’d met 
her before. 

“I’m Lacie.” 



Lacie! Of course. I’d crashed into her the day before—outside Horrible 
High. 

I started to say, “I met you yesterday—remember?” But I stopped. 

Did she recognize me? I couldn’t tell. But why should she? I looked 
completely different from the day before. How could she guess that the twelve- 
year-old kid standing next to her was also the clumsy teenager from yesterday? 

“What’s your first class?” she asked me. “I’ve got lunch.” 

“Lunch? But it’s eight-thirty in the morning!” 

“You’re new here, aren’t you?” she said. 

I nodded. 

“This stupid school is so crowded, they can’t fit everyone into the cafeteria 
at lunchtime,” she explained. “So I’ve got lunch now.” 

“I’ve got lunch too,” I lied. Or maybe it wasn’t a lie—what did I know? I 
had no idea what was going on anymore. School was beginning to seem like a 
lot more trouble than it was worth. 

I followed her to the cafeteria. They really were serving lunch there. The 
powerful smell of brussels sprouts stank up the air. I gagged. 

“It’s too early in the morning for brussels sprouts,” I noted. 

“Let’s eat out on the playground,” Lacie suggested. “It’s a nice day.” 

We slipped out of the cafeteria and settled under a tree. Lacie sipped a 
carton of chocolate milk. I rummaged through my backpack for some lunch. I 
figured my new “mom” must’ve packed me something. 

She did, all right. Baloney and ketchup on white bread. A little plastic bag 
full of carrot sticks. Vanilla pudding for dessert. 

Everything I hate. 

Lacie held out a chocolate cupcake. “Want this? I can’t face it this early in 
the morning.” 

“Thanks.” I took the cupcake. 

Lacie seemed like a really nice person. She was the nicest person I’d met 
since my life became a nightmare. She was the only nice person I’d met since 
then. 

Maybe she would understand. I really wanted to talk to somebody. I felt so 
alone. 

“Do I look familiar to you?” I asked her. 

She studied my face. 

“You do look kind of familiar,” she said. “I’m sure I’ve seen you around 



school....” 

“That’s not what I mean.” I decided to tell her what had happened to me. I 
knew it would sound weird to her. But I had to tell somebody. 

I started slowly. “Were you walking past the high school yesterday?” 

“Yes. I walk past it every day on my way home.” 

“Did someone bump into you yesterday? A teenager? In front of the high 
school?” 

She started to answer. But something caught her eye. I followed her gaze to 
the school door. 

Two guys were walking toward us. They were tough-looking guys in black 
jeans and black T-shirts. One wore a blue bandanna around his head. The other 
had ripped the sleeves of his T-shirt to show off his beefy arms. 

They had to be at least sixteen or seventeen. What were they doing here? 

They headed straight for us. 

My heart began to pound. Something told me to be afraid of them. 

Maybe it was the nasty looks on their faces. 

“Who are those guys?” I asked. 

Lacie didn’t answer. She didn’t have time. 

One of the guys in black pointed at me. 

“There he is!” he shouted. 

“Get him!” 



11 


The two guys ran straight for me. 

Who were they? I didn’t know. 

But I didn’t stop to think. I jumped to my feet and ran as fast as I could. 

I glanced back. Were they chasing me? 

“Stop him!” one of them shouted. 

Lacie stepped in front of them, blocking their path. 

“Thanks, Lacie,” I whispered. I hurried out of the playground. I raced 
through the strange neighborhood, trying to remember how to get home. 

A few blocks from school I stopped to catch my breath. 

No sign of the two guys. No sign of Lacie, either. 

I hope she’s all right, I thought. They didn’t seem to want to hurt her. 

They wanted to hurt me. 

But why? 

The day before, a bully had said he wanted to get me after school. 

But today, in my new, weird world, I hadn’t seen him. Neither of the guys 
in black was that bully. 

Just two new bullies. 

I’ve got to get help, I realized. 

I don’t know what’s happening. But it’s all too much for me. And it’s too 
frightening. I hardly know who I am. 

I drifted through the streets until I finally found my way home. “Mom” and 
“Dad” were out. The front door was locked. I climbed in through the kitchen 
window. 

My real mother was gone. My brother and sister and even my dog were 
gone. 

But there must be someone else I know, I thought. Somebody, somewhere, 
who can help me. 

Maybe my real mom went somewhere else. Maybe she’s visiting relatives 
or something. 

I decided to try Aunt Margaret and Uncle Andy. I dialed Aunt Margaret’s 
number. 



A man answered the phone. 

“Uncle Andy!” I cried. “It’s me, Matt!” 

The voice said, “Who is this?” 

“Matt!” I repeated. “Your nephew!” 

“I don’t know any Matt,” the man said gruffly. “You must have dialed the 
wrong number.” 

“No—Uncle Andy, wait!” I shouted. 

“My name isn’t Andy,” the man snarled. He hung up. 

I stared at the phone, stunned. The man didn’t sound like Uncle Andy at all. 
I guess I did dial wrong, I thought. I tried the number again. 

“Hello?” It was the same man again. 

This time I tried a new approach. “Is Andy Amsterdam there, please?” 

“You again! There’s no Andy here, kid,” the man said. “Wrong number.” 

He slammed the phone in my ear. 

I tried not to panic. But my hands were shaking. 

I dialed information. “What listing, please?” the operator asked. 

“Andrew Amsterdam,” I said. 

“Checking,” said the operator. 

A minute later she said, “I’m sorry. We have no listing under that name.” 
“Maybe if I spell it for you,” I insisted. “A-m-s—” 

“I’ve already checked, sir. There’s no one listed under that name.” 

“Could you try Margaret Amsterdam, then?” 

“There’s no one named Amsterdam listed at all, sir.” 

My heart started racing as I hung up. This can’t be happening, I thought. 
There must be somebody I know, somewhere! 

I won’t give up. I’ll try my cousin Chris. 

I called Chris’ number. Someone else answered. 

It was as if Chris didn’t exist. Or Uncle Andy, or my mother, or anybody I 
knew. 

How could my whole family disappear? 

The only person I knew was Lacie. But I couldn’t call her. 

I didn’t know her last name. 

The front door opened. The woman who called herself my mother bustled 
in, carrying shopping bags. 

“Matt, darling! What are you doing home in the middle of the day?” 



“None of your beeswax,” I snapped. 

“Matt! Don’t be so rude!” she scolded. 

I shouldn’t have been rude to her, I guess. But what difference did it make? 
She wasn’t my real mother, anyway. 

My real mother had disappeared off the face of the earth. 

I shuddered. I realized I was totally alone in the world. 

I didn’t know anyone—not even my parents! 



12 


“Bedtime, honey,” my fake mother chirped. 

I’d been sitting in front of the TV all evening. Just staring, not even really 
watching it. 

Maybe I should stop thinking of these people as my fake parents, I realized. 
They’re real enough now. I might be stuck with them forever. 

I’ll find out in the morning, I thought as I trudged upstairs. My old room 
was a sewing room now. I went back to the guest room to sleep. 

“Good night, darling.” “Mom” kissed me goodnight. Why did she have to 
keep kissing me? 

She turned out the light and said, “See you in the morning.” 

The morning. I dreaded the morning. 

So far, each morning was weirder than the last. I was scared to go to sleep. 

What would I wake up to? 

It would be great if these fake parents of mine were gone. But who would 
take their place? 

Maybe I’d wake up and the whole world would be gone! 

I struggled to stay awake. Please, I prayed. Please let everything be normal 
again. I’d even be glad to have Greg and Pam back, if everything could only be 
normal.... 

I must have fallen asleep. The next thing I knew, I opened my eyes—and it 
was morning. 

I lay perfectly still for a minute. Had anything changed? 

I heard noises in the house. There were definitely other people here. 

A lot of other people. 

My heart started pounding. Oh, no, I thought. What am I in for this time? 

I heard someone playing an accordion. That was a pretty sure sign my old 
family wasn’t back. 

But first things first. How old was I today? 

I held my hands up in front of my face. They looked a little on the small 

side. 

I got up and went to the bathroom, trying not to panic. I was really getting 



sick of this routine. 

The mirror seemed higher than usual. I stared at my face. 

I wasn’t twelve anymore, that was for sure. I looked about eight. 

Eight, I thought, sighing. 

That’s third grade. Well, at least I’ll be able to do the math. Suddenly, I felt 
a sharp pain in my back. Ow! Claws! Tiny claws digging into my back! The 
claws dug deeper. I screamed. 



13 


Something jumped on my back! 

A tiny, hairy face appeared in the mirror. Some kind of animal was standing 
on my shoulders! 

“Get it off! Get it off!” I shrieked. 

“Eeee! Eeee!” the animal screeched. 

I ran into the hallway—and almost crashed into a huge man. 

“Get this thing off me!” I cried. 

The man plucked the animal off my shoulder. He laughed loud and deep, 
like an evil Santa Claus. 

“What’s wrong with you, Matt?” he boomed. “Scared of Pansy all of a 
sudden?” 

Pansy? The man cuddled the animal in his arms. It was a monkey. 

The man roughed up my hair. “Get dressed, boy. We got a rehearsal this 
morning.” 

Rehearsal? What was that supposed to mean? 

I stared at the man. He was huge, with a round stomach, glossy black hair, 
and a long mustache. 

The weirdest part was what he wore: a bright red costume with gold trim 
and a gold belt. 

Oh, no! I thought, my heart sinking. This can’t be... my father? 

From downstairs a woman’s voice screamed, “Grub!” 

The man handed me a pile of clothes. “Put your costume on,” he said. 
“Then come on down to breakfast—son.” 

I knew it. He was my father. For today, at least. My “family” kept getting 
worse every day. 

“GRUUUUB!” the woman downstairs yelled again. 

I guess that’s Mom, I thought miserably. She sounds like a real sweetheart. 

Kids came pouring out of the other bedrooms. It seemed like there were 
dozens of them, all different ages. But I counted, and there were only six. 

I tried to get all the new facts straight. I was eight years old. I had six 
brothers and sisters and a pet monkey. I hadn’t seen my mother yet, but my 



father was a total wacko. 

And I’ve got to wear some kind of freaky costume, I thought, holding up 
the clothes the man had given me. It was a tight blue outfit, like a leotard. The 
bottom part was blue with white stripes. The top had white stars. 

What was that supposed to be? And what kind of rehearsal did I have? 

Was I in a play or something? 

I pulled on the costume. It fit me like a second skin. I felt like a total jerk. 

Then I went downstairs for breakfast. 

The kitchen was a madhouse. The other kids laughed and shouted and 
threw food. Pansy hopped around on the table, stealing bits of bacon. 

A tall, thin woman piled pancakes on plates. She wore a long, purple, 
sequined gown. A silver crown perched on top of her head. 

My new mom. 

“Hurry up and eat, Matt—before it’s all gone!” she shouted. 

I grabbed a plate and started eating. I had to keep swatting Pansy away. 

“Doesn’t Matt look cute in his little superhero suit?” a girl teased. She had 
to be one of my older sisters. 

“Cute as a button,” a boy said sarcastically. He looked about two years 
older than me. He grabbed my cheek and pinched it—hard. Too hard. “Cute little 
Matt,” he sneered. “Big-shot star of the circus.” 

The circus! I dropped my fork. Chills rippled down my back. Was I in the 
circus? 

The dopey costumes. The monkey. It all made sense now. 

I dropped my head into my hands. Matthew Amsterdam, circus boy. I 
almost wanted to cry. 

I had the feeling my brother was jealous. As if he wanted to be the star of 
the stupid circus. 

And he could be, for all I cared. / sure didn’t want to be the star of any 
circus. 

“Leave Matt alone or he’ll get stage fright again,” the mother scolded. 

I studied the rest of the family. Everyone was dressed in bright costumes. I 
was part of a circus family. 

The pancakes sank to the pit of my stomach. I never liked the circus. Even 
when I was little, I hated it. 

But now the circus was my life—and I was the star. Oh, goody. 

“Rehearsal time!” the father cried. He put a black top hat on his head and 



cracked a whip on the stairs. “Let’s roll!” 

We left our plates on the table and piled into a beat-up old van. Mom drove 
at about ninety miles an hour. 

My brothers and sisters fought the whole way. One little girl kept pinching 
me. Another one punched me. 

“Cut it out!” I snapped. Why couldn’t I wake up in a world with nice 
brothers and sisters? 

The van chugged into a fairground and stopped in front of a big circus tent. 

“Everybody out!” Dad ordered. 

I jostled with my brothers and sisters to get out of the van. Then I followed 
them into the tent. 

It was kind of awesome inside the tent. Other acts were already there, 
practicing. I saw a man on a high wire way up near the top of the tent. An 
elephant stood up on its hind legs and danced. Clowns rode around in dopey 
little cars, honking their horns. 

I wonder what my act is? I thought. Two of my sisters scurried up a ladder 
and started practicing a trapeze routine. 

I watched them, terrified. The trapeze! There was no way they could get me 
up there. No way. 

Please don’t make me do a trapeze act, I prayed. 

“Come on, Matt,” Dad said. “Let’s get to work.” 

Not the trapeze. Not the trapeze, I prayed. 

Dad led me away from the trapeze ladder. I began to relax. Whatever I had 
to do, it couldn’t be worse than swinging around on a trapeze. Right? 

Wrong. 

Dad led me to the back of the tent. I followed him through a maze of animal 
cages. 

Dad strode up to one of the cages and opened the door. 

“All right, son,” he bellowed. “Get in.” 

My jaw dropped. I couldn’t believe my ears. 

“G-g-g-get in?” I stuttered. “But—there’s a lion in that cage!” 

The lion opened his huge jaws and roared. I backed away, shivering. 

“Are you going to walk in?” Dad prodded me with the end of his whip. “Or 
do I have to push you?” 

I didn’t move. I couldn’t. 

So Dad pushed me into the lion’s cage—and shut the door. 



14 


I backed up against the cage wall. The cold steel bars pressed into my back. My 
legs were trembling so hard, I thought I would fall on my face. 

The lion stared at me. He sniffed the air. 

I’ve heard that animals can smell fear. This lion got a noseful. 

My “father”—the lion tamer—stood beside me in the cage. 

“We’re trying a new trick today, Matt,” he said. “You’re going to ride the 
lion.” 

He might as well have punched me in the stomach. I was going to ride the 

lion? 

Yeah. Right. 

Some father this guy is, I thought. Feeding his own son to a lion. 

The lion stood up. I kept my eyes on him. My whole body shook with fear. 
ROOOAAAR! 

The lion’s breath blew in my face like a hot wind. My hair stood on end. 

The lion stepped toward us. Dad cracked his whip. “Ha!” he shouted. 

The lion stepped back, licking his chops. 

“Go on, boy,” Dad boomed at me. “Climb on Hercules’ back. Then slide up 
to his shoulders. I’ll crack the whip to make him walk around the cage.” 

I couldn’t say a word. I just stared at the man in total disbelief. 

“Why are you looking at me like that? You’re not afraid of Hercules, are 
you?” 

“A-afraid?” I stammered. “Afraid” wasn’t the word. Petrified, maybe. 
Terrified, horrified, frozen with fear. But afraid? Nah. 

He cracked his whip again. “No son of mine is a coward!” he shouted. “You 
get on that lion’s back—NOW!” 

Then he leaned down and whispered, “Just watch that he doesn’t bite you. 
Remember your poor brother Tom. He’s still trying to learn how to write left- 
handed.” 

He cracked the whip again—right at my feet. 

I wasn’t going to ride the lion. No way. 

And I couldn’t stay in that cage another second. 



Dad cracked his whip at me again. I jumped. 

“Noooo!” I shrieked. 

I tugged the cage door open. I ran out of that cage so fast, Dad hardly knew 
what happened. 

I raced out of the tent. My brain screamed, “Hide! Find a hiding place— 
quick!” 

I spotted a couple of trailers in the parking lot. I darted behind one—and 
bumped right into Lacie. 

“You again!” I gasped. It was weird how she kept popping up. 

“I’ve got to hide,” I told her. “I’m in trouble!” 

“What’s wrong, Matt?” she asked. 

“I’m about to become lion food!” I cried. “Help me!” 

Lacie yanked on the trailer door. It was locked. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “Look!” 

I pointed past the trailer. Two guys were running toward us. 

I’d seen them before. The two guys in black. 

They were coming after me! 

I ran. There was no place to go, no place to hide—except back inside the 

tent. 

I burst through the tent flap. I tried to catch my breath while my eyes 
adjusted to the dark. 

I heard one of the guys in black shout, “In there! He went inside the tent!” 

I stumbled through the darkness, searching for a place to hide. 

“Get him!” The boys were inside the tent now. 

I ran blindly—right back into the lion’s cage. 



15 


I slammed the cage door shut. The guys in black gripped the steel bars and shook 
them. 

“You won’t get away!” one shouted. 

My “dad”, the lion tamer, was gone. I was alone in the cage—with 
Hercules. 

“Easy, boy. Easy...” I murmured as I inched my way along the side of the 
cage. The lion stood in the center, eyeing me. 

The two guys rattled the cage door again. It swung open. They stepped 
inside, glaring at me. 

“You can’t escape that easily,” one of them warned. 

The lion growled at them. “It’s just an old circus lion,” one guy said. “He 
won’t hurt us.” 

But I could tell they weren’t as sure as they sounded. 

Hercules growled again, louder this time. The two guys stopped. 

I inched farther around the cage wall. 

I had to put that lion between me and the guys in black. It was my only 
chance. 

Carefully, one of the guys stepped forward. The lion roared at him. 

He stepped back. 

The lion’s eyes darted from the guys to me and back. I knew he was trying 
to decide who would make the tastier meal. 

“You’d better get out of here,” I warned. “Hercules hasn’t been fed yet.” 

The guys watched Hercules warily. 

“He won’t attack me,” I bluffed. “I’m his master. But if I tell him to, he’ll 
go right for your throats!” 

The guys glanced at each other. One of them said, “He’s lying.” 

The other guy didn’t look so sure. 

“I’m not lying,” I insisted. “Get out of here right now—or I’ll turn him on 
you!” 

One guy made a move for the cage door. The other guy grabbed his arm and 
pulled him back. “Don’t be chicken,” he snapped. 



“Get them, Hercules!” I shouted. “Get them!” 

Hercules let out his fiercest roar yet—and pounced. 

The guys in black scurried out of the cage. They slammed the door as 
Hercules tried to bound out. 

“You won’t get away!” one guy yelled through the bars. “We’ll be back!” 
“Why do you want me?” I screamed after them. “What did I do? What did I 

do?” 



16 


Hercules didn’t really want to eat anybody. He just wanted to get out of the cage. 

He didn’t try to stop me as I slipped out. I sneaked away to hide in the van 
until circus practice was over. 

“Where were you all day?” Dad grumbled when he found me. Everyone 
else piled into the van, and we drove home. 

“I felt sick,” I complained. “I had to lie down.” 

“You’re going to learn that trick tomorrow, Matt,” Dad insisted. “You won’t 
get out of it again.” 

I just yawned. I figured tomorrow would never come. At least not for my 
circus family. 

Tomorrow would bring some new horror. Or maybe for once something 
good would happen. 

I went to bed early that night. I didn’t like being an eight year old in a 
circus family. I couldn’t wait for it to be over. 

My circus brothers were climbing the walls in my old room. I’d never get 
any sleep in there. So I crept off to sleep in the guest room again. 

But I had trouble falling asleep. I couldn’t stop wondering what the next 
day would bring. It’s hard to relax when you don’t know what kind of world 
you’ll wake up to in the morning. 

I tried counting sheep, but that never works for me. So I tried to think of all 
the good things that could happen when I woke up. 

I could wake up as a major league baseball player. I could be the greatest 
pitcher in the history of baseball. 

Or I could be a very, very rich kid who gets everything he wants. 

Or I could be a space explorer five hundred years in the future. 

Why didn’t anything like that ever happen to me? 

Most of all, I wished I could wake up and find my family again. My real 
family. They drove me crazy. But at least I was used to them. I even missed 
them, a little bit. 

Okay, a lot. 

At last, just before dawn, I fell asleep. 



It was still very early when I woke up. I gazed around the room. Everything 
seemed a little blurry. 

Who am I now? I wondered. The room looked normal. I didn’t hear any 
noise, so I knew the circus family was gone. 

Might as well get it over with, I decided. I jumped out of bed. I felt a little 
shaky on my legs. 

I walked slowly into the bathroom. I looked in the mirror. 

No. Oh, no. 

This was the worst one yet. The worst ever. The worst possible ! 



17 


I was an old man! 

“No!” I screamed. I couldn’t take it anymore. I ran back to bed as fast as 
my rickety old legs would carry me. 

I got under the covers and closed my eyes. I was going right back to sleep. I 
wasn’t about to spend the whole day as an old man. Not when I’m really only 
twelve. 

I quickly dozed off. When I woke up, I knew right away I had changed. I 
wasn’t an old man anymore. 

I felt a surge of energy. Power. I felt strong. 

Maybe I’m a baseball player after all, I thought hopefully. 

I rubbed my eyes. That’s when I caught a glimpse of my hand. 

It—it was green. My skin was green. And instead of fingers, I had claws! 

I swallowed hard. I tried to shake away my panic. 

What had happened to me this time? 

I didn’t waste a second finding out. I lumbered to the bathroom mirror. 

When I saw my face, I let out a roar of horror and disgust. 

I had become a monster. A hideous, gross monster. 



18 


I tried to scream. I tried to shout, “This can’t be happening to me!” 

But all that came out was a terrifying snarl. 

No! I thought, in a total panic. I felt like tearing my horrible skin off. I was 
a hideous monster—and I couldn’t even talk! 

I was big—almost seven feet tall—and powerful. My skin was a scaly 
green with black stripes, like a lizard. I oozed slime all over. 

My head looked like a dinosaur’s, with warts all over it. Three spiky horns 
stuck out of the top of my head, between four pointy ears. 

My hands and feet had sharp claws. My toenails clicked on the bathroom 
floor when I walked. 

I was one ugly, ugly dude. 

I wished I’d stayed an old man. Each time I woke up, my life got worse! 
When was this ever going to end? How could I make it stop? 

I thought about Lacie. She seemed to pop up no matter where I went. 

And she had tried to help me escape from those guys in black, I 
remembered. She wants to help me. 

I’ve got to find her, I decided. I know she’s out there somewhere. 

She’s my only chance. 

I staggered through the house in my monster body. The house was empty. 
At least I didn’t have a family to deal with. A family full of monsters would have 
been a real nightmare! 

I had to be grateful for the little things. Especially when I had green skin 
and spikes growing out of my head. 

I lumbered out the door and down the street. I tried to shout, “Lacie! Lacie, 
where are you!” 

But my mouth couldn’t make the words. All that came out was a booming, 
terrifying roar. 

A car driving down the street stopped suddenly. The driver gaped at me 
through the windshield. 

“Don’t be afraid!” I cried. But that’s not what came out. Another roar 
ripped through the air. 

The man screamed and backed his car down the street at full speed. He 



crashed into another car. 

I went over to see if anyone was hurt. A woman and her kid were in the 
other car. 

They must have been all right. Because as soon as they saw me, they all 
jumped out of their cars and ran away, screaming their heads off. 

My giant lizard feet carried me to the center of town. I smashed through 
bushes, kicked garbage cans over. People screamed in terror as soon as they saw 
me. 

Lacie, I thought. I’ve got to find Lacie. 

I tried to keep this thought in my head. But I was getting hungry. Very, very 
hungry. 

Normally I like peanut butter and jelly for a snack. But that day I had a 
strong craving for metal. A nice, big, crunchy hunk of metal. 

The town was in a panic. People raced around, shrieking as if it were the 
end of the world. 

But I wasn’t going to hurt anybody. All I wanted was a little snack. 

I stepped in front of a tasty-looking compact car. The driver slammed on the 
brakes. 

ROOAARR! I beat my chest with my powerful monster arms. 

The driver cowered in the car. I reached out and snatched off a windshield 
wiper. Just for a taste. 

Mmmmm. Rubbery goodness. 

The man flung the car door open. “No!” he cried. “Don’t hurt me! L-leave 
me alone!” 

He ran away to hide somewhere. It was nice of him to leave me his car. 

I ripped the door off the car. I pulled the handle off and stuffed it into my 
mouth. 

Delicious. Nice cool chrome. 

Then I took a big bite out of the door. Chomp, chomp. My teeth were huge 
and sharp as a razor—they had no trouble chewing the metal. Yum—leather 
upholstery for extra flavor. I finished off the door and reached in to rip out a 
bucket seat. 

Bits of yellow foam rubber spewed out of my mouth as I ate. The leather 
was yummy. But the foam padding was kind of dry. It was like air-popped 
popcorn with no butter. Bleh. 

I was tearing out the steering wheel when I heard sirens. 



Uh-oh. 

I saw that a mob had gathered around me. People pointed at me. 

“It’s eating a car!” someone screeched. 

Well, duhhh, I thought. What do you expect a monster to eat—Rice 
Krispies? 

The sirens came closer. Police cars were pulling up all around me. 

“Clear the way,” came a voice over a loudspeaker. “Stand back. Clear the 
way.” 

I’d better get out of here, I decided. I dropped the steering wheel I was 
nibbling and began to run. People screamed and scattered out of the way. 

“Stop it! Get the monster!” 

The squeal of police sirens ripped through the air. If they caught me, I knew 
they’d try to lock me up—or worse. 

I had to get out of there. I had to hide. 

I stumbled through the crowds. I headed for the edge of town. 

Then I spotted her. Lacie. Mobs of people were running away from me. She 
was the only one running toward me. 

I snarled, trying to call Lacie. She grabbed me by my slimy arm and pulled 
me out of the crowd. 

She led me down an alley. We lost the mob. I wanted to ask her where we 
were going. But I knew the words wouldn’t come. I was afraid a roar might scare 
her. 

We ran and ran. We didn’t stop running until we reached the woods at the 
edge of town. Lacie pulled me into the woods, deeper and deeper. 

She’s hiding me, I thought gratefully. I wished I could thank her. 

I followed Lacie down a narrow path. Then the path ended. We pushed our 
way through the brush. 

At last we came to a small house. It was well hidden by trees and vines. 
You could hardly see it, even when you stood right in front of it. 

A hideout, I thought. How did Lacie find this place? 

I wondered if there was anything good to eat inside the house. I was getting 
hungry again. 

A couple of bicycles would taste good right now, I thought. 

Lacie opened the door of the house. She beckoned me to come inside. 

I went in. Two people stepped out of the shadows. 

No. Oh, no. 



Not them. 

But it was them. 

The guys in black. 

One of them spoke. 

“Thank you for bringing him to us,” he said. “You did your job well.” 



19 


RRRROOOOOOAAAAARRRR! 

I thrashed my arms. I was furious! 

Lacie betrayed me! 

I had to get out of there—fast. 

I dove for the door—but they dropped a net over me. 

They yanked on the net—and I tripped. 

I fell with a heavy thud. The two guys closed the net over me. 

I roared and thrashed with all my might. But I couldn’t get out. They tied 
the net tightly around me. 

“Get me out of here!” I wanted to scream. I slashed at the net with my 
claws. I bit it with my teeth. But it was made of some kind of strange material. I 
couldn’t break the strings. 

I snarled and kicked for a long time. But no matter what I did, I was still 
trapped. At last I got tired. I lay on my back on the floor. 

Lacie and the two guys in black stared down at me, perfectly calm. 

I wished I could talk. I couldn’t stop myself from trying. 

“How could you do this to me?” I tried to ask Lacie. “I thought you were 
my friend!” 

Nothing but snarls and growls came out of me. Lacie stared down at me. 
She couldn’t understand what I said. 

The guys in black just folded their arms across their chests and sneered at 
me. 

“Who are you?” I wanted to ask them. “What do you want? What is 
happening to me?” 

No one answered me. One of the guys, the taller one, said, “All right. Let’s 
lock him up in the back.” 

I roared again. I struggled as the three of them dragged my big, slimy body 
across the floor. They pushed me into a small room at the back of the house. 
They locked me inside. 

The room was dark. There was one small window with metal bars on it. 

I could eat those bars, I realized. If I could reach them. 



But I was stuck on the floor. I couldn’t move inside the tight net. 

I lay still for a long time, waiting for something to happen. But no one 
returned to the room. I couldn’t hear what they were doing in the other rooms. 
Through the window I saw the light fading. Night was coming. 

I knew there was nothing I could do but fall asleep—fall asleep and hope 
I’d wake up human again. 



20 


I woke up groggy. My stomach hurt. 

Man, I thought. What did I eat yesterday? It feels as if I’ve got a big lump 
of metal in my stomach! 

Then I remembered. I did have metal in my stomach. 

Oh, yeah. I had snacked on a compact car. Mom always told me not to eat 
too many snacks. 

I’ve got to remember not to do that again. 

I sat up. I checked myself out. 

Whew. I was human again. 

What a relief. 

The net lay open around me. Someone had cut it off while I was sleeping. 
But who was I now? 

My arms and legs were skinny. My feet were floppy and too big for my 

legs. 

But they weren’t that big. Not monster big. I was a boy again. But not my 
usual twelve-year-old self. 

I figured I was about fourteen. 

Well, I thought, it’s better than being a monster. 

A lot better. 

But I’m still in that house in the woods, I realized. I’m still a prisoner. 

Those two guys in black had finally caught me. 

What did they want? What were they going to do to me? 

I stood up and tried the door. Locked. 

I glanced at the window. There was no way I could break through those 

bars. 

I was trapped. 

I heard a key in the lock. They were coming! 

I cowered in a corner of the room. 

The door swung open. Lacie and the two guys stepped in. 

“Matt?” Lacie said. She spotted me in the corner. She took a step toward 


me. 



“What are you going to do to me?” I asked. 

It was good to hear words coming out of my mouth again. Instead of just 
roars. 

“Let me go!” I cried. 

The guys in black shook their heads. 

“We can’t do that,” the shorter guy said. “We can’t let you go.” 

They stepped closer. They balled their hands into fists. 

“No!” I shouted. “Stay away from me!” 

The tall guy slammed the door shut. Then they moved in on me. 



21 


They walked steadily toward me. I glanced frantically around the room for a way 
to escape. 

The guys blocked my path to the door. There was no way out. 

“We’re not going to hurt you, Matt,” Lacie said gently. “We want to help 
you. Really.” 

The guys took another step toward me. I shrank back. They sure didn’t look 
like they wanted to help me. 

“Don’t be afraid, Matt,” Lacie said. “We need to talk to you.” 

She sat down in front of me. She was trying to show me I shouldn’t be 
afraid. 

But the two guys stood guard on either side of her. 

“Tell me what’s happening to me,” I demanded. 

Lacie cleared her throat. “You’re trapped in a Reality Warp,” she explained. 

As if I’d know what she was talking about. 

“Oh, of course. A Reality Warp,” I cracked. “I knew something weird was 
going on.” 

“Cut the comedy,” the shorter guy snarled. “This is no joke. You’re causing 
us a lot of trouble.” 

Lacie hushed him. “Quiet, Wayne. I’ll handle this.” 

She turned back to me and asked in her soft voice, “You don’t know what a 
Reality Warp is, do you?” 

“No,” I replied. “But I know I don’t like it.” 

“When you fell asleep in your guest room, you fell into a hole in reality,” 
she said. 

The more she told me, the less it made sense. “There’s a hole in reality—in 
the guest room?” 

She nodded. “You fell asleep in one reality, and woke up in another. You’ve 
been stuck in that hole ever since. Now, whenever you go to sleep, you change 
what is real and what isn’t real.” 

“Well, make it stop!” I demanded. 

“I’ll stop you,” the tall guy threatened. 



“Bruce—please,” Lacie snapped. 

“What does all this have to do with you, anyway?” I asked. 

“You’re breaking the law, Matt,” she said. “Every time you change, you 
break the laws of reality.” 

“I’m not doing it on purpose!” I protested. “I never even heard of the laws 
of reality! I’m innocent!” 

Lacie tried to soothe me. “I know you’re not doing it on purpose. But it 
doesn’t matter. It’s happening. When you change bodies, you change what is real 
and what isn’t real for a lot of people. If you keep changing, you’ll throw the 
whole world into confusion.” 

“You don’t understand!” I cried. “I want to stop it! I’ll do anything to stop 
it! I just want to be normal again!” 

“Don’t worry,” Wayne murmured. “We’re going to stop it.” 

“We’re the Reality Police,” Lacie told me. “Our job is to keep reality under 
control. We’ve been trying to keep up with you, Matt. It hasn’t been easy, with 
all the changes you’ve made.” 

“But why?” I asked. “What are you going to do?” 

“We had to capture you,” Lacie said. “We can’t allow you to break the 
reality laws.” 

I thought quickly. “It’s the guest room, right? This all happened because I 
slept in the guest room?” 

“Well—” 

“I’ll never sleep in the guest room again!” I promised. “I don’t mind if I 
don’t change back to my old self. This skinny fourteen-year-old body is not so 
bad.” 

Lacie shook her head. “It’s too late for that, Matt. You’re trapped in the 
hole. It doesn’t matter whether you sleep in the guest room or not. Every time 
you go to sleep—and wake up—you change reality. No matter where you are.” 

“You mean—I can never fall asleep again?” 

“That’s not quite it.” Lacie glanced at the two guys. Then she trained her 
blue eyes on me. 

“I’m sorry, Matt. I really am. You seem like a nice guy.” 

An icy chill slithered down my spine. “What—what are you talking about?” 

She patted my hand. “We have no choice, Matt. We have to put you to sleep 
—forever.” 



22 


I stared at her in horror. 

“You—you can’t do that!” I stammered. 

“Oh, yes, we can,” Wayne said. 

“And we will,” Bruce added. 

“No!” I shouted. I leaped to my feet and dove for the door. But Bruce and 
Wayne were ready for me. They grabbed me and held my arms behind my back. 

“You’re not going anywhere, kid,” Wayne said. 

“Let go of me!” I screamed. 

I struggled and squirmed. But I wasn’t a gigantic monster anymore. I was a 
scrawny kid—no match for Bruce and Wayne. Even Lacie probably could have 
beaten me up if she wanted to. 

The guys tossed me against the back wall of the room. 

“We’ll be back later,” Lacie promised. “Try not to worry about it too much, 
Matt. It won’t hurt.” 

They left the room. I heard the key turn in the lock. 

I was trapped again. 

I searched the room for a way to escape. It was completely empty—no 
furniture at all, not even a chair. Just four bare walls, a locked door, and a small 
window with metal bars. 

I opened the window and rattled the bars. I hoped they might be loose or 
something. But they didn’t budge. 

It was like being in jail. Jailed by the Reality Police. 

I put my ear to the door, listening. I could hear Lacie, Bruce, and Wayne 
talking in the other room. 

“He’ll have to drink the sleeping potion,” Wayne said. “Make sure he 
drinks the whole cup—or he might wake up.” 

“But what if he spits it out?” Lacie asked. “What if he doesn’t swallow it?” 

“I’ll make him swallow it,” Bruce vowed. 

Yikes! I couldn’t listen anymore. I frantically paced the room. 

They were going to feed me a sleeping potion! To make me sleep forever! 

I’d been in trouble before. My day in high school had seemed scary at the 



time. Being a monster was scary too. But, now—now I was really done for. 

I’ve got to find a way out of this mess! I told myself. But how? How? 

Then it dawned on me. How did I get out of trouble before? 

I fell asleep. And the problem went away. 

True, I always woke up with new, worse problems. But nothing could be 
worse than this! 

Maybe, I hoped, if I fall asleep, I’ll wake up somewhere else. And that’s 
how I can escape! 

I paced some more. 

The only trouble was—how could I fall asleep? I was so terrified! 

I knew I had to try, anyway. So I lay down on the floor. There was no bed, 
no pillow, no blanket. Daylight streamed in through the barred window. 

Falling asleep wasn’t going to be easy. 

You can do it, I told myself. I remembered how my mom—my real mom— 
used to say I could fall asleep in a hurricane. I’m a good sleeper, it’s true. 

I missed my mom. It seemed like I hadn’t seen her in a long, long time. 

If only there were some way I could bring her back, I thought as I closed 
my eyes. 

When I was very little, she used to sing me to sleep. I remembered the 
lullaby she sang. It was all about pretty ponies.... 

I hummed the song to myself. Before I knew it, I drifted off to sleep. 



23 


I opened my eyes. I rubbed them. Had I fallen asleep? 

Yes. 

Where was I? 

I looked up. Plain ceiling. 

I looked around. Bare walls. 

A door. 

A window. With bars on it. 

“No!” I cried, furious. “No!” 

I was still in the same room, in the same house in the woods. 

I was still a prisoner. 

My plan didn’t work. 

Now what could I do? 

“Nooooooo!” 

I was so angry, so frustrated, so scared, I jumped up and down in a rage. 

My plan hadn’t worked. I had no more ideas. I didn’t know what to do. 

Now I knew for sure there was no escape for me. 

I was doomed. 

I heard Lacie and the two guys in the other room. They were getting the 
sleeping potion ready. 

They’d put me to sleep forever. I’d never see my mother, or Greg, or Pam 
again. 

How could they do this to me? It wasn’t fair! 

I didn’t do anything wrong. Not on purpose, anyway! 

Thinking about all this made me angrier and angrier. I screamed, 
“NOOOOOOOOOOO!” 

And it sounded strange to me. 

I screamed again, not so loud this time. 

“Nooooo!” 

I thought I was saying, “No.” But that’s not what I heard. 

I heard a squeak. 

“No!” I said again. 



“Eee!” I heard. 

It was my voice. But it wasn’t a human voice. 

I looked at myself. I’d forgotten to do that. I’d been so terrified to find 
myself still trapped—I didn’t think that maybe I had changed. 

But I had changed. 

I was small. About eight inches tall. 

I had tiny little paws. Gray fur. A big bushy tail. 

I was a squirrel! 

My eyes went to the window. I could easily squeeze through the bars now. 

I didn’t waste a second. I scampered up the wall and wriggled through the 

bars. 

I was free! 

Yippee! I did a little squirrel somersault to celebrate. 

Then I ran through the woods as fast as I could. I found the path to town. 

I scurried through town on my little squirrel feet. It seemed to take a long 
time. Short distances felt longer to me. 

All was quiet in town. Normal. No sign that a monster had ever stomped 
through, chomping on cars. 

I guess that reality disappeared, I thought. 

This is the new reality. I’m a squirrel. 

But at least I’m an awake squirrel. It’s better than being a boy who has to 
sleep forever. 

I sniffed the air. I had an amazing sense of smell. I thought I could smell my 
house from the middle of town. 

I raced across the street. But I forgot what my mother always told me. 

Look both ways before you cross. 

A car peeled around the corner. The driver couldn’t see me. 

Huge black tires bore down on me. I tried to scurry out of the way. 

But I didn’t have time. 

I shut my eyes. Is this how I’ll end up? I wondered. 

As roadkill? 



24 


SCREECH! 

The driver slammed on the brakes. The car squealed to a stop. 

Then everything was quiet. 

I opened my eyes. One tire came so close, it touched my ear. 

I zipped out from under the tire and across the street. The car sped away. 

I reached the sidewalk. A dog stood guard in a yard. He barked at me. 

Whoops! I dodged him and ran up a tree. The dog chased me, barking 
furiously. 

I camped out in that tree until the dog got bored. His owner called him. He 
trotted away. 

I sneaked out of the tree and dashed through the yard. 

The rest of the way home I dodged cars, bikes, people, dogs, cats... 

Then, at last, I found myself staring up at my house. It was nothing special, 
my house. Just a white square house with peeling paint. 

But it looked beautiful to me. 

I had a new plan. An idea that would stop this craziness once and for all. 

I hoped. 

My whole problem had started when I slept in the guest room, I knew. 
That’s where the hole in reality was—Lacie had said so. 

But ever since then—ever since I slept in the guest room—I hadn’t slept in 
my own room. Not once. 

Something always stopped me. Either someone else was sleeping there, or 
it was being used for something else. 

My own room was where I slept when my life was normal. My tiny old 
room. I never thought I’d miss it. 

I decided I had to sleep in my old room again. Maybe that way, I could turn 
everything back to normal. The way it used to be. 

I knew it sounded stupid. But it was worth a try. 

And, anyway, I didn’t have any other ideas. 

I scampered up the rain gutter to the second floor. I peeked through my old 
bedroom window. 



There it was! My old room. With my bed in it and everything! 

But the window was closed. I tried to push it with my tiny squirrel paws. 
No luck. 

I checked the other windows in the house. They were all shut. 

There had to be another way to get in. Maybe I could sneak through the 
door somehow. 

Was anyone home? I peered through the living room window. 

Mom! And Pam and Greg! 

They were back! 

I got so excited, I hopped up and down. I chirruped and chittered. 

Then Biggie waddled into the room. 

Oh, yeah. I’d forgotten about Biggie. I wasn’t too glad to see him right 

then. 

Biggie loved to chase squirrels. 

He saw me right away and started barking. 

Pam looked up. She smiled and pointed at me. 

Yes! I thought. Come and get me, Pam. Open the window and let me in! 

She gently opened the window. “Here, little squirrel,” she cooed. “You’re 
so cute!” 

I hesitated. I wanted to go inside. But Biggie was barking like crazy. 

“Put Biggie in the basement!” Pam told Greg. “He’s scaring the squirrel.” 
She was being nicer to me as a squirrel than she ever was to her little 
brother. But I let that slide for now. 

Greg led Biggie to the basement and shut the door. 

“Come on, squirrel,” Pam chirped. “It’s safe now.” 

I hopped into the house. 

“Look!” Pam cried. “He wants to come in! It’s almost like he’s tame!” 
“Don’t let him in here!” Mom warned. “Those animals have rabies! Or 
bugs, at the very least.” 

I tried not to listen. It’s hard to hear your own mother insult you that way. 

I focused on getting upstairs. If I could only get up to my room and fall 
asleep, just for a few minutes.... 

“He’s getting away!” Greg shouted. “Catch him!” 

Pam pounced at me. I skittered away. 

“If that squirrel gets lost in this house, Pamela,” Mom warned, “you’re 
going to be in big, big trouble.” 



“I’ll catch him,” Pam promised. 

Not if I can help it, I silently vowed. 

Pam cut me off at the stairs. I darted into the kitchen. 

Pam followed. She closed the kitchen door behind her. 

I was trapped. 

“Here, little squirrel,” she called. “Here, boy.” 

I twitched my tail. I searched the room for a way out. 

Pam inched her way toward me. She was trying not to scare me away. 

I scurried under the table. She dove for me. Missed. 

But when I scampered away, she cornered me. 

And snatched me up. 

I never knew she was so speedy. 

She grabbed me by the neck and held my feet together. “I got him!” she 
shouted. 

Greg threw open the kitchen door. Mom stood behind him. 

“Take him outside—quick!” Mom ordered. 

“Can’t I keep him, Mom?” Pam begged. “He’d be such a cute pet!” 

I shuddered. Me, as Pam’s pet! What a nightmare! 

But it might be my best chance to get back to my room. 

“No!” Mom insisted. “You absolutely cannot keep him. Put him outside— 
now.” 

Pam’s mouth drooped. “Okay, Mom,” she said sadly. “Whatever you say.” 
She carried me out of the kitchen. “Mom is so mean,” she said loudly so 
Mom could hear her. “All I wanted to do was pet you and cuddle you for a 
while. What’s wrong with that?” 

A lot, I thought. Pam was the last person I wanted petting and cuddling me. 
Except for Greg. 

She opened the front door. “Bye, you cute little squirrel,” she said. 

Then she slammed the door shut. 

But she didn’t let me go. She held me tightly in her arms. 

Then she slipped upstairs to her room. 

“Don’t worry, squirrel,” she whispered. “I won’t keep you very long. Just a 
little while.” 

She pulled something out from under her bed. Her old hamster cage. 

She opened the door of the cage. She shoved me inside. 



“No!” I protested. But all I could do was squeak. 
She locked the latch. 

I was a prisoner again! 



25 


Now what am I going to do? I thought frantically. I’m stuck in this stupid cage. I 
can’t talk. 

How will I ever get to my old room? 

Another bad thought came to me. 

If I fell asleep in this tiny hamster cage—what would happen when I woke 
up? 

Pam’s big face loomed over the cage. “Are you hungry, squirrely-kins? I’ll 
go get you some nuts or something.” 

She left the room for a minute. I paced the cage, thinking hard. The next 
thing I knew, I was running on the hamster wheel. 

Stop it! I told myself. I made myself get off the wheel. I didn’t want to get 
used to being a rodent. 

“Here you go, squirrel.” Pam had returned to the room with a handful of 
nuts. She opened the door to the cage and sprinkled the nuts inside. 

“Yum yum!” she squealed. 

Oh, brother. 

I ate the nuts. I was very hungry after all my adventures. But I would have 
enjoyed them more if Pam hadn’t watched me the whole time. 

The phone rang. A moment later I heard Greg call, “Pam! Telephone!” 

“Excellent!” Pam cried. She jumped up and ran out of the room. 

Like a moron, I sat there gobbling nuts. It took me five minutes to notice 
that Pam had left the cage door unlatched. 

“Yes!” I squeaked. For once I was glad that Pam was no genius. 

I pushed the door open with my paws. I crept toward the bedroom door, 
listening for footsteps. 

The coast was clear. Now was my chance! 

I dashed out the door. Down the hall. To my room. 

The door was shut. I threw my tiny squirrel body against it, trying to open 
it. 

No way. It was closed tight. 

Rats! 



I heard footsteps down the hall. Pam was coming back! 

I knew I had to get out of there before Pam put me back in that cage. 

Or before my mother swatted me with a broom. 

I scurried down the steps and into the living room. 

Was the window still open? Yes. 

I ran behind the couch, along the wall, under a chair... 

Then I leaped up to the windowsill and out into the yard. 

I climbed a tree and curled up on a branch to rest. 

I couldn’t get into my old room as a squirrel. There was only one thing I 
could do. 

I had to go to sleep again. And this time, I’d better wake up as a human. 
Because I had to get to my old room. If I didn’t, I’d be in trouble. 

Big trouble. 

The Reality Police were on my trail. It was only a matter of time before 
they’d find me. 

If they did, nothing could save me. 



26 


CRASH! THUD! 

OOF! 

I landed hard on the ground. What a way to wake up. 

Who was I this time? 

What a relief. I was a twelve-year-old boy again. 

But I still wasn’t my old self. 

I was a very, very chubby boy. A real blimp. No wonder the tree branch 
didn’t hold me. 

But that didn’t matter. I was a human again. I could talk. 

And maybe now I could get to my old room at last. 

I marched straight up to the front door and tried the knob. 

Locked. 

So I knocked. 

I had no idea who would answer. I hoped it wasn’t a monster family. 

The door opened. 

“Mom!” I cried. I was so glad to see her. “Mom—it’s me! Matt!” 

Mom stared at me. “Who are you?” she asked. 

“Matt! Matt, Mom! Your son!” 

She squinted at me. “Matt? I don’t know anyone named Matt,” she said. 
“Sure you do, Mom! Don’t you remember me? Remember that lullaby you 
used to sing to me when I was a baby?” 

She narrowed her eyes suspiciously. 

Greg and Pam appeared behind her. “Who is it, Mom?” Pam asked. 

“Greg!” I shouted. “Pam! It’s me, Matt! I’m back!” 

“Who is this kid?” Greg asked. 

“I don’t know him,” Pam said. 

Oh, no, I thought. Please don’t let this be happening. I’m so close.... 

“I need to sleep in my old room,” I begged. “Please, Mom. Let me go 
upstairs and sleep in my room. It’s a matter of life and death!” 

“I don’t know you,” Mom said. “And I don’t know any Matt. You have the 
wrong house.” 



“This kid is some kind of wacko,” Greg said. 

“Mom! Wait!” I cried. 

Mom slammed the door in my face. 

I turned around and started down the walk. What do I do now? I wondered. 
Then I stopped. I glanced down the block. Three people were running 
toward me. The last three people I wanted to see. Lacie, Bruce, and Wayne. The 
Reality Police! They’d found me! 



27 


“There he is!” Lacie pointed at me. The three of them started to run. 

“Get him!” 

I turned and ran. It wasn’t easy. I couldn’t run very fast. 

Why did I have to wake up chubby this time? 

I did have one advantage. I knew the neighborhood inside out—and they 
didn’t. I ran across the yard to the next-door neighbor’s house. 

I glanced back. The Reality Police were gaining on me. They were half a 
block away. 

I disappeared behind the neighbor’s house. Then I sneaked back around to 
my house. 

At the back of the garage is a line of thick shrubs. I threw myself behind the 
shrubs and held my breath. 

A few minutes later, three pairs of feet hurried past me. 

“Where’d he go?” I heard Lacie ask. 

“He must’ve gone the other way,” Wayne said. “Come on!” 

They ran off. 

Whew. I could breathe again. I let out a whoosh of air. 

Safe for now. But I knew the Reality Police would find me again. 

I had to get back to my room. But there was no way Mom would let me in. 
She thought I was a total nutcase. 

There was only one thing to do. I had to break into the house. 

I’d wait until nighttime. Till everyone was asleep. 

Then I’d find an open window somewhere—or break one if I had to. 

I’d sneak into my room and sleep there. I hoped I wouldn’t find someone 
else sleeping there. 

In the meantime, I had to wait for night. I stayed hidden behind the shrubs. I 
lay as still as I could. 

And I struggled to stay awake. I didn’t want to fall asleep again. 

If I fell asleep, who knew what I’d be? I might never get to my room. 

The hours ticked slowly by. At last night came. The neighborhood got 
quiet. 



I pulled myself out of the shrubs. My legs and arms ached from hiding. 

I looked at the house. Everyone had gone to bed, except for Mom. Her 
bedroom light was still on. 

I waited until it went off. I waited another half hour to give her time to fall 
sound asleep. 

Then I crept around to the front of the house. My room was on the second 
floor. 

I knew Mom had locked all the doors. I knew she’d locked all the first-floor 
windows. She did that every night. 

I had to climb to the second floor and sneak in through my window. It was 
the only way. 

I had to climb up the tree that grew by my window. Then reach out and grab 
the rain gutter. 

Then set myself down on the narrow ledge outside my window. I’d have to 
cling to the gutter for balance. 

If I could make it to the ledge, I might be able to open the window and 
crawl in. 

That was the plan, anyway. The more I thought about it, the more stupid it 
sounded. 

Better not think about it, then, I decided. Just do it. 

I stood up on my toes, stretching toward the lowest branch of the tree. It 
was just out of reach. I’d have to jump. 

I bent my knees and sprang up. My fingertips grazed the branch, but I 
couldn’t get a grip on it. 

If only I weren’t so chubby! I could barely get off the ground. 

I won’t give up, I vowed. If this doesn’t work, I’m doomed. 

So I took a deep breath. I gathered all my strength. 

I crouched down. I sprang up as high as I could. 

Yes! I grabbed the branch! 

I hung there for a second, wriggling. I kicked my legs. They were so heavy! 

I twisted around and walked my legs up the tree trunk. With a grunt of 
effort, I hoisted myself onto the branch. 

Whew. 

The rest of the tree was pretty easy. I climbed up until I reached the branch 
just outside my window. 

I grabbed a branch over my head as I stood up. I could just reach the rain 



gutter. I sure hoped it would hold. 

I grasped the gutter. I tried to put my foot on the window ledge. 

I missed. 

I was hanging by my fingertips from the gutter! 

I looked down. The ground seemed far away. 

I squeezed my lips shut to keep myself from screaming. 

I panted, hanging there. I had to get my foot on that ledge—or I’d fall. 

I wriggled to the left, trying to get closer to the ledge. CRACK! What was 
that? CRACK! The gutter! It wasn’t going to hold! 



28 


CRACK! 

I felt myself sink. The gutter was about to give way. 

I mustered all my strength. Clinging to the gutter, I stretched one leg out as 
far as it would go. My toes touched the window ledge. 

I set one foot down. Then the other. 

I made it! 

I crouched on the ledge. I clung to the gutter with one hand, for balance. 

I didn’t move. I tried to catch my breath. The night was cool. But I felt 
drops of sweat trickle down my face. I wiped them away with my free hand. 

I peered through the window. My room was dark. Was anybody in there? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The window was shut. 

Please don’t let it be locked, I prayed. 

If I couldn’t get in, I’d be stuck up on the ledge. I’d have no way to get 
down. 

Unless I fell down, of course. 

I carefully tried the window. It slid up. It wasn’t locked! 

I pushed it open. Then I crawled into the room. I tumbled onto the floor. 

I froze. Did anyone hear me? 

No sounds. Everyone was still asleep. 

I pulled myself to my feet. There was my bed! My old bed! And it was 
empty! 

I was so happy, I wanted to jump up and shout. But I didn’t. 

I’ll save the celebration for tomorrow, I decided. If my plan works. 

I took off my shoes and crawled into bed. I sighed. Clean sheets. 

It felt good to be back. Everything was almost normal. 

I was sleeping in my own bed. Mom and Pam and Greg were all asleep in 
their rooms. 

Okay, I didn’t look like myself. I didn’t have my old body back yet. 

And my family didn’t recognize me. If they saw me now, they’d think I was 
a burglar. Or a maniac. 



I pushed those things out of my mind. I wanted to think about the morning. 
What will happen tomorrow? I wondered sleepily. 

Who will I be when I wake up? Will my life be normal again? 

Or will I find Lacie and those two guys standing over me, ready to pounce? 
There was only one way to find out. I closed my eyes and drifted off to 
sleep. 



29 


I felt something warm on my face. Sunlight. 

I opened my eyes. Where was I? 

I glanced around. I was in a small, cramped, messy room full of junk. 

My old room! 

My heart skipped a beat. Did my plan work? Was I back to normal? 

I couldn’t wait to find out. I threw off the covers and jumped out of bed. I 
hurried to the mirror on the back of my bedroom door. 

I saw a skinny, blond, twelve-year-old boy. Yes! I was back! 

I was me again! 

“Woo-hoo!” I cried. 

Biggie nosed the door open and waddled into the room. He growled at me. 
He barked. 

“Biggie!” I cried happily. I bent down and hugged him. He snapped at me. 
Good old Biggie. 

“Matt!” I heard Mom’s voice call from the kitchen. My real mom’s voice. 
“Matt! Leave Biggie alone! Stop teasing him!” 

“I’m not teasing him!” I yelled back. She always blames me for everything. 
But I didn’t care! I was so glad to be back! 

I scrambled downstairs for breakfast. 

There they sat. Mom. Pam. Greg. Just the way I left them. 

“The geek enters the kitchen for his morning feeding,” Greg spoke into his 
tape recorder. “What does a geek eat? Let’s watch and find out.” 

“Greg!” I sang. I threw my arms around his neck and hugged him. 

“Hey!” He swatted me away. “Get off me, geek!” 

“And Pam!” I gave her a big hug too. 

“What’s your problem, pea-brain?” she snapped. “I know—you got 
kidnapped by aliens last night! Am I right? And they brainwashed you!” 

I ignored her jokes. I patted the top of her Brillo pad hair. 

“Cut it out!” she whined. 

I gave my mom the biggest hug of all. 

“Thanks, honey.” She patted me on the back. At least she was on my side, 



once in a while. 

“Get some cereal, Matt,” she said. “I’m running late.” 

I sighed happily and fixed myself some cereal. Everything was back to 
normal. No one even noticed I’d been gone. 

I’m never going into that stupid guest room again, I vowed. Never. I’m 
going to stay in my little room from now on—no matter how cramped it gets. 

THWACK! Something stung me on the back of the neck. 

I whirled around. Greg grinned at me. He held a straw in one hand. 

He spoke into the tape recorder. “What happens if you shoot a paper wad at 
the geek? How does he respond?” 

“I bet he cries like a baby,” Pam said. 

I shmgged and went back to my cereal. “You can’t bother me,” I said. “I’m 
too happy.” 

Pam and Greg exchanged glances. Pam twirled one finger at the side of her 
head. It was the international signal for “He’s nuts.” 

“Something has happened to the geek,” Greg announced. 

“Yeah,” Pam agreed. “The geek has changed.” 

School was so much fun that day. It was great to be in seventh grade again. So 
much easier than high school. 

We played soccer in gym. I even scored a goal. 

But on my way to my last class, I saw something that made my heart stop. 

A girl walking down the hall. About my age. Long, thick blond hair in a 
ponytail. 

Oh, no. 

Lacie! 

I froze. What should I do? 

Were the Reality Police still after me? I had fixed everything! They didn’t 
need to put me to sleep anymore! 

I’ve got to get out of here, I decided. I got ready to run. 

Then the girl turned around. She grinned at me. 

It wasn’t Lacie. Just some girl with long blond hair. 

I took a deep breath. I need to relax, I thought. 

It’s over now. It was all a bad dream. Sort of. 

The girl walked away. I went to my last class. No sign of Lacie, Bruce, or 
Wayne anywhere. 



I whistled all the way home, thinking about how easy my homework was going 
to be. 

I walked into the house. “Hi, Matt!” Mom called. 

“Mom?” I was surprised to see her. She was usually at work when I got 
home. “What are you doing home so early?” 

She smiled at me. “I took the day off,” she explained. “I had a few things to 
do around the house.” 

“Oh.” I shrugged and turned on the TV. 

Mom switched it off. “Matt—aren’t you curious?” 

“Curious? About what?” 

“About what I’ve been doing all day?” 

I glanced around the living room. Everything looked the same. 

“I don’t know,” I said. “What have you been doing?” 

She smiled again. She looked excited about something. 

“Have you forgotten?” she said. “It’s your birthday this week!” 

Actually, I had forgotten. So much weird stuff had been going on. 

When you’re running for your life, you don’t think much about your 
birthday. 

“I have a special surprise for you,” Mom said. “Come upstairs and I’ll show 
you.” 

I followed her upstairs. I started getting excited. What could the surprise 
be? 

It wasn’t like Mom to make such a big deal about my birthday. The surprise 
must be something really great, I decided. 

She stopped in front of my bedroom door. 

“Is the surprise in my room?” I asked. 

“Look.” She pushed open the door. 

I peered inside. My room was filled with cartons. Big boxes from floor to 
ceiling. 

Wow! 

“Are all those presents for me?” I asked. 

Mom laughed. “Presents? All those boxes? Of course not!” She cracked up. 

I knew it had to be too good to be true. 

“Well—what’s the surprise, then?” I asked. 

“Matt,” she began, “I’ve been thinking about what you said the other day. 



And I decided you were right. Your room is too small for you. So I’ve turned it 
into a storage closet.” 

“You—you what?” 

“That’s right.” She walked across the hall. 

She threw open the guest room door. “Ta-da!” 

No. Oh, no. 

It can’t be. Not that. 

“Happy Birthday, Matt!” Mom shouted. “Welcome to your new room!” 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I couldn’t say a word. 

My bed, my dresser, all my posters and books—they were all set up in the 
guest room. 

“Matt? What’s the matter?” Mom cried. “This is what you said you 
wanted!” 

My mouth fell open. I started to scream. 






THE BLOB THAT 
ATE EVERYONE 

Goosebumps - 55 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“I used to believe in monsters,” Alex said. She pushed her glasses up on her 
nose. Her nose twitched. With her pink face and round cheeks, she looked like a 
tall, blonde bunny rabbit. 

“When I was little, I thought that a monster lived in my sock drawer,” Alex 
told me. “You won’t believe this, Zackie. But I never opened that drawer. I used 
to wear my sneakers without socks. Sometimes I tried to go barefoot to 
kindergarten. I was too scared to open that drawer. I knew the sock monster 
would bite my hand off! ” 

She laughed. Alex has the strangest laugh. It sounds more like a whistle 
than a laugh. “Wheeeeeeh! Wheeeeeh!” 

She shook her head, and her blonde ponytail shook with her. “Now that I’m 
twelve, I’m a lot smarter,” she said. “Now I know that there is no such thing as 
monsters.” 

That’s what Alex said to me two seconds before we were attacked by the 
monster. 


* * * 


It was spring vacation, and Alex and I were out collecting things. That’s what we 
do when we can’t think of anything better. 

Sometimes we collect weird-looking weeds. Sometimes we collect bugs. Or 
odd-shaped leaves. 

Once, we collected stones that looked like famous people. That didn’t last 
long. We couldn’t find too many. 

If you get the idea that Norwood Village is a boring town—you’re right! 

I mean, it was boring until the monster attacked. 

Alex Iarocci lives next door to me. And she is my best friend. 

Adam Levin, who lives across town, is my best friend too. I think a person 
should have a lot of best friends! 

I’m not sure why Alex has a boy’s name. I think it’s short for Alexandria. 
But she won’t tell me. 



She complains about her name all the time. It gives her a lot of trouble. 

Last year at school, Alex was assigned to a boys’ gym class. And she gets 
mail addressed to Mr. Alex Iarocci. 

Sometimes people have trouble with my name too. Zackie Beauchamp. My 
last name is pronounced BEECH-am. But no one ever knows how to say it. 

Why am I going on about names like this? I think I know why. 

You see, when the Blob Monster attacked, I was so scared, I forgot my own 
name! 

Alex and I had decided to collect worms. Only purple worms—no brown ones. 

That made the search more interesting. 

It had rained the day before, a long, steady, spring rain. Our backyards were 
still soft and spongy. 

The worms were coming up for air. They poked through the wet grass. And 
wriggled onto the driveway. 

We were both crouched down, searching for purple ones—when I heard a 
loud, squishy sound behind me. 

I spun around quickly. 

And gasped when I saw the monster. “Alex—look!” 

She turned too. And a whistling sound escaped her mouth. “Wheeeeh!” 
Only this time, she wasn’t laughing. 

I dropped the worm I had been carrying and took a biiig step back. 

“It—it looks like a giant human heart!” Alex cried. 

She was right. 

The monster made another loud squish as it bounced over the grass toward 
us. It bounced like a giant beach ball, taller than Alex and me. Nearly as tall as 
the garage! 

It was pink and wet. And throbbing. 

BRUM BRRUUM BRUMMM. It pulsed like a heart. 

It had two tiny black eyes. The eyes glowed and stared straight ahead. 

On top of the pink blob, I thought I saw curled-up snakes. But as I stared in 
horror, I realized they weren’t snakes. They were thick, purple veins—arteries 
tied together in a knot. 

BRRUUUM BRUM BRUMM. 

The monster throbbed and bounced. 

“Ohhhhhh!” I groaned as I saw the sticky trail of white slime it left behind 



on the grass. 

Alex and I were taking giant steps—backwards. We didn’t want to turn our 
backs on the ugly thing. 

“Unh unh unh!” Terrified groans escaped my throat. My heart had to be 
pounding at a hundred miles an hour! 

I took another step back. Then another. 

And as I backed away, I saw a crack open up in the creature’s middle. 

At first I thought the pink blob was cracking apart. 

But as the crack grew wider, I realized I was staring at its mouth. 

The mouth opened wider. Wider. 

Wide enough to swallow a human! 

And then a fat purple tongue plopped out. The tongue made a wet SPLAT as 
it hit the grass. 

“Ohhhhh. ” I groaned again. My stomach lurched. I nearly lost my lunch. 

The end of the tongue was shaped like a shovel. A fat, sticky, purple shovel. 

To shovel people into the gaping mouth? 

Thick, white slime poured from the monster’s mouth. “It—it’s drooling !” I 
choked out. 

“Run!” Alex cried. 

I turned—and tripped on the edge of the driveway. 

I landed hard on my elbows and knees. 

And looked back—in time to see the drooling, pink mouth open wider as 
the tongue wrapped around me... pulling me, pulling me in. 



2 


Alex stared at me, her mouth open wide. “Zackie, that is awesomel” she 
declared. 

Adam scratched his curly, black hair and made a face. “You call that 
scary?” He rolled his eyes. “That’s about as scary as Goldilocks and the Three 
Bears. ” 

I held the pages of my story in one hand. I rolled them up and took a swing 
at Adam with them. 

He laughed and ducked out of my reach. 

“That is an awesome story!” Alex repeated. “What do you call it?” 

“ ‘Adventure of the Blob Monster’,” I told her. 

“Oh, wow,” Adam exclaimed sarcastically. “Did you think that up all by 
yourself?” 

Alex gave Adam a hard shove that sent him tumbling onto the couch. “Give 
Zackie a break,” she muttered. 

The three of us were hanging out in Adam’s house. We were squeezed into 
what his parents call the rec room. 

The room is so small. Only a couch and a TV fit. 

It was spring vacation, and we were hanging out because we didn’t know 
what else to do. The night before, I stayed up till midnight, working on my scary 
story about the Blob Monster. 

I want to be a writer when I grow up. I write scary stories all the time. Then 
I read them to Alex and Adam. 

They always react in the same way. Alex always likes my stories. She 
thinks they’re really scary. She says that my stories are so good, they give her 
nightmares. 

Adam always says my stories aren’t scary at all. He says he can write better 
stories with one hand tied behind his back. 

But he never does. 

Adam is big and red-cheeked and chubby. He looks a little like a bear. He 
likes to punch people and wrestle around. Just for fun. He’s actually a good guy. 

He just never likes my stories. 

“What’s wrong with this story?” I asked him. 



The three of us were crammed onto the couch now. There was nowhere else 
to sit. 

“Stories never scare me,” Adam replied. He picked an ant off the couch 
arm, put it between his thumb and finger, and shot it at me. 

He missed. 

“I thought the story was really scary,” Alex said. “I thought you had really 
good description.” 

“I never get scared by books or stories,” Adam insisted. “Especially stories 
about dumb monsters.” 

“Well—what does scare you?” Alex demanded. 

“Nothing,” Adam bragged. “I don’t get scared by movies, either. Nothing 
ever scares me.” 

And then he opened his mouth wide in a scream of horror. 

All three of us did. 

We leaped off the couch—as a terrifying screech rang through the room. 

And a black shadow swept over the floor. 



3 


The shadow swooped by our feet, so fast I could barely see it. 

I felt something brush my ankle. Something soft—and ghostlike. 

“Whoooa!” Adam cried. 

I heard hurried footsteps from the living room. Mr. Levin—Adam’s dad— 
burst into the doorway. With his curly black hair and bearlike, round body, Mr. 
Levin looks a lot like Adam. 

“Sorry about that!” he exclaimed. “I stepped on the cat. Did it run past 
here?” 

We didn’t answer him. 

We were so stunned, we all burst out laughing. 

Mr. Levin frowned at us. “I don’t see what’s so funny,” he muttered. He 
spotted the cat, hiding beside the couch. He picked it up and hurried away. 

The three of us dropped back onto the couch. I was still breathing hard. And 
I could still feel the brush of the cat on my ankle. 

“See, Zackie?” Adam cried. He slapped me hard on the back—so hard I 
nearly fell off the couch. “That was a lot scarier than any story you could write.” 

“No way!” I insisted. “I can write a scarier story than that. The dumb cat 
just surprised us.” 

Alex pulled off her glasses and wiped the lenses on her T-shirt. “What a 
screech that cat made!” she exclaimed, shaking her head. 

“I wasn’t scared at all,” Adam claimed. “I was just trying to scare you 
guys.” He reached over and rubbed the palm of his hand back and forth over my 
head. 

Don’t you hate it when people do that? 

I slugged him as hard as I could. 

He only laughed. 

Alex and I stayed for dinner. Mrs. Levin is a great cook. We always try to be 
around Adam’s house at dinnertime because she always invites us to stay. 

It was dark by the time Alex and I started to walk home. We’d had 
thunderstorms the day before and most of today. The lawns glistened from the 
rain. The wet street reflected the glow of street lights. 



I could hear the crackle of thunder somewhere faraway. As Alex and I made 
our way along the sidewalk, cold rainwater dripped on us from the trees. 

Adam lives on the other side of Norwood Village. But it isn’t a very long 
walk—only about fifteen minutes. 

We walked for about five minutes when we came to a row of little shops. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when the antique store on the corner came into view. 
“It—it’s been totaled!” 

“It looks as if a bomb hit it!” Alex exclaimed. 

We stayed on the corner, staring across the street at it. Part of the roof had 
fallen in. All the windows were shattered. One wall had nearly caved in. The 
shingles on the walls and the roof had been burned black. 

“Was it a fire?” I wondered, leading the way across the street. 

“Lightning,” a woman’s voice replied. 

I turned to see two young women on the sidewalk beside the store. “It was 
struck by lightning,” one of them said. “Yesterday. During the big storm. The 
lightning started a huge fire.” 

“What a mess,” the other woman sighed. She pulled car keys from her 
pocketbook. 

The two women disappeared around the corner, tsk-tsking about the store. 

Alex and I stepped up to the front. 

“Ooh, it stinks,” Alex groaned, holding her nose. 

“It just smells burned,” I replied. I glanced down and saw that I had stepped 
into a deep puddle. 

I jumped back. 

“It’s soaked everywhere,” Alex murmured. “From the fire hoses, I guess.” 

A gust of wind made the front door bang. 

“It’s open!” I exclaimed. 

The door had been taped shut. But the tape had broken off. A large yellow 
sign on the door declared in big black letters: DANGER—KEEP OUT. 

“Alex—let’s take a peek,” I urged. 

“No way! Zackie—stop!” Alex cried. 

Too late. I was already inside. 



4 


I took a couple of steps into the shop and waited for my eyes to adjust to the 
darkness. Water dripped everywhere. An entire wall of shelves had toppled over. 
Broken vases, and lamps, and small statues lay scattered over the puddled floor. 

“Zackie—!” Alex grabbed my shoulder. “Zackie—get out of here!” she 
whispered. “This is really dangerous.” 

“Leave the door open,” I told her. “We need the light from the street.” 

“But what do you want to see?” Her voice echoed over the PLUNK PLUNK 
PLUNK of dripping water. 

She grabbed my other arm and started to tug me out. “Come on. You saw 
the sign. The whole building may fall in on us.” 

I jerked my arm away. My sneakers squished as I walked. The carpet was 
soaked. 

“I just want to look around for one second,” I told Alex impatiently. “This 
is cool!” 

“It isn’t cool,” she argued. “It’s really stupid.” 

A row of ugly antique masks stared at us from one wall. The masks were 
tilted at odd angles. Other masks stared up from where they had fallen on the 
floor. 

A tall wooden clock had its face burned black. Wooden duck decoys lay on 
their sides, burned and cracked. 

A creaking sound overhead made me jump. I heard Alex gasp. 

I raised my eyes to the ceiling. Part of it had fallen in. Was the rest about to 
collapse on top of us? 

“Zackie—let’s go!” Alex urged. She backed up toward the door. Her shoes 
squished over the soaked carpet. 

The door banged shut behind us. I turned and saw the wind blow it back 
open. 

PLINK PLINK Cold water dripped onto my shoulder. 

“If you don’t come, I’m going without you!” Alex called. “I mean it, 
Zackie.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. “I’m coming. I just wanted to check out what 
happened.” 



“Hurry!” Alex urged. She was halfway out the door. 

I turned and started to follow her. 

But I stopped when something on a high shelf caught my eye. 

“Hey, Alex—” I called. “Look!” 

I pointed up to an old typewriter. “Wow. My dad used to have one like that 
when I was real little,” I said. 

“Zackie—I’m leaving,” Alex warned. 

“I love old typewriters!” I cried. “Look, Alex. I don’t think the fire hurt it. I 
think it’s in good shape. I just have to check it out. Okay?” 

I didn’t wait for her to reply. 

I crossed the room. Stepped up to the shelf. Stood on tiptoe and reached for 
the old typewriter. 

“OWWWWWWW!” 

I felt a hard shock of pain. It shot through my body. 

Stunned me. 

Took away my breath. 

Over my stunned cry, I heard the sharp crackle of electricity. 

And I bent over—helpless—as a bright blue flame shot around my body. 



5 


Blue. 

I saw only blue. 

The deepest blue I’d ever seen. 

I’m floating in the sky, I realized. I’m weightless. And I’m floating. 
Floating in the blue, blue sky. 

The blue faded to white. 

Was I still floating? Was I moving at all? 

Was I breathing? 

I struggled to speak. To shout. To make any kind of a sound. 

The white faded quickly. To gray. Then black. 

“Ohhhh,” I heard myself moan. 

Dark. So dark now. I was surrounded by darkness. 

I blinked. Blinked again. And realized I was staring into the darkness of the 
mined antique shop. 

“Zackie? Zackie?” 

I heard my name. Heard Alex repeating my name. 

I cleared my throat. I sat up. My eyes darted around the store. 

“Zackie? Zackie? Are you okay?” 

I tried to shake my dizziness away. My whole body tingled. Tingled and 
hummed, as if an electrical current were running through me. 

“How did I get on the floor?” I asked weakly. 

Alex leaned over me, one hand on my shoulder. “You got a shock,” she 
said, squinting hard at me through her glasses. “There must be a wire down or 
something.” 

I rubbed the back of my neck. I couldn’t stop the strange tingling or the 
steady hum in my ears. 

“Wow,” I murmured. 

“It was a real bad shock,” Alex said softly. “I—I was so scared. You were 
inside a blue flame. Your whole body—it turned bright blue.” 

“Wow,” I repeated, still fighting the dizziness. 

“Your hands shot up in the air,” Alex continued. “And then you bent in two. 



And fell to the floor. I—I thought...” Her voice trailed off. 

PLINKPLINK. 

I could hear the drip of water again. The hum in my ears had faded. 

I pulled myself shakily to my feet. I stretched my arms over my head, trying 
to stop the strange tingling. 

The old typewriter caught my eye again. 

“Zackie—what are you doing?” Alex cried. 

I moved carefully to the shelf, stepping around a puddle of water on the 
carpet. I took a deep breath. Stretched up on tiptoe. And pulled the old 
typewriter down. 

“Whoa—! It weighs a ton!” I cried. “It’s solid metal!” 

I held it in my arms and examined it. The sleek black surface caught the 
glow of the streetlight outside the door. The round keys poked up toward me. 

“It’s awesome!” I exclaimed. “This typewriter, Alex—it’s perfect for 
writing scary stories on.” 

“Are you crazy?” Alex declared. “Zackie, I think that electric shock messed 
up your brain!” 

“But look at it!” I insisted excitedly. “It’s perfect. Perfect!” 

Alex rolled her eyes. “You have a brand-new computer at home,” she 
reminded me. “And your mom gave you her old laser printer—remember?” 

“I know, I know,” I muttered. 

“You can print eight pages a minute,” Alex continued. “So what do you 
need a creaky old typewriter for?” 

“I need it because it’s perfect,” I told her. “Perfect! Perfect!” 

“Stop repeating that word,” she snapped. “Are you sure you’re feeling 
okay? That was a horrible shock. Maybe I should call your parents.” 

“No. No, I’m fine,” I insisted. The typewriter was growing heavy in my 
arms. “Let’s just go.” 

Lugging the typewriter, I started to the door. But Alex blocked my path. 

“You can’t just take it!” she scolded. “It doesn’t belong to you. That’s 
stealing.” 

I made a face at her. “Alex, don’t be dumb. Everything in this store is 
wrecked. Nobody will care if I take—” 

I stopped with a gasp when I heard the squish of shoes on the wet carpet. 

Then I heard a cough. 

I turned to Alex. Caught the fear on her face. 



She heard the sounds too. 

“Zackie, we’re not alone in here,” she whispered. 



6 


Another squishy footstep. Closer. 

A chill swept down my back. I nearly dropped the typewriter. 

“Hide,” I whispered. I didn’t need to suggest it. Alex was already slipping 
behind a tall display shelf. 

I set the typewriter down on the floor. Then I crept behind the shelf and 
huddled close to Alex. 

I heard another cough. And then a circle of light moved across the wet 
carpet. The pale yellow beam of a flashlight. 

The light slid over the floor. Then it started to climb the display case. Alex 
and I ducked low. The circle of light washed over our heads. 

My legs were trembling. I gripped the back of the case with both hands to 
keep myself from falling over. 

“Hello?” a voice called. A woman’s voice. “Hello? Is someone in here?” 

Alex turned to me. She motioned with her head. 

She was silently asking if we should step out and show ourselves. 

I shook my head no. 

How could we explain what we were doing inside the shop? How could we 
explain why we were hiding? 

Maybe the woman will leave, I told myself. Maybe she won’t find us. 

Who is she? I wondered. Does she own the store? 

I peered out around the bottom shelf. I could see the woman from the side. 
She was African-American. She had very short, dark hair. She wore a long 
raincoat. 

She moved the flashlight beam along the back wall. It lit up the fallen shelf, 
the broken antiques. 

Her footsteps slogged over the wet carpet. 

“Hello?” she called. “Did someone come in here?” 

I held my breath. 

Please leave, I begged silently. Please don’t catch us here. 

The woman turned. Her light stopped on the typewriter in the middle of the 
floor. She kept the light steady, staring at the typewriter. 



I knew what she was thinking: How did the typewriter get on the floor? 
Slowly, she raised the light. Raised it back to the display shelf. 

She stared right at us! 

Could she see us hiding behind the display case? 

I froze. I pretended to be a statue. 

Did she see us? 

No. 

She muttered something to herself. The light went out. 

I blinked in the sudden darkness. Her footsteps moved away. 

I realized I was still holding my breath. I let it out slowly, trying not to 
make a sound. 

Silence now. And darkness. 

No footsteps. No beam of yellow light. 

The front door banged shut. 

Alex and I exchanged glances. 

Was the woman gone? Did she leave the shop? 

We didn’t move. 

We waited. And listened. 

Silence... 

Then Alex sneezed. 

“Gotcha!” the woman cried from somewhere behind us. 



7 


A hand grabbed my shoulder. Hard. 

The sleeve of the raincoat brushed my face as the woman tugged me out 
from behind the shelf. I nearly tripped over the typewriter. The woman held me 
up by one arm. 

Alex stepped up beside me. Her ponytail had come undone. Her blonde hair 
was wild around her face. She kept swallowing hard, making dry, clicking 
sounds with her tongue. 

I guessed she was as frightened as I was. 

The woman switched her flashlight on. She raised it to my face, then to 
Alex’s. 

“Were you doing some late shopping?” she demanded. 

“Huh?” I managed to choke out. 

“The store is closed. Couldn’t you tell?” the woman snapped. 

She was young and pretty. She locked her dark eyes on me. 

“What are you doing in here?” she asked. 

I opened my mouth to answer, but no sound came out. 

“Uh... nothing,” Alex said weakly. “We weren’t doing anything.” 

The woman narrowed her eyes at Alex. “Then why were you hiding?” 

“You f-frightened us,” I stammered, finally finding my voice. 

“Well, you frightened me too!” the woman exclaimed. “You frightened me 
plenty. I was in the back room, and...” 

“We were walking home. We saw the store. How it was wrecked,” I 
explained. “We just wanted to see what it looked like inside. So we came in. 
That’s all.” 

The woman lowered the light to the floor. “I see,” she said softly. 

Her shoe made a squishing sound on the carpet. Water dripped steadily 
from the ceiling behind us. 

“What a mess,” the woman sighed. Her eyes traveled around the ruined 
shop. “I’m Mrs. Carter. I own this store. What’s left of it.” 

“We—we’re sorry,” Alex stammered. 

“You shouldn’t be in here,” Mrs. Carter scolded. “It’s very dangerous. 



Some of the electrical wires are down. You didn’t touch anything—did you?” 

“No. Not really,” Alex replied. 

“Well... just this old typewriter,” I said, gazing down at it. 

“I wondered how it got down there,” Mrs. Carter said. “Why did you move 

it?” 

“I... like it,” I told her. “It’s really cool.” 

“Zackie writes stories,” Alex told Mrs. Carter. “Scary stories.” 

Mrs. Carter let out a bitter laugh. “Well, you could certainly write a scary 
story about this place!” 

“I’ll bet I could write awesome scary stories on that old typewriter,” I said, 
staring down at it. 

“You want it?” Mrs. Carter asked quickly. 

“Yes,” I answered. “Is it for sale? How much does it cost?” 

Mrs. Carter motioned with one hand. “Take it,” she said. 

“Excuse me?” I didn’t think I’d heard her correctly. 

“Go ahead. Take it,” she repeated. “It’s yours. For free.” 

“Do you mean it?” I cried excitedly. “I can have it?” 

She nodded. 

“Thank you!” I could feel a grin spreading over my face. “Thanks a lot!” 

Mrs. Carter bent down and picked up something from the floor. “Here,” she 
said. She handed me a fountain pen. A very old-fashioned-looking fountain pen. 
Heavy and black with silvery chrome on it. 

“For me?” I asked, studying the pen. 

Mrs. Carter nodded again. She smiled at me. “It’s my Going-Out-of- 
Business Special Offer. You get a free pen with every typewriter.” 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. 

Mrs. Carter moved to the door and held it open. “Now, get out of here. Both 
of you,” she ordered. “It really is dangerous in here. I’m leaving too.” 

I hoisted the heavy, old typewriter into my arms. Balancing it against my 
chest, I followed Alex to the door. 

I felt so happy! I thanked Mrs. Carter five more times. Then Alex and I said 
good-bye and headed for our homes. 

The street was still wet. It glowed under the streetlights like a mirror. It 
didn’t look real. 

The walk home seemed to take forever. The typewriter grew heavier with 
each step I took. 



“Weird,” Alex muttered when we finally crossed onto our block. 

“Huh?” I groaned. My arms were about to fall off! The typewriter weighed 
a ton! 

“What’s weird, Alex?” 

“The way she gave you that valuable typewriter,” Alex replied thoughtfully. 
“Why is that so weird?” I demanded. 

“She seemed so eager to give it away. It’s almost as if she wanted to get rid 
of it,” Alex said. She headed toward her house, which is next door to mine. 

My knees buckled as I started up my driveway. My arms ached. My whole 
body ached. I struggled to hold on to the typewriter. 

“That’s crazy,” I muttered. 

Of course, I didn’t know how right Alex was. 

I didn’t know that carrying the old typewriter home would totally ruin my 

life. 



8 


I dragged the typewriter into the ranch house where I live. I was gasping for 
breath. My arms had gone numb. 

Mom and Dad were in the living room. They sat side by side on the couch, 
doing a crossword puzzle together. 

They love crossword puzzles. I’m not sure why. Both of them are terrible 
spellers. They can never finish a puzzle. 

Lots of times, they end up fighting about how to spell a word. Usually, they 
give up and rip the puzzle to pieces. 

Then a few days later, they start a new one. 

They both looked up as I lugged the typewriter toward my room. 

“What’s that?” Mom demanded. 

“It’s a typewriter,” I groaned. 

“I know that!” Mom protested. “I meant—where did you get it?” 

“It’s... a long story,” I choked out. 

Dad climbed up from the couch and hurried over to help me. “Wow. It 
weighs a ton,” he said. “How did you ever carry it home?” 

I shrugged. “It wasn’t so bad,” I lied. 

We carried it to my room and set it down on my desk. I wanted to try it out 
right away. But Dad insisted that I return to the living room. 

I told them the whole story. About lightning hitting the store. About going 
in to explore. About Mrs. Carter and how she gave me the typewriter. 

I left out the part about the bad electrical shock that knocked me to the 
floor. 

My parents are the kind of people who get upset very easily. I mean, they 
start yelling and screaming over crossword puzzles! 

So I never tell them much. I mean, why ruin their day—or mine? 

“Why do you need an old typewriter?” Mom asked, frowning at me. “No 
one uses typewriters anymore. You only see them in antique shops.” 

“I want to write my scary stories on it,” I explained. 

“What about your new computer?” Dad demanded. “What about the laser 
printer we gave you?” 



“I’ll use that too,” I said. “You know. For school-work and stuff like that.” 
Mom rolled her eyes. “Next Zackie will be writing with a feather quill and 
an inkwell,” she said. 

They both laughed. 

“Very funny,” I muttered. I said good-night and hurried down the hall to my 
room. 

I turned the corner that led to my bedroom—and stopped. 

What was that strange crackling sound? 

It seemed to be coming from my room. A steady, crackling buzz. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

I stepped into the doorway, peered into my room—and gasped! 



9 


“My typewriter!” I cried. 

The typewriter was bathed in a bright blue glow. Blue sparks buzzed and 
crackled off and flew in all directions. 

I stared in amazement as the blue current snapped and hummed over the 
typewriter. 

I thought about the shock that had knocked me to the floor in the antique 
shop. Had the typewriter stored up some of that electricity? 

No. That was impossible. 

But then why was the typewriter glowing under a crackling, blue current 
now? 

“Mom! Dad!” I called. “Come here! You have to see this!” 

They didn’t reply. 

I hurtled down the hall to the living room. “Quick! Come quick!” I shouted. 
“You won’t believe this!” 

They had returned to their crossword puzzle. Dad glanced up as I burst into 
the room. “How do you spell 'peregrine’?” he asked. “It’s a kind of falcon.” 

“Who cares?” I cried. “My typewriter—it’s going to blow up or 
something!” 

That got them off the couch. 

I led the way, running full speed down the hall. They followed close behind. 

I stopped at my doorway and pointed to my desk. “Look—!” I cried. 

All three of us peered across the room. 

At the typewriter. The black metal typewriter with its black roller and rows 
of black keys ringed with silver. 

No blue. 

No blue electrical current. No sparks. No crackle or buzz. 

Just an old typewriter sitting on a desk. 

“Funny joke,” Dad muttered, rolling his eyes at me. 

Mom shook her head. “I don’t know where Zackie gets his sense of humor. 
Not from my side of the family.” 

“Your side of the family doesn’t need a sense of humor. They’re already a 



joke!” Dad snapped. 

They walked off arguing. 

I edged slowly, carefully, into my room. I crept up to the typewriter. 
I reached out a hand. I lowered it toward the typewriter. 

Lowered it until it was less than an inch away. 

Then I stopped. 

My hand started to shake. 

I stared down at the solid, dark machine. 

Should I touch it? 

Would it shock me again? 

Slowly... slowly, I lowered my hand. 



10 


Alex slammed her locker shut. She adjusted her backpack and turned to me. “So 
what happened? Did the typewriter zap you?” 

It was the next morning. Spring vacation was over. School had started 
again. 

I had hurried down the hall to our lockers to tell Alex the whole typewriter 
story. I knew she was the only person in the world who would believe me. 

“No. It didn’t zap me,” I told her. “I touched it, and nothing happened. I 
pushed down some of the keys. I turned the roller. Nothing happened.” 

Alex stared hard at me. “Nothing?” 

“Nothing.” 

“That isn’t a very good story,” she teased. “It has a very weak ending.” 

I laughed. “Do you think it would be a better ending if I got fried?” 

“Much better,” she replied. 

It was late. The first bell had already rung. The hall was nearly empty. 

“I’m going to rewrite the Blob Monster story,” I told her. “I have a lot of 
new ideas. I can’t wait to start working on it.” 

She turned to me. “On the old typewriter?” 

I nodded. “I’m going to make the story longer—and scarier. That old 
typewriter is so weird. I know it’s going to help me write scarier than ever!” I 
exclaimed. 

I heard giggling. 

I spun around and saw Emmy and Annie Bell. They’re twins, and they’re in 
our class. Adam came trailing after them. He punched me in the shoulder—so 
hard, I bounced against the lockers. 

Emmy and Annie are good friends with Adam. But not with Alex and me. 

They both have curly red hair, lots of freckles, and lots of dimples. The only 
way to tell Emmy from Annie is to ask, “Which one are you?” 

Emmy grinned at me. I mean, I think it was Emmy. “Do you really believe 
in monsters?” she asked. 

They both giggled again, as if Emmy had asked something really funny. 

“Maybe,” I replied. “But I wasn’t talking about real monsters. I was talking 
about a scary story I’m writing.” 



And then I added nastily, “You two wouldn’t understand—since you 
haven’t learned to write yet!” 

“Ha-ha,” they both said sarcastically. “You’re so funny, Zackie.” 

“Funny-looking!” Adam added. The oldest joke in the universe. 

“But do you believe in monsters?” Emmy insisted. 

“Adam says you do,” her sister added. “Adam says you think a monster 
lives under your bed!” 

“I do not!” I screamed. 

They both giggled. 

“Adam is a liar!” I cried. I tried to grab him, but he dodged away from me, 
laughing his head off. 

“Zackie sees monsters everywhere,” Adam teased, grinning at Emmy and 
Annie. “He thinks when he opens his locker door, a monster will jump out at 
him.” 

They giggled again. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. “We’re going to be late.” 

I turned away from their grinning faces. I turned the lock on my locker and 
pulled open the door. 

Then I knelt down to pull out my books. 

And something leaped out of my locker! 

I saw a white flash. 

“Huh?” I cried out in surprise. 

Another one jumped out. 

And then I gasped when something plopped onto my head. Something 
alive! 

I fell to my knees. Reached up to grab for it. I felt its claws tangle in my 
hair. “Help!” I cried. “Help me!” 



11 


The creature moved across my head. 

And dropped down the back of my shirt! 

Its hot body slid down my skin. Its claws prickled and pinched. 

“Help me! Help!” I jumped up, kicking and stomping and squirming. 

I frantically slapped at my back. 

Adam stepped up to me. He grabbed me by the shoulders. Then he tugged 
open the back of my shirt. 

And plucked the creature off my back. 

He held his hand in front of my face. “Wow! What a monster!” he 
exclaimed. “That’s scaaaaaaryl” 

Still trembling, I stared at the creature. 

A white mouse. 

A little white mouse. 

Emmy and Annie were doubled over beside Adam, laughing their heads off. 

Even Alex was laughing. Great friend, huh? 

“Zackie, I guess you really do see monsters everywhere!” Annie exclaimed. 
“Even teeny white ones!” 

That got them all laughing again. 

“Did you see that awesome dance he did?” Adam asked. Adam did an 
imitation of my frantic dance. He slapped at his head and neck and stomped 
wildly on the floor. 

“Excellent!” Emmy and Annie declared together. 

They all laughed again. 

Alex stopped laughing and stepped up beside me. She brushed something 
off my shoulder. 

“Mouse hair,” she murmured. 

Then she turned to the others. “We should give Zackie a break,” she told 
them. “Someday he’s going to be a famous horror writer.” 

“Someday he’s going to be a famous chicken !” Annie exclaimed. 

Emmy made clucking sounds and flapped her elbows. 

“Do you believe it? The famous horror writer is afraid of mice!” Adam 



cried. 

Emmy and Annie thought that was really funny. Their red hair bobbed up 
and down as they laughed. 

Emmy glanced at her watch—and gasped. “We’re really late!” 

She and her sister spun around and ran down the hall. Adam put the mouse 
in his pocket and went tearing after them. 

I knelt down to pull my books from the bottom of my locker. I reached in 
carefully. I had to make sure there were no more mice. 

Alex stood over me. “You okay?” she asked softly. 

“Go away,” I snapped. 

“What did I do?” Alex demanded. 

“Just go away,” I muttered. 

I didn’t want her around. I didn’t want anyone around. 

I felt like a total jerk. 

Why did I let little mice scare me like that? Why did I have to freak out in 
front of everyone? 

Because I’m a total jerk, I decided. 

I shoved books and a Trapper Keeper into my backpack. Then I stood up 
and started to close my locker. 

Alex leaned against the wall. “I told you to go away,” I snapped at her 
again. 

She started to reply, but stopped when Mr. Conklin, the principal, turned the 
corner. 

Mr. Conklin is a tall, pencil-thin man, with a narrow, red face and big ears 
that stick out like jug handles. He talks really fast. Always runs instead of 
walking. And always seems to be moving in eight directions at once. 

He eyed Alex, then me. “Who let the mice out of the science lab?” he 
demanded breathlessly. 

“Th-they were in Zackie’s locker—” Alex started. 

Before she could explain the rest, Mr. Conklin narrowed his eyes at me. His 
face grew even redder. 

“Zackie, I’d like to see you in my office,” he ordered. “Right now.” 



12 


I didn’t say much at dinner. 

I kept wondering if I should tell Mom and Dad about my adventures at 
school that day. But I decided to keep silent. 

I didn’t need them laughing at me too. 

And I didn’t need them asking a million questions about what Mr. Conklin 
said to me. 

He had been pretty nice about it, actually. He just warned me to try to keep 
live creatures out of my locker. 

After dinner, Dad and I loaded the dishwasher and cleaned up. I was 
sponging off the dinner table when Alex appeared. “How’s it going?” she asked. 
“Did Mr. Conklin—” 

I slapped a hand over her mouth to shut her up. 

I could see Mom and Dad watching from the other room. “What about Mr. 
Conklin?” Mom demanded. 

“He’s a nice guy,” I replied. 

I dragged Alex to the den. “So? How’s it going?” she repeated. 

“How’s it going?” I cried shrilly. “How’s it going? How can you ask me 
‘how’s it going’?” 

“Well...” she started. 

“It’s going terrible !” I cried. “I had the worst day! Kids were laughing at 
me all day. Everywhere I went, kids made mouse faces at me and squeaked at 
me.” 

She started to smile, but cut it off. 

“I don’t know why I lost it like that this morning,” I continued. “I felt so 
dumb. I—” 

“It was just a joke,” Alex interrupted. “No big deal.” 

“Easy for you to say,” I grumbled. “You didn’t have a hundred disgusting 
rodents crawling all over your body.” 

“A hundred?” Alex said. “How about one?” 

“It seemed like a hundred,” I mumbled. I decided to change the subject. 
“Look at this,” I said. 

I walked over to the desk by the window. After school, I had worked there 



for three hours. I picked up a stack of pages. 

“What are those?” Alex asked, following me to the desk. 

“My new Blob Monster story,” I replied, holding up the handwritten pages. 
“I’m making it even scarier.” 

Alex took the pages from my hand and shuffled through them. Then she 
narrowed her eyes at me. “You didn’t type them on the old typewriter?” 

“Of course not.” I took the pages back. “I always write the first draft by 
hand. I don’t type my stories until I’ve got them just right.” 

I picked up the pen from the desk. “I used the antique pen that woman gave 
me in the shop,” I told Alex. “What a great pen. It writes so smoothly. I can’t 
believe she gave it to me for free!” 

Alex laughed. “You’re such a weird guy, Zackie. You get so excited about 
things like pens and typewriters.” And then she added, “I think that’s cool.” 

I glanced over my story. “Now it’s time to type it,” I said. “I’m so excited. I 
can’t wait to use the old typewriter.” 

I led the way into my room. I was halfway to my desk when I stopped. 

And let out a startled cry. 

The typewriter was gone. 



13 


Alex and I both gaped at the empty spot on the front of my desktop. Alex pushed 
up her glasses and squinted. 

“It—it’s gone,” I murmured weakly. My knees started to buckle. I grabbed 
my dresser to hold myself up. 

“Weird,” Alex muttered, shaking her head. “Are you sure—” 

“It just disappeared into thin air!” I interrupted. “I don’t believe this! How? 
How could it disappear?” 

“How could what disappear?” a voice called from the doorway. 

I whirled around—to see Dad lumber heavily into the room. He carried the 
old typewriter in his arms. 

“Dad—why... ?” I started. 

He set it down on the desk. Then he pushed his curly black hair off his 
forehead and grinned at me. “I cleaned it for you, Zackie,” he said. “And put in a 
new ribbon.” 

He wiped sweat off his forehead with the back of his hand. “Ribbons are 
hard to find these days,” he added. “No one uses typewriters anymore.” 

Alex laughed. “Zackie thought the typewriter disappeared into thin air!” 

I flashed Alex an angry look. “Alex—give me a break,” I whispered. 

She made a face at me. 

Dad shook his head. “It’s a little too heavy to disappear into thin air,” he 
sighed. “It weighs a ton! More than a computer!” 

I walked over to the typewriter and ran my hand over the smooth, dark 
metal. “Thanks for cleaning it up, Dad,” I said. “It looks awesome.” 

“A few of the keys were sticking,” Dad added. “So I oiled them up. I think 
the old machine is working fine now, Zackie. You should be able to write some 
great stories on it.” 

“Thanks, Dad,” I repeated. 

I couldn’t wait to get started. I reached into my top drawer for some paper. 
Then I noticed that Dad hadn’t left. He was lingering by the door, watching Alex 
and me. 

“Your mom went across the street to visit Janet Hawkins, our new 
neighbor,” he said. “It’s such a beautiful spring night. I thought maybe you two 



would like to take a walk into town to get some ice cream.” 

“Uh... no thanks,” Alex replied. “I already had dessert at home. Before I 
came over.” 

“And I really want to get started typing my new scary story,” I told him. 

He sighed and looked disappointed. I think he really wanted an excuse to 
get ice cream. 

As soon as he left, I dropped into my desk chair. I slid a fresh, white sheet 
of paper into the typewriter roller. 

Alex pulled up a chair and sat beside me. “Can I try the typewriter after 
you?” she asked. 

“Yes. After me,” I replied impatiently. 

I really wanted to get my story typed. 

I let my eyes wander over the round, black keys. Then I leaned forward and 
started to type. 

Typing on a typewriter is a lot different from typing on a keyboard. For one 
thing, you have to press the keys a lot harder. 

It took me a few tries to get the feel of the thing. 

Then I typed the first words of the story: 

IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT. 

“Hey—!” I uttered a cry as lightning flashed in my bedroom window. 

Rain pounded on the glass. 

A sharp roar of thunder shook the house. 

Darkness swept over me as all the lights went out. 

“Zackie—?” Alex cried in a tiny voice. “Zackie? Zackie? Are you all 
right?” 



14 


I swallowed hard. “Yes. I’m okay,” I said quietly. 

Alex is the only person in the world who knows that I’m afraid of the dark. 

I’m afraid of mice. And I’m afraid of the dark. 

I admit it. 

And I’m afraid of a lot of other things. 

I’m afraid of big dogs. I’m afraid of going down to the basement when I’m 
all alone in the house. I’m afraid of jumping into the deep end of the swimming 
pool. 

I’ve told Alex about some of my fears. But not all of them. 

I mean, it’s kind of embarrassing. 

Why do I write scary stories if I’m afraid of so many things? 

I don’t know. Maybe I write better stories because I know what being 
scared feels like. 

“The lights went off so suddenly,” Alex said. She stood beside me, leaning 
over my desk to see out the window. “Usually they flicker or something.” 

Sheets of rain pounded against the windowpane. Jagged streaks of lightning 
crackled across the sky. 

I stayed in my desk chair, gripping the arms tightly. “I’m glad Adam isn’t 
here,” I murmured. “He’d just make fun of me.” 

“But you’re not very scared now—are you?” Alex asked. 

An explosion of thunder made me nearly jump out of the chair. 

“A little,” I confessed. 

And then I heard the footsteps. Heavy, thudding footsteps from out in the 

hall. 

Thunder roared again. 

I spun away from the window. And listened to the footsteps, thudding 
heavily on the carpet. 

“Who’s there?” I called through the darkness. 

I saw a flicker of yellow light in the doorway. A shadow swept over the 
wallpaper in the hall. 

Dad stepped into the room. “This is so weird,” he said. He was carrying two 



candles in candlesticks. Their flames bent and nearly went out as he carried them 
to my desk. 

“Where did that storm come from?” Dad asked, setting the candles beside 
my typewriter. “Are you okay, Zackie?” 

I forgot. Dad also knows I’m scared of the dark. 

“I’m fine,” I told him. “Thanks for the candles.” 

Dad stared out the window. We couldn’t really see anything out there. The 
rain was coming down too hard. 

“The sky was clear a few seconds ago,” Dad said, leaning over me to get a 
better view. “I can’t believe such a big storm could blow in so quickly.” 

“It’s weird,” I agreed. 

We stared at the rain for a minute or so. Sheets of lightning made the 
backyard glow like silver. 

“I’m going to call your mother,” Dad said. “I’m going to tell her to wait out 
the storm.” He patted me on the back, then headed to the door. 

“Don’t you want a candle?” I called after him. 

“No. I’ll find my way,” he replied. “I have a flashlight in the basement.” He 
disappeared down the hall. 

“What do you want to do now?” Alex asked. Her face looked orange in the 
candlelight. Her eyes glowed like cat eyes. 

I turned back to the typewriter. “It would be cool to write by candlelight,” I 
said. “Scary stories should always be written by candlelight. I’ll bet that’s how 
all the famous horror writers write their stories.” 

“Cool,” Alex replied. “Go ahead.” 

I slid the candlesticks closer. The yellow light flickered over the typewriter 

keys. 

I leaned forward and read over the first sentence of my story: 

IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT. 

Then I hit the space bar and typed the next sentence: 

THE WIND BEGAN TO HOWL. 

I hit the space bar again. And raised my fingers to type the next sentence. 

But a rattling noise made me jump. 

“What is that?” I gasped. 

“The window.” Alex pointed. 

Outside, the wind blew hard, rattling the windowpane. 

Over the steady roar of the rain, I heard another sound. A strange howl. 



I gripped the arms of my desk chair. “Do you hear that?” I asked Alex. 

She nodded. Her eyes squinted out the window. 

“It’s just the wind,” she said softly. “It’s howling through the trees.” 

Outside, the howling grew louder as the wind swirled around my house. 
The window rattled and shook. 

The howling grew high and shrill, almost like a human voice, a human wail. 
I felt a chill run down my back. 

Gripping the chair arms tightly, I struggled to keep my fear down. 

It’s just a storm, I told myself. Just a rainstorm. Just a lot of rain and wind. 

I glanced at the words I had typed. In the flickering, orange light, the black 
type jumped out at me: 

THE WIND BEGAN TO HOWL. 

I listened to the shrill howl outside. It seemed to surround me, surround the 
house. “How strange,” I muttered. And then, things got a lot stranger. 



15 


“You’re not getting very far with the story,” Alex said. 

“Well, the storm—” I started. 

She put a hand on my shoulder. “You’re shaking!” she exclaimed. 

“No, I’m not!” I lied. 

“Yes, you are. You’re shaking,” she insisted. 

“No way. I’m okay. Really,” I said, trying to keep my voice calm and 
steady. “I’m not that afraid, Alex.” 

“Maybe if you work on the story, you won’t think about the storm so 
much,” she suggested. 

“Right. The story,” I agreed. 

An explosion of thunder shook the house. 

I let out a sharp cry. “Why does it seem so close?” I exclaimed. “The 
lightning and thunder—it sounds as if it’s all right in the backyard!” 

Alex grabbed my shoulders and turned me to the typewriter. “Type,” she 
ordered. “Pretend there is no storm. Just type.” 

I obediently raised my hands to the keys of the old typewriter. The candles 
had burned down a little, and the page was shadowy and dark. 

I typed the next sentence: 

ALEX AND ZACKIE WERE ALONE IN THE DARK HOUSE, 
LISTENING TO THE STORM. 

Rain pounded hard against the window. In a white flash of lightning, I 
could see the trees in the backyard, bending and trembling in the howling wind. 

“The story is about us?” Alex asked, leaning over my shoulder to read what 
I had typed. 

“Of course,” I replied. “You know that I always write about us and the other 
kids at school. It makes it easier to describe everyone.” 

“Well, don’t let the Blob Monster eat me!” she instructed. “I want to be the 
hero. Not the dinner!” 

I laughed. 

A crash of thunder made me jump. 

I turned back to the typewriter. I squinted to read over the sentences I had 



typed. 

“The candles aren’t giving enough light,” I complained. “How did writers 
do it in the old days? They must have all gone blind!” 

“Let’s go and get more candles,” Alex suggested. 

“Good idea,” I agreed. 

We each picked up a candlestick. Holding them in front of us, we made our 
way down the hall. 

The candles bent and flickered. Our footsteps were drowned out by the 
steady roar of rain on the roof. 

“Dad?” I called. “Hey, Dad—we need more candles!” 

No reply. 

We stepped into the living room. Two candles glowed on the mantelpiece. 
Two more stood side by side on the coffee table in front of the couch. 

“Dad?” I called. “Where are you?” 

Holding our candles high, Alex and I made our way to the den. Then the 
kitchen. Then Mom and Dad’s bedroom. 

No Dad. 

Holding my candle tightly in one hand, I pulled open the door to the 
basement. “Dad? Are you down there?” 

Silence. 

I felt another tingling chill run down my back. I turned to Alex. “He—he’s 
gone!” I stammered. “We’re all alone!” 



16 


“He has to be here,” Alex insisted. “Why would he go out in this storm?” 

“For ice cream?” I suggested. “He really wanted some ice cream.” 

Alex frowned. “Your dad would go out in this storm to get a cup of ice 
cream? That’s impossible.” 

“You don’t know my dad!” I replied. 

“He’s here,” Alex insisted. She set down the candle and cupped her hands 
around her mouth. “Mr. Beauchamp? Mr. Beauchamp?” she called. 

No reply. 

Wind howled outside the living-room window. Lightning flickered. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

In the flash of bright light, I saw a car in the driveway. Dad’s car. 

I made my way to the window and peered out. “Dad didn’t drive 
anywhere,” I told Alex. “His car is still here. And he wouldn’t walk.” 

“Mr. Beauchamp? Mr. Beauchamp?” Alex tried again. 

“Weird,” I muttered. “He wouldn’t go out without telling us—would he? He 
—he just disappeared.” 

Alex’s eyes flashed. Her expression changed. She narrowed her eyes at me. 

“What’s wrong?” I asked. “Why are you staring at me like that?” 

“Zackie—what was the last sentence you typed?” she demanded, still 
squinting at me. 

“Huh?” 

“In your story,” she said impatiently. “What was the last sentence?” 

I thought hard. Then I recited it: 

“ALEX AND ZACKIE WERE ALONE IN THE DARK HOUSE, 
LISTENING TO THE STORM.” 

Alex nodded her head solemnly. 

“So what?” I asked. “What does the story have to do with anything?” 

“Don’t you see?” Alex replied. “You wrote that we were all alone in the 
house—and now we’re all a/one!” 

I stared back at her. I still didn’t know what she was talking about. 

“Zackie—this is amazing!” she cried. “What is the first sentence of the 



story?” 

I told it to her: 

“IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT.” 

“Yes!” Alex cried excitedly. Her eyes went wide. The candle shook in her 
hand. “Yes! A dark and stormy night! But it had been a nice night—right?” 

“Huh?” I struggled to follow her. 

“Your dad said there wasn’t a cloud in the sky. Remember? That’s why he 
wanted to walk into town.” 

“Yeah. Right. So what?” I demanded. 

She let out an impatient sigh. “So then you typed that it was dark and 
stormy—and guess what? It became dark and stormy.” 

“But, Alex—” I started. 

She raised a finger to her lips to silence me. “And then you typed that we 
were all alone in the dark house. And that came true too!” 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “You’re not going to tell me that my story is coming 
true—are you?” 

“So far it has,” she insisted. “Every word of it.” 

“That’s really dumb,” I told her. “I think this storm has freaked you out 
more than me!” 

“Then how else do you explain it?” Alex shot back. 

“Explain it? A big rainstorm came up. That’s how I explain it.” 

I picked up a candlestick from the mantel. Now I had one in each hand. I 
started back to my room. 

Alex followed me. “How do you explain your dad disappearing into thin 

air?” 

Our shadows edged along the wall, bending in the flickering light. I wished 
the electricity would come back on. 

I stepped into my room. “Dad didn’t disappear. He went out,” I told Alex. I 
sighed. “Your idea is crazy. Just because I typed that it was stormy out...” 

“Let’s test it,” Alex urged. 

“Excuse me?” 

She dragged me to the desk chair. She pushed me into it. 

“Hey—” I protested. “I almost dropped the candles.” 

“Type something,” Alex instructed. “Go ahead, Zackie. Type something— 
and we’ll see if it comes true.” 



17 


The wind howled outside the house, rattling the windowpane. I set my candles 
down, one on each side of the old typewriter. 

I leaned forward and read the story so far. 

Alex was right. 

Everything I had typed had come true. 

But her idea was totally dumb. 

“Type!” she ordered, standing behind me, her hands on my shoulders. 

I glanced back at her. “Alex—haven’t you ever heard of coincidence ?” 

“Oooh—big word!” she replied sarcastically. “Are you sure you’re ready 
for such a big word?” 

I ignored her remark. “A coincidence is when two things happen by 
accident,” I explained. “For example, I type that it’s stormy out—and then it 
starts to storm. That’s called a coincidence.” 

She shoved me toward the typewriter. “Prove it,” she insisted. “Go ahead, 
Zackie. Type the next sentence, and let’s see if it comes true.” 

She squeezed my shoulders. And then added, “Or are you chicken?” 

I wriggled out from under her hands. “Okay, okay,” I groaned. “I’ll prove 
just how dumb you are.” 

I reached for the handwritten pages of the story. And I found the next 
sentence. 

Then I raised my hands to the old typewriter keyboard and typed it in: 

THEY HEARD A KNOCK ON THE DOOR. 

I lowered my hands to my lap. And sat back. 

“See?” I sneered. “Any more bright ideas?” 

Then I heard a knock on the door! 

I gasped. 

Alex let out a startled cry. 

“That didn’t h-happen,” I stammered. “I didn’t hear that. I imagined it.” 

“But we both heard it,” Alex replied, her eyes wide. “We both couldn’t 
imagine it!” 

“But it’s impossible !” I insisted. I picked up a candle. Then I jumped up 



from the desk chair and hurried across the bedroom. 

“Where are you going?” Alex demanded, chasing after me. 

“To answer the door,” I told her. 

“No—!” she gasped. 

I was already jogging through the dark hall. My heart pounded. The candle 
flame seemed to throb in rhythm with my heart. 

I glanced back and saw Alex running after me. “Zackie—wait!” 

I didn’t stop. I ran to the front door. 

“No! Please—don’t open it!” Alex pleaded. 

“I have to,” I told her. “We have to see who’s there.” 

“Zackie—don’t!” Alex begged. 

But I ignored her. And pulled open the door. 



18 


Alex gasped. 

I stared out into the rain. 

No one there. 

No one. 

Rain pattered the front stoop. The big raindrops bounced like balls in every 
direction. 

I pushed the door shut. And brushed a cold raindrop off my forehead. 

“Weird,” Alex muttered, tugging at her blonde ponytail. She pushed her 
glasses up on her nose. “Weird.” 

“It had to be a tree branch,” I said. “The wind blew a tree branch against the 
door. That’s all.” 

“No way,” Alex insisted. “Tree branches don’t knock. I heard a knock on 
the door—and so did you.” 

We stared at each other for a long moment. Then we stared at the door. 

“I know!” Alex declared. Behind her glasses, her eyes flashed excitedly. “I 
know why there was no one at the door!” 

“I don’t want to know!” I groaned. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy 
ideas about my story coming true.” 

“But don’t you see?” she cried. “There was no one at the door because you 
didn’t write someone at the door!” 

“AAAAAGGH!” I screamed. “Alex, please—give me a break. You don’t 
really believe that I am controlling everything that happens—do you?” 

She twisted her face, thinking hard. 

“No,” she finally replied. 

“Good!” I exclaimed. 

“I think the old typewriter is controlling everything,” she said. 

“Alex—go lie down,” I instructed. “I’m calling your parents to come get 
you. You are sick. Definitely sick.” 

She ignored me. “Maybe that’s why the woman in the burned-out shop gave 
you the typewriter,” she continued. “Maybe she knew it had strange powers. And 
she couldn’t wait to get rid of it.” 



“I can’t wait to get rid of you!” I snapped. “Alex, please tell me you’re not 
serious. You’re scaring me with this nutty talk. Really.” 

“But, Zackie, I’m right. Everything you type—it comes true!” Alex grabbed 
my arm and started to pull me down the hall. 

I pulled back. “Where are you taking me?” I demanded. 

“One more test,” she insisted. 

I followed her into my room. “One more?” I asked. “One more test—and 
then you’ll shut up about this?” 

She raised her right hand. “Promise.” She lowered her hand. “But, you’ll 
see, Zackie. You’ll see that I’m not crazy. Whatever you type on that old 
typewriter comes true.” 

I sat down at the desk and slid the candles closer to the typewriter. I stared 
into the flickering orange light, reading the words of the story. 

“Hurry up,” Alex urged. “Type that someone is standing on the other side of 
the door.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. “But this is crazy.” I raised my hands to the old 
typewriter keys and typed: 

DRENCHED WITH RAIN, ADAM STOOD ON THE FRONT PORCH. 

I lowered my hands to my lap. 

I listened for a knock on the front door. 

But all I heard was the steady rush of the wind and the patter of rain against 
the house. 

I waited, listening hard. 

No knock. 

I realized I was holding my breath. I let it out slowly, listening. Listening. 

“No knock,” I told Alex. I couldn’t keep a grin from spreading across my 
face. A triumphant grin. “See? It didn’t work.” 

She frowned. She leaned over my shoulder and read the words again. “Of 
course it didn’t work,” she said. “You didn’t write that Adam knocked. You put 
him on the porch. But you didn’t make him knock.” 

I sighed. “Okay. If it will make you happy...” 

I turned back to the typewriter and typed: 

ADAM KNOCKED ON THE FRONT DOOR. 

As I lowered my hands from the keys, I heard a loud knock on the front 

door. 

“See?” Alex cried. It was her turn to grin. 



“This can’t be happening!” I gasped. 

We didn’t bother with candles. We both ran full speed through the hall to 
the front door. 

Alex reached it first. She grabbed the knob and pulled open the door. 

“Is it really Adam?” I called. 



19 


I gaped in shock as Alex pulled Adam in from the rain. 

He was drenched! His curly black hair was matted to his forehead. He 
wasn’t wearing a rain slicker or jacket. His soaked T-shirt stuck to his body. 

“Whoooa!” he exclaimed, shivering. He wrapped his arms around his 
chubby body as if trying to warm himself. 

Water poured off him and puddled on the floor. 

“Adam—!” I opened my mouth to say something—but I was too shocked to 
form words. 

“It—it’s true!” Alex stammered. “It really works!” 

“Huh?” Adam appeared dazed. 

“What are you doing here?” I demanded, feeling dazed myself. 

His eyes wandered around the living room. “I’m not sure!” he exclaimed. “I 
—I know I came here for a reason. But I don’t remember what it is.” 

“Zackie made you come here!” Alex declared. 

Adam shook his head hard, shaking water off himself like a dog. He 
narrowed his eyes at Alex. “Excuse me?” 

Alex studied Adam. “Did you stand on the front porch for a while before 
you knocked?” she demanded. 

Adam nodded. “Yeah. I did! I’m not sure why. I just stood there. I guess I 
was trying to remember why I came over here. How did you know that?” 

Alex grinned at me. “See? I was right all along.” 

I swallowed hard. My head was spinning. “Yes. You were right,” I 
murmured. 

The old typewriter... 

Whatever I typed on it came true. 

“What’s going on?” Adam demanded impatiently. He shook more water 
onto the rug. “Why are we in the dark?” 

“The storm knocked out the lights,” I told him. “Follow me.” 

I led the way to my room. On the way, I stopped at the linen closet and gave 
Adam a bath towel. He dried himself off as we walked to my room. 

I couldn’t wait to tell him about my amazing typewriter. “You’re not going 



to believe this!” I started. 

I took him over to the typewriter. He stared at it in the orange candlelight. 

Then Alex and I told him the whole story. 

When we finished, Adam burst out laughing. “Very funny,” he said. 

He shook his head. His curly hair was still soaked. Water dripped down his 
forehead. 

“I know you want to pay me back, Zackie,” he said. “I know you want to 
pay me back for putting the mice in your locker. I know I embarrassed you in 
school.” 

He put a moist hand on my shoulder. “But there is no way I’m going to fall 
for a dumb story like that. No way.” 

“Zackie will prove it to you,” Alex chimed in. 

Adam sneered and rolled his eyes. “I can hardly wait.” 

“No. Really,” I insisted. “It’s not a joke, Adam. It’s real. Come here. I’ll 
show you.” 

I pulled him up to the desk. Then I dropped into the chair and quickly typed 
the next lines of my scary story: 

THE STORM STOPPED SUDDENLY. ALL WAS QUIET. TOO QUIET. 

Adam and Alex read the words over my shoulder. 

I jumped up and pulled Adam to the window. “Go ahead. Check it out,” I 
urged. 



20 


All three of us slid around my desk and pressed our faces to the window. 

“Yes!” I cried, shaking my fists above my head. “Yes!” 

The rain had stopped. 

I edged between my two friends and pushed up the window. “Listen,” I 
instructed. 

We all listened. 

Not a sound outside. Not even the drip of rain from the trees. Not even a 
whisper of wind. 

“Yes!” Alex cried happily. She and I slapped a high five. 

I turned to Adam. “Do you see?” I cried. “Do you believe us now?” 

“Do you see?” Alex repeated. 

Adam backed away from the window. “See what?” he demanded. “Do I see 
that the rain has stopped? Yes. I see it.” 

“But—but—” I pointed to the typewriter. 

Adam laughed. “Have you both lost it?” he cried. 

“Do you really think you stopped the rain? You two are totally messed up!” 

“It’s true!” I insisted. “Adam, I just proved it to you.” 

He laughed and rolled his eyes. 

I wanted to punch his laughing face. I really did. 

Here was the most amazing thing that ever happened to anyone in the 
history of the world—and he thought it was a big joke! 

I grabbed his arm. “Here,” I said breathlessly. “HI prove it again. Watch.” 

I dragged him to the typewriter. 

I didn’t bother to sit down. I leaned over the desk and started to type 
something. 

But before I had typed two words, Alex tugged me away. 

“What are you doing?” I cried. I struggled to break away. But she pulled me 
out to the hall. 

“He’s not going to believe us, Zackie,” she whispered. “You can prove it to 
him a dozen times, and he won’t believe it.” 

“Of course he will!” I insisted. “He’ll—” 



“No way,” Alex interrupted. “Go ahead. Type ADAM HAS TWO HEADS. 
If you do it, both of his heads won’t believe you!” 

I had to think about that one. 

“One more try,” I said. “Let me type one more sentence. When Adam sees 
it come true, maybe he’ll change his mind. Maybe he’ll see it isn’t a joke.” 

Alex shrugged. “Go ahead. But he has his mind made up, Zackie. He thinks 
you’re trying to pay him back for the mice in your locker.” 

“One more try,” I insisted. 

I glanced into the room. “No—! Adam—stop!” I shrieked. 

He had his back turned to us. But I could see that he was leaning over the 
typewriter. 

He was typing something onto the page! 

“Adam—stop!” Alex and I both wailed. 

We dove into the room. 

He spun around, a wide grin on his face. “I’ve got to go!” he exclaimed. 

He swept past us and out into the hall. “So long, suckers!” he called. He 
disappeared down the hall. 

I hurtled to the desk. My heart pounding, I stared down at the typewriter. 

What did Adam type? 



21 


I heard the front door slam. Adam had run out of the house. 

I didn’t care about Adam now. I only cared about one thing. 

What did he type on the old typewriter? 

I grabbed the sheet of paper—and pulled it from the roller. Then I held it 
close to a candle flame to read it. 

“Careful! You’ll set it on fire!” Alex warned. 

I moved it back from the flame. Orange light flickered over the page. My 
hand was trembling so hard, I struggled to read it. 

“Well? What did he type?” Alex asked impatiently. 

“He—he—he—” I sputtered. 

She grabbed the paper from my hand and read Adam’s sentence out loud: 

“THE BLOB MONSTER HID IN ZACKIE’S BASEMENT, WAITING 
FOR FRESH MEAT.” 

“What a jerk!” I cried. “I don’t believe him! Why did he type that on my 
story?” 

Alex stared unhappily at the page. “He thought it was funny.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said weakly. I grabbed the page back from her. “He ruined my 
story. Now I have to start it all over again.” 

“Forget your story. What about the Blob Monster?” Alex cried. 

“Huh?” A chill tightened the back of my neck. The sheet of paper slipped 
from my hand. 

“Everything typed on the old typewriter comes true,” Alex murmured. 

I was so upset about Adam ruining my story that I had forgotten! 

“You mean—?” I started. My mouth suddenly felt very dry. 

“There is a Blob Monster waiting in the basement,” Alex said in a low 
whisper. “Waiting for fresh meat.” 

“Fresh meat,” I repeated. I gulped. 

Alex and I froze for a moment, staring at each other in the darting 
candlelight. 

“But there is no such thing as a Blob Monster,” I said finally. “I made it up. 
So how can a Blob Monster be hiding in my basement?” 



Alex’s eyes flashed behind her glasses. “You’re right!” she cried. “They 
don’t exist! So... no problem!” She smiled. 

But her smile faded when we heard a noise. 

A heavy THUD THUD. 

I gasped. “What was that?” 

We both turned to the door. 

And heard the sound again. THUD THUD. 

Heavy and slow. Like footsteps. 

“Is it... is it coming from the b-b-b-?” I was so scared I was stuttering. 

Alex nodded. “The basement,” she whispered, finishing the word for me. 

I picked up a candlestick. The light bounced over the wall and floor. I 
couldn’t stop my hand from shaking. 

Holding it in front of me, I made my way into the hall. 

Alex huddled close, keeping with me step for step. 

THUD THUD. 

We both stopped. The sounds were closer. Louder. 

Taking a deep breath, I stepped up to the basement door. 

Alex hung back, her hands pressed to her face. Behind her glasses, her eyes 
were wide with fear. 

THUD THUD. 

“It’s coming up the stairs!” I cried. “Run!” 

Too late. 

I heard another THUD —and the door crashed open. 



22 


Abeam of white light made me shut my eyes. 

My hands shot up to shield myself. 

Behind the beam of light, a large, dark figure lumbered heavily through the 

door. 

“Dad!” I gasped. 

My dad lowered the flashlight to the floor. 

“Dad! What were you doing down there?” I demanded in a high, shrill 
voice. 

“Are you two okay?” Dad asked, narrowing his eyes at us. “Why do you 
look so frightened?” 

“We... uh... well...” I didn’t know how to explain. I couldn’t tell him we 
thought he was a Blob Monster! 

Dad pointed to the basement with the flashlight. “I’ve been down there 
checking the circuit breakers,” he explained. “I can’t figure out why the lights 
haven’t come back on.” He scratched his head. 

“We were looking for you,” Alex said. “We shouted down to the basement 
for you.” 

“I went across the street to check on your mother. Then I went into the back 
room of the basement,” Dad replied. “I guess I couldn’t hear you.” 

He shook his head. “What a strange storm. It came up so suddenly. And 
then it just stopped. As if someone turned it on, then turned it off.” 

Alex and I glanced at each other. “Yes. It was weird,” Alex agreed. 

I took a deep breath. “Uh... Dad?” I started. 

He beamed the light at my feet. “Yes, Zackie?” 

“Dad... when you were down in the basement... was there anything else 
down there with you?” 

His heavy eyebrows rose up on his forehead. He stared hard at me. “Excuse 
me?” 

“Did you see anything strange down there? Or hear anything strange?” 

He shook his head. “No. Nothing.” His eyes locked on mine. “Are you 
afraid, Zackie? I know you have problems with being in the dark like this. 
Would you like to hang out with me for a while?” 



“No. I’m fine. Really,” I insisted. “I just wondered...” 

Dad stepped past us and started toward the kitchen. “I’m going to call the 
electric company,” he said. “They should have fixed the lines by now.” 

I watched him make his way down the hall. The white beam of light 
bounced in front of him. 

I held my candle up to the basement door. “I guess the typewriter didn’t 
work this time,” I told Alex happily. “No Blob Monster.” 

“Let’s go downstairs and check it out!” she replied. 

“Huh?” I backed away from the open doorway. “Are you crazy?” 

“We have to know if the old typewriter has powers or not,” Alex said. “We 
have no choice, Zackie. We have to check out the basement.” 

“But—but—” 

She pushed past me onto the basement stairway. She walked down the first 
two steps. 

Then she turned back to me. “Are you coming with me, or not?” 



23 


Did I have a choice? 

No. 

For one thing, I had the candle. I couldn’t let Alex go down there by herself 
—in total darkness. 

But I held back, my heart pounding, my mouth dry as cotton. “Dad said he 
didn’t hear anything,” I said. “So there is no reason for us to go.” 

“That’s lame and you know it,” Alex replied. She took another step down. 
“Am I going down alone?” 

I forced my rubbery legs to move. “No. Wait up. I’m coming,” I said. 

I lowered my foot to the first stair. “But we’ll only stay down for a second 
—right?” 

“Just long enough to see if there is a Blob Monster hiding down there,” 
Alex replied. 

Waiting for fresh meat, I added silently. 

I stumbled on the next step. But caught myself on the railing. 

The candle flame dipped low, but didn’t blow out. 

The basement spread in front of us like a black pit. 

We both stopped at the bottom of the steps—and listened. 

Silence. 

I raised the candle high. Tall stacks of cartons came into view. Behind them, 
I could see the two wooden wardrobe closets where Mom and Dad store our 
winter clothes. 

“The Blob Monster could be hiding behind those tall cartons,” Alex 
whispered. “Or in those closets.” 

I swallowed hard. “Alex—give me a break,” I whispered back. 

We made our way slowly to the stacks of cartons. I raised the candle high. 
We peeked behind the first stack. 

Nothing hiding there. 

“Can we go now?” I pleaded. 

Alex rolled her eyes. “Don’t you want to know the truth? Don’t you want to 
know if your typewriter really has powers or not?” 



“No. Not really,” I whispered. 

She ignored me. She grabbed the candle from my hand and moved behind 
the next stack of cartons. 

“Hey—give that back!” I cried. 

“You’re too slow,” she snapped. “Keep close behind me. You’ll be okay.” 

“I’m not okay,” I insisted. “I want to go back upstairs.” 

Alex moved quickly between the stacks of cartons. I had to hurry to keep 
up. 

I never liked the basement. In fact, I was afraid of the basement even in the 
daytime. 

I knew there really wasn’t anything to be afraid of. But sometimes, telling 
yourself that doesn’t do any good at all. 

“Alex—” I whispered. “Can we—?” 

I stopped when I heard the sound. A soft slapping, from somewhere against 
the wall. 

Slap ... slap... slap... slap... 

Steady as a heartbeat. 

Alex had moved away from me. I saw her walking quickly toward the 
laundry room. 

“Alex—!” I hurtled across the room to her—so fast, I bumped into her. 

“Hey—watch it!” she exclaimed. 

“Alex—it’s down here!” I shrieked. “It’s here! It’s really here! Listen! Do 
you hear it?” 



24 


We both froze. 

The steady, rhythmic sound rose up from the far wall. 

Slap ... slap... slap... slap... 

“Do you hear it?” I whispered. 

Alex nodded. Her mouth had dropped open in shock. She gripped the 
candlestick in both hands. 

Slap... slap... 

“What are we going to do?” I whispered. 

“It’s waiting for fresh meat,” Alex murmured. 

“I know. I know!” I groaned. “You don’t have to say it.” I pulled her arm. 
“Come on. We have to tell Dad.” 

I gazed through the darkness to the stairway. The steps seemed a million 
miles away. 

“We’ll never make it,” I choked out. “We have to run past the Blob Monster 
to reach the stairs.” 

Slap... slap... 

“What’s our choice?” Alex shot back. “Pick one, Zackie. Choice one: We 
stay here. Choice two: We don’t stay here.” 

She was right, of course. We had to make a run for it. 

Maybe if we ran fast enough, we’d take it by surprise. 

Maybe the Blob Monster was too big to run fast. 

Slap... slap... slap... slap... 

“Let’s go,” Alex urged. “I’ll go first since I have the light.” 

“Uh... can we run side by side?” I asked softly. 

She nodded. 

Without another word, we took off. 



25 


Our shoes thudded over the concrete basement floor. 

I struggled to keep at Alex’s side. My legs felt so heavy, as if I were 
running uphill! 

“Whoooa!” I cried out when the lights flashed on. 

Startled, we both stopped running. 

I blinked hard, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright ceiling light. 

Slap... slap... 

We both turned to the far wall to see the Blob Monster. 

And stared at a pale white hand slapping against the wall beneath the open 
basement window. 

A hand? 

Slap... slap... 

“It—it’s a rubber glove!” Alex exclaimed. 

“It’s one of Dad’s gardening gloves,” I choked out. 

Dad usually leaves his heavy gardening gloves on that window ledge. One 
of the gloves was hanging from a nail. And the wind kept slapping it against the 
wall. 

Alex laughed first. Then I joined in. 

It felt good to laugh. And it felt especially good to know that no Blob 
Monster was hiding in the basement. 

What a relief! 

Alex and I climbed happily up the stairs. Then she made her way to the 
front door. “Thanks for the awesome entertainment!” she teased. “It was better 
than a movie! See you tomorrow.” 

She started out the door, then turned back. “We definitely got a little crazy 
tonight, Zackie. I mean, about that old typewriter.” 

“Yeah. I guess,” I admitted. “It doesn’t have any special powers. It didn’t 
make a Blob Monster appear in the basement. And all the lights came back on 
without me having to type that they came on.” 

“The typewriter didn’t cause anything to happen tonight. It was all 
coincidence,” Alex said. 



“Oooh. Big word!” I teased. 

She slammed the door behind her. 


“Are you doing anything, Zackie?” Mom asked. 

“Not really.” 

It was Saturday afternoon, and I was just hanging out. I had a ton of 
homework to do. So I was lying on the couch, staring up at the ceiling, thinking 
up excuses not to do it. 

“Can you run to the store for me?” Mom asked. “The Enderbys are coming 
for dinner, and I need a few things.” She held up a slip of paper. “It’s a short 
list.” 

“No problem,” I said, climbing up from the couch. 

Maybe I can add a few items to the list, I thought, taking it from her hand. 
Like maybe a few candy bars. Or a box of Pop-Tarts.... 

I love to eat Pop-Tarts raw. 

“Ride your bike, okay?” Mom asked. “I’m kind of in a hurry. Come straight 
back—okay?” 

“No problem,” I repeated. I tucked the list into the back pocket of my jeans 
and headed to the garage to get my bike. 

The afternoon sun poured down. The air felt hot and dry. More like summer 
than spring. 

I jumped onto my bike and pedaled down the driveway standing up. I 
turned toward town and sat down, pedaling fast, riding no-hands. 

A few minutes later, I leaned my bike against the brick wall of Jack’s. 
Jack’s is mainly a meat market, but they sell fruits, and vegetables, and other 
groceries too. 

The bell over the glass door clanged as I stepped inside. Mrs. Jack was at 
her usual spot, leaning her elbows on the counter beside the cash register. 

Mrs. Jack is a big, platinum-haired woman with about a dozen chins. She 
wears bright red lipstick and long, dangling earrings. 

She is really nice to everyone—except kids. 

She hates kids. I guess she thinks we only come into her store to steal. 
When a kid comes in, she follows him up and down the aisles and never takes 
her eyes off him. 

I closed the door behind me and reached into my back pocket for my 
shopping list. 



Mrs. Jack had the newspaper spread out in front of her on the counter. She 
raised her eyes slowly and made a disgusted face at me. “Help you?” she 
muttered. 

I waved the list. “Just buying a few things for my mom.” 

She grabbed the list out of my hand and squinted at it. Then she handed it 
back with a grunt. “Tuna is in the back on the bottom,” she said. 

“Thanks.” I picked up a shopping basket and hurried to the back of the 
store. 

A big air conditioner rattled against the wall. A fan in front of it blew cold 
air down the narrow aisle. 

I found the tuna quickly and dropped two cans into my basket. 

The long, white display counter of the meat department stretched in front of 
me. Behind the glass, cuts of red meat were lined up in perfect rows. 

Beside the counter, an enormous side of beef hung from the ceiling. 

That is really gross! I thought. 

It looked like an entire cow—stripped of its hide—hanging upside down. 

Yuck. 

I started to turn away from it—when the dead cow moved. 

It swung to the right, then swung back. 

I stared in surprise. 

The cow swung further, to the right, then back. 

I watched it swinging on its rope, swinging heavily from side to side. 

And then I heard a harsh, whispered voice: 

“Fresh meat... Fresh meat...” 



26 


“Ohhh.” A low moan escaped my throat as I gaped at the side of beef, swinging 
so slowly, back and forth, back and forth. 

“Fresh meat .. ” came the raspy whisper again. “Fresh meat .. ” 

“No—!” I blurted out. 

I dropped my shopping basket. 

And started to step back. 

I let out another cry as Adam stood up and stepped out from behind the 
meat counter. He had a gleeful grin on his face. 

“Fresh meat...” he whispered. And burst out laughing. 

Annie and Emmy climbed out from behind the counter, giggling and 
shaking their heads. 

“Awesome!” Annie exclaimed. 

“Zackie, you’re bright red!” her sister laughed. 

My face burned as hot as the sun. I felt so embarrassed. How could I fall for 
such a dumb joke? 

Now, I knew, they would tell everyone in school that I freaked out over a 
side of beef! 

“What are you doing here?” I shrieked. 

“We saw you on your bike,” Adam replied. “We followed you into the 
store. Didn’t you see us? We were right behind you.” 

“AAAAGFL!” I let out a furious cry and balled my hands into fists. 

“What’s going on back there?” Mrs. Jack’s harsh voice rattled the shelves. 
“What are you kids doing?” 

“Nothing!” I called. “I—I found the tuna!” 

I turned back to Adam and the twins. “Give me a break,” I muttered. 

For some reason, that struck them funny. They giggled and slapped one 
another high fives. 

Then Adam stuck out both arms. He held them stiffly in front of him, like a 
sleepwalker. And began marching stiff-legged across the aisle toward me. 

“You’re controlling me, Zackie!” he declared in a machinelike voice. “I’m 
in your power.” 



He staggered toward me like some kind of zombie. “Your typewriter 
controls me, Zackie. Your typewriter has the power! I am your slave!” 

“Adam—you’re not funny!” I cried. 

The girls giggled. They closed their eyes, stuck out their arms, and started 
marching toward me too. 

“We’re in your power,” Emmy chanted. 

“You’re controlling our every move,” Annie said. 

“This isn’t funny!” I shouted furiously. “Get lost, you guys! You—” 

I turned and saw Mrs. Jack bouncing toward us, her face as red as her 
lipstick. “What are you doing back here?” she bellowed. “This isn’t a 
clubhouse!” 

Adam and the girls instantly lowered their sleepwalker arms. Annie and 
Emmy backed up against the meat counter. 

“Are you buying anything?” Mrs. Jack demanded, huffing and puffing from 
her long journey from the cash register. “If you’re not buying anything, get out. 
Go to the playground.” 

“We’re going,” Adam murmured. He couldn’t get past Mrs. Jack. She filled 
the aisle. So he scooted down the next aisle. 

Annie and Emmy hurried after him. 

Mrs. Jack glared at me. 

“I—I’m almost finished,” I stammered. I picked up the basket. I searched 
for my list, but couldn’t find it. 

No problem. I remembered what was on it. 

I found the other items and dropped them into the basket. Mrs. Jack stayed 
with me the whole while. 

Then she walked me to the front of the store. 

I paid and hurried out. I was so angry at Adam and the girls, I forgot all 
about the candy bars. 

They are always making fun of me, I griped to myself. 

Always playing mean tricks. Always trying to make me look like a jerk. 

Always. Always. 

And I’m sick of it. I’m sick to death of it! 

“Sick sick sick!” I chanted the word all the way home. I hopped off my bike 
and let it crash to the driveway. Then I ran inside and tossed the grocery bag onto 
the kitchen counter. 

“Sick sick sick.” 



I’m going to totally lose it if I don’t cool down, I decided. 

I ran up to my room and shoved a fresh sheet of paper into the old 
typewriter. 

Then I plopped into the desk chair and furiously started typing. A third Blob 
Monster story. The scariest one of all. 

I typed as fast as I could. I didn’t think about it. I let my anger do the 
thinking. 

I didn’t write it out first. I didn’t plan it. I didn’t know what was going to 
happen next. 

I leaned over the old typewriter and typed. 

In the story, the ugly pink Blob Monster attacks the whole town. People are 
screaming. Running in every direction. Running for their lives. 

Two police officers step forward to fight the Blob Monster off. It opens its 
huge mouth—and swallows them whole! 

Shrieks of terror fill the town. The enormous Blob Monster is eating 
everyone alive! 

“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!” 

I was paying everyone back. Paying the whole town back. 

“Yes!” 

It was the most exciting, most terrifying story I ever wrote. I wrote page 
after page. 

“Zackie—you forgot something!” a voice called. 

I started to type those words into the story. Then I recognized Mom’s voice. 

Breathing hard, I spun away from the typewriter. I found Mom leaning in 
the doorway, shaking her head fretfully. 

“You have to go back to the store,” she said. “You forgot the loaf of Italian 
bread. We need bread for dinner tonight.” 

“Oh. Sorry,” I replied. 

I glanced back at my story and sighed. It was going so well. I was having 
such a good time. 

I’ll get right back to it after I go to the store, I decided. 

I took more money from Mom. Then I picked up my bike from the 
driveway. 

I thought about my Blob Monster story as I pedaled to town. It’s the best 
story I ever wrote, I decided. 

I can’t wait to read it to Alex. 



I heard the thud of footsteps on the sidewalk. A man in a business suit came 
mnning by. A dark blur. He ran so fast, I couldn’t see his face. 

What’s his problem? I wondered. He’s too dressed up to be jogging! 

“Whoa!” I had to swerve to the curb as a blue station wagon roared toward 
me. The woman at the wheel honked her horn and waved frantically to me. Her 
tires squealed as she shot around the corner. 

“Everyone is in such a hurry today,” I muttered to myself. 

Then I heard a scream. A man’s scream. 

I pedaled faster. I was a block from town. I could see the awning over the 
doorway of Jack’s grocery on the corner. 

I saw two people running past the store. Running at top speed, waving their 
hands. 

I screeched to a halt when I heard another scream. 

“Look out!” someone shrieked. 

“Run! Call the police!” 

Two little kids ran past me. One of them was sobbing. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I called to them. 

But they kept running. They didn’t answer. 

I started pedaling again, standing up. I leaned over my handlebars, trying to 
see what all the fuss was about. 

As I reached town, I saw people running down the center of the street. Cars 
honked. People were screaming. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I called. “Is there a fire or something? Hey— 
somebody tell me what’s happening. Somebody—” 

And then I saw what was happening. 

And I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror—and fell off my bike. 



27 


“OW!” 

I landed hard on my right side. The bike slammed on top of me. The 
handlebar jabbed me in the neck. 

A man ran past. “Get away, kid!” he shouted. “Hurry! Get away!” 

I shoved the bike off me and climbed to my feet. 

My heart pounding in my chest, I brushed myself off. 

And gaped at the enormous, pink Blob Monster throbbing on the next 
corner. 

“Ohhh.” A horrified moan escaped my throat. 

It looks just as I described it in my story! I realized. 

Like a huge, slimy human heart. Pink and wet. With tiny black eyes. And 
purple veins knotted on top of its head. And a mouth cut into its belly. 

Throbbing. Throbbing... 

“It—it’s my monster!” I cried. 

Two little girls frowned at me as their mother tugged them away. I 
recognized her. Mrs. Willow, who lives across the street. 

“Zackie—run!” she cried, pulling each girl by a hand. “It’s a horrible 
monster!” 

“I know,” I murmured. 

She pulled her daughters across the street. But I didn’t follow them. 

I took a deep breath and made my way slowly down the street toward the 
throbbing Blob Monster. 

I wrote this, I realized. 

Just before I came to town, I typed this scene. I wrote that the Blob Monster 
attacked the town. 

And I’ll bet I know what happens next. 

As I stepped closer, I saw the trail of thick slime the monster left behind it. 
Its belly pulled open, and I saw its purple tongue darting from side to side. 

My legs trembled as I stepped even closer. 

People screamed and ran. Cars and vans roared past, horns honking. 

Everyone was running, desperate to escape. But I couldn’t leave. I couldn’t 



take my eyes off it. 

I made you! I thought. Horrified and curious and amazed—all at the same 

time. 

I created you! 

I wrote this story! 

The Blob Monster stared back at me through its tiny, black eyes. 

Did it know who I was? Did it know that I created it? 

As I stared in amazement, its mouth opened wider. It made sick, sucking 
sounds, and the purple tongue scraped the sides of its mouth. 

Thick, yellow drool poured out of the open mouth. 

And the Blob Monster bounced forward. 

Its purple tongue leaped out at me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. I struggled to back away. 

The hot, sticky tongue wrapped around my leg. Started to pull me toward 
the slimy, open mouth. 

“Let go!” I tugged on the tongue as hard as I could. “Help me!” 

Two dark-uniformed police officers leaped in front of me. They had their 
nightsticks raised. 

With angry cries, they both began pounding the throbbing creature. 

POUND. POUND. POUND. 

The nightsticks made a soft plopping sound with each hit. 

The Blob Monster uttered a sickening gurgle. And its tongue slid off my 
leg. 

“Run!” one of the officers screamed. “Get going!” 

My legs were shaking so hard, I nearly fell. I could still feel the slimy, hot 
tongue on my leg. 

I stumbled back. 

And gaped in horror as the Blob Monster pulled open its mouth. The fat 
purple tongue swung around both police officers. 

They beat it with their sticks. They shoved it. They tried to wrestle free. 

But the tongue tightened, tightened around them—and pulled them. Pulled 
them into the huge, open mouth in the creature’s belly. 

Pulled them both inside. 

And then the mouth slammed shut with a disgusting SPLAT. 

“No! Noooooo!” I wailed. 

I wanted to pound my fists against the monster. Pound it until it melted to 



the ground. 

“It’s all my fault!” I screamed. 

I wrote that scene with the policemen. 

It was all in the story I had just typed. I wrote that the Blob Monster ate 
them both. 

And now it had come true! 

My frightening story had come true. Every scene of it. 

The Blob Monster uttered disgusting gulping sounds as it digested its 
human meal. Its tiny black eyes locked on mine as it gulped. 

What happens next? 

What happens next in my story? I asked myself. 

Trembling all over, my heart pounding, I struggled to think. 

What happens next? 

And then—with a shudder—I remembered what I had written. 

The Blob Monster follows me home! 



28 


The Blob Monster made a final gulp. Then it opened its mouth in a disgusting, 
gassy burp. 

Sickened by the sour odor, I staggered back. 

I’ve got to think of something, I told myself. I’ve got to stop this monster. 

Or it will eat me next. 

The Blob Monster began to slide forward, plopping wetly on the sidewalk 
as it moved. 

I knew I couldn’t stand there another second. I spun away and forced my 
mbbery legs to run. 

I picked up my bike off the street and jumped on. I began pedaling before I 
had my balance—and nearly crashed into a brick wall. 

I struggled frantically to turn myself around, to calm down enough to ride. 
Finally, I pedaled away, groaning with each thrust of my foot. 

I sped out of town. Halfway down the next block, I glanced back. 

Yes. Just as I had written. The Blob Monster was following me. Bouncing 
rapidly over the pavement. The purple veins on top of its head bouncing with it. 
Behind it, a trail of slime thickened on the street. 

It’s so fast! I realized. It’s keeping up with me! 

What happens next? What did I type next? 

“Oh, no!” I shrieked when I remembered. 

This is the part where I fall off my bike! 

“AIIIII! ” My front tire hit a rock—and I went flying over the handlebars. 

Once again, I hit the pavement hard. Once again, I shoved my bike off me 
and jumped to my feet. 

I turned to see the Blob Monster catching up. Plopping quickly up the 
street, its mouth gaping open, its tongue stretching... reaching out for me. 

I spun away—and ran into Alex and Adam. 

“Run! Don’t just stand there!” I screeched. “It—it’s catching up!” 

“Zackie—are you okay?” Alex asked. 

“No time for questions!” I gasped, shoving them both. “Run! The Blob 
Monster is real! I wrote it—and now it’s doing everything I wrote!” 



Adam laughed. He turned to the Blob Monster. “Do you think I’m stupid, 
Zackie? This is a joke—right? What is that? Some kind of a balloon?” 

“Adam—don’t!” I cried. 

I grabbed for him. And missed. 

He went running up to the Blob Monster. 

“Yeah. It’s some kind of big balloon!” Adam repeated, grinning. 

The monster’s purple tongue slid quickly around Adam’s waist. 

It pulled Adam easily into the open mouth. And then the Blob Monster 
swallowed him with a sickening gulp. 

Alex and I both screamed. 

Alex turned to me. “Did you write that?” she demanded in a trembling 
voice. 

I nodded. “Yes. It’s in my story,” I confessed. 

Alex grabbed my shoulder. “Well, what happens next? Tell me. What comes 
next?” 

“I—I don’t know,” I stammered. “That’s where I stopped writing!” 



29 


Alex and I never ran so fast in our lives. By the time we reached my house, my 
head was throbbing and my side was aching. 

We both gasped for breath as I pushed open the front door. “Anyone 
home?” I shouted into the house. “Mom? Mom?” 

No reply. She must have gone out. 

I turned and glimpsed the Blob Monster bouncing hard over Alex’s front 

yard. 

“No time!” I cried to Alex. “No time! Hurry!” 

She slipped inside the house, and I slammed the door behind us and locked 
it. Then I lurched toward my room, holding my aching side, forcing my rubbery 
legs to move. 

I mopped the sweat off my forehead with my arm. Then I dropped into the 
desk chair and raised my hands over the typewriter keys. 

Alex hurried up beside me. “What are you going to do?” she asked 
breathlessly. 

“No time to explain,” I choked out. 

I heard a thumping at the front door. Then I heard a loud CRAAAACK. 

And I knew the huge pink Blob had broken down the door. 

“No time. No time!” I declared. I furiously started to type. 

“I’m typing an ending,” I told Alex. “I’m going to type that the Blob 
Monster disappears. That it never existed. That Adam and the two policemen are 
okay.” 

SQUISSSSH... SQUISSSSH. 

Alex and I both gasped. We heard the Blob Monster’s slimy body, so close 
now, moving quickly toward us through the hall. 

I knew I had only a few seconds to type the ending. 

SQUISSSSSH. 

Right outside my bedroom door. 

I held my breath and pounded the keys. 

Pounded as hard and fast as I could until— 

“NOOOOO!” 



“What’s wrong?” Alex shrieked. 

“The keys are jammed!” 

We both screamed again as the Blob Monster bounced into the room. 



30 


The Blob Monster’s body heaved up and down. The creature panted, its entire 
body bouncing. White slime puddled on the floor around it. 

The slash of a mouth in the belly opened and closed, opened and closed. 
The purple tongue licked the mouth as the monster’s eyes narrowed on me. 

Alex gasped and backed up against the wall. “Zackie—type the ending!” 
she screamed breathlessly. “Make that thing disappear!” 

“I can’tl” I cried. I frantically pulled at the keys. “They’re jammed. I can’t 
untangle them!” 

“Zackie— please !” Alex pleaded. 

And then I saw the fat purple tongue leap. 

It rolled out of the Blob Monster’s open belly like a garden hose. 

“NOOOOOO!” I opened my mouth in a terrified wail as the tongue 
stretched across the room. Reached for me... 

Reached for me... 

No! 

The tongue wrapped around the typewriter. Lifted it easily. 

I grabbed for it with both hands. 

And missed. 

My hands slid across the tongue. So hot. Burning hot. And sticky. 

The tongue pulled back, snapped back like elastic. And carried the 
typewriter into the monster’s gaping mouth. 

As I stared in horror, the Blob Monster swallowed the typewriter with a 
single gulp. 

I leaped up from the desk chair. And stepped up beside Alex. We pressed 
our backs against the wall and watched helplessly as the Blob Monster throbbed 
and heaved. Digesting the typewriter. 

“We’re doomed,” Alex murmured. “The typewriter—it’s gone. Now there 
is no way you can destroy the monster.” 

“Wait!” I cried. “I have an idea!” 



31 


I dove back to the desk. I searched the desktop. 

“What are you doing?” Alex cried. 

The Blob Monster let out sick gurgling sounds as it digested the typewriter. 
Its body heaved up and down in the puddle of slime it had left on the rug. 

“The pen,” I told Alex. “The pen—” 

I pulled open the desk drawer and saw the old pen in front. I grabbed it and 
slammed the drawer shut. 

I held it up to show Alex. “The old pen the woman gave me. Maybe it has 
the same powers as the typewriter. Maybe I can write an ending with the pen— 
and make the Blob Monster disappear!” 

“Hurry—!” Alex warned. 

The Blob Monster had stopped its gurgling. The purple tongue came darting 
out again. 

I grabbed a sheet of paper and leaned over the desk. I pulled off the cap on 
the pen and lowered the point to the paper. 

“THE—” 

I wrote one word—and felt something hot and wet slap against the side of 
my face. 

The fat purple tongue slid against me. 

“Ow!” I cried out. And dropped the pen. 

My hand shot up to my cheek, and I felt hot, sticky slime. 

My stomach heaved. 

The tongue curled around the old pen. And carried it to the Blob Monster’s 
mouth. 

“Noooo!” Alex and I shrieked together. 

The creature sucked the pen into its open belly, and began its digesting 
gurgles. 

“Now what?” Alex asked in a whisper. “What can we do? It’s going to eat 
us next!” 

I jumped to my feet. The desk chair toppled over. 

I stepped away from it, my eyes on the doorway. “Make a run for it!” I 



cried. 

Alex held back. “We can’t,” she sighed. “That thing—it’s blocking the way. 
We’ll never get past it.” 

She was right. The Blob Monster would stick out its tongue and pull us 
easily into its drooling mouth. 

“Try the window!” I cried desperately. 

We both turned to the window. 

No way. It was bolted shut because of the air conditioner. 

“Doomed,” Alex whispered. “Doomed.” 

We both turned back to the throbbing, pink monster. 

And then I had one more idea. 

“Alex—remember when Adam typed something on my story? And it didn’t 
come true?” 

She nodded, keeping her eyes on the gurgling Blob Monster. “Yes, I 
remember. But so what?” 

“Well,” I continued, “maybe that’s because it’s me that has the power. 
Maybe the power isn’t in the typewriter or the pen. Maybe I got the power that 
night in that antique shop when I was zapped by that electrical shock.” 

Alex swallowed hard. “Maybe...” 

“Maybe it’s been in me the whole time!” I cried excitedly. “All I have to do 
is think what I want to happen—and it will come true. I don’t have to type it or 
write it. I just have to think it!” 

“Maybe...” Alex repeated. 

She started to say something else. But the Blob suddenly bounced forward, 
squishing over the rug. And its tongue rolled out toward us. 

“Ohhhh...” Alex backed up against the wall. 

The fat tongue licked her arm. It left a thick smear of sticky drool on her 

skin. 

“Think fast, Zackie!” Alex cried. 

The tongue curled and started to wrap itself around Alex. 

“Make it disappear!” Alex pleaded. “Think! Think it away!” 

I froze in horror as the fat tongue wrapped around Alex. It lifted her off the 
floor. 

Screaming, she thrashed her arms and kicked. Squirming frantically, she 
wrapped her hands around the sticky tongue—and shoved with all her strength. 

But the disgusting tongue squeezed tighter, held her in its slimy grip. 



I shut my eyes. 

Think! I instructed myself. Think hard! 

Think that the Blob Monster is gone. 

Gone... gone... gone. 

I held my breath. And thought with all my might. 
Would it work? 



32 


The monster is gone. 

That’s what I thought. 

The monster is gone... gone... gone... 

I silently chanted the word, over and over. Then I opened my eyes. 

And the Blob Monster was gone! 

Alex stood in the center of the floor, a dazed expression on her face. “It... it 
worked,” she choked out. 

I do have the power! I realized. 

I closed my eyes again and started to think. Adam is back, I thought. 

Adam is back... 

I opened my eyes—and Adam stood beside Alex. 

He blinked several times, then squinted at me. “What’s happening?” he 
asked. 

“I have it!” I cried happily. “I have the power—not the typewriter!” 

“What are you talking about?” Adam demanded. “What power?” 

I shook my head. “You wouldn’t understand,” I told him. 

Alex started to laugh. 

Before I realized it, I was laughing too. 

Joyful laughter. Relieved laughter. 

All three of us stood there, laughing, laughing, laughing—laughing happily 
ever after. 



33 


“Well? Did you like my story?” 

The pink Blob Monster neatened the pages he had just read and set them 
down on the desk. He turned to his friend, a green-skinned Blob Monster. 

“Did you just write that?” the green monster asked. 

The pink Blob Monster gurgled with pride. “Yes. Did you enjoy it?” 

“I did,” his friend replied. “Thank you for reading it to me. It’s very 
exciting. Very well written. What do you call it?” 

“I call it ‘Attack of the Humans’,” the Blob Monster replied. “Did you 
really like it?” 

“Yes. Those humans are really gross,” his friend replied. “Do you know my 
favorite part?” 

“What part?” 

“When the Blob Monster ate Adam. That was really fun!” the green 
creature declared. “But I have just one problem with your story.” 

The pink Blob Monster bobbed up and down. The veins on top of his head 
turned a darker purple. “A problem with my story? What is it?” 

“Well...” his green friend replied. “Why did you give it such an unhappy 
ending? I hated it when the human shut his eyes, and the Blob Monster 
disappeared. That was so sad.” 

“Do you think so?” the pink monster asked, gazing down thoughtfully at 
the pages he had written. 

“Yes,” his friend replied. “You should have a happy ending, instead. 
Everyone likes a happy ending.” 

The pink Blob Monster picked up his story. “Okay. You’re right. I’ll change 
the ending. I’ll have the Blob Monster eat them all!” 

“Great! I love it!” his friend declared. “Now, that’s a great ending!” 





THE CURSE OF 
CAMP COLD LAKE 

Goosebumps - 56 
R.L. Stine 



1 


I got off to a bad start at Camp Cold Lake. 

I was nervous when I arrived. And I guess I did some dumb things. 

Well, I didn’t want to go to a water sports camp. 

I don’t like to be outdoors. I hate the feeling of grass brushing against my 
ankles. I don’t even like to touch trees. And I certainly don’t like getting wet. 

Sure, I like to go swimming once in a while. But not every day! What’s the 
point of that? 

I like to swim in a nice, clean pool. I took one look at the lake here—and I 
was sick. I knew there had to be horrible things swimming around in that water. 

Ugly creatures, waiting below the surface. Thinking to themselves: “Sarah 
Maas, we’re waiting for you. Sarah, we’re going to rub our slimy bodies on your 
legs when you swim. And we’re going to chew off your toes, one by one.” 

Yuck. Why do I have to swim in slime ? 

Of course, Aaron was so excited, he nearly exploded. 

When we climbed off the camp bus, he was jumping up and down and 
talking a mile a minute. He was so crazed. I thought he was going to burst out of 
his clothes and go running into the lake! 

My brother likes camp. He likes sports and the outdoors. He likes just about 
everything and everyone. 

And everyone always likes Aaron. He’s so enthusiastic. He’s so much fun. 

Hey—I like to have fun too. But how can you have fun when there are no 
malls, no movie theaters, no restaurants to get a slice of pizza or a bag of french 
fries? 

How can you have fun up to your neck in a freezing cold lake every day? In 
a camp miles from any town? Surrounded on all sides by thick woods? 

“This is going to be awesome!” Aaron declared. Dragging his duffel bag, he 
hurried off to find his cabin. 

“Yeah. Awesome,” I muttered glumly. The bright sun was already making 
me sweat. 

Do I like to sweat? Of course not. 

So why did I come to Camp Cold Lake? I can answer that in three words: 
Mom and Dad. 



They said that a water sports camp would give me confidence. They said it 
would help make me more comfortable with the outdoors. 

And they said it would give me a chance to make new friends. 

Okay, I admit it. I don’t make friends easily. I’m not like Aaron. I can’t just 
walk up to someone and start talking and kidding around. 

I’m a little shy. Maybe it’s because I’m so much taller than everyone else. 
I’m a whole head taller than Aaron. And he’s only a year younger than I am. 
He’s eleven. 

I’m tall and very skinny. Sometimes Dad calls me “Grasshopper”. 

Guess how much I like that. 

About as much as I like swimming in a cold lake filled with hidden 
creatures. 

“Be a good sport about it, Sarah,” Mom said. 

I rolled my eyes. 

“Give camp a chance,” Dad added. “You might surprise yourself and have a 
good time.” 

I rolled my eyes again. 

“When you come home at the end of summer, you’ll probably beg us to 
take you camping!” Dad joked. 

I wanted to roll my eyes again—but they were getting tired from all that 
rolling. 

I gave my parents a glum sigh. Quick hugs. Then I followed Aaron onto the 
camp bus. 

He grinned the whole way to camp. He was really excited about learning 
how to water-ski. And he kept asking everyone if the camp had a high diving 
board over the lake. 

Aaron made three or four good friends on the bus ride to camp. 

I stared out the window, watching the endless blur of trees and farms. 
Thinking about my lucky friends who got to stay home and hang out at the mall. 

Then here we were at Camp Cold Lake. Kids pulling their bags off the bus. 
Laughing and joking. Counselors in dark green T-shirts greeting everyone, 
pointing them in the right direction. 

I began to cheer up a little bit. 

Maybe I will make some new friends, I thought. Maybe I’ll meet some kids 
who are a lot like me—and we’ll have a great summer. 

But then I stepped into my cabin. I saw my three bunk mates. I looked 



around. 

And I let out a cry. “Oh, no! No way!” 



2 


I guess I shouldn’t have freaked like that. 

It made a very bad first impression. 

But what was I supposed to do? 

There were two bunk beds in the cabin. The three other girls had already 
chosen their beds. There was only one bed left—right in front of the window. 

And the window had no screens. 

Which meant that my bed would be crawling with bugs. I took one glance 
—and I knew I’d be swatting mosquitoes every night for the whole summer. 

Besides, I can’t sleep in a top bunk. I toss and turn a lot at night. If I slept 
on top, I’d fall on my head. 

I had to sleep on the bottom. In the bed against the far wall, away from the 
open window. 

“I—I can’t do this!” I blurted out. 

My three bunk mates turned to look at me. One had blond hair pulled back 
in a ponytail. Near her was a short, chubby girl with long brown hair. In the 
bottom bunk against the wall, an African-American girl with long cornrows 
stared across the cabin at me. 

I guess they wanted to say hi and introduce themselves. But I didn’t give 
them a chance. 

“Someone has to trade beds with me!” I cried. I didn’t mean to sound so 
shrill. But I was really upset. 

Before they could answer, the cabin door swung open. A sandy-haired 
young guy in a dark green camp T-shirt poked his head in. 

“I’m Richard,” he said. “I’m the boss guy, the head dude. Everything okay 
in here?” 

“No!” I cried. 

I couldn’t stop myself. I was just so nervous and unhappy. “I can’t sleep in 
this bunk!” I told him. “I don’t want to be near the window. And I need to sleep 
on the bottom.” 

I could see that the other girls were shocked by my outburst. 

Richard turned to the girl who was sitting on the bottom bunk against the 
wall. “Briana, would you trade beds with—” 



“Sarah,” I told him. 

“Would you trade bunks with Sarah?” Richard asked Briana. 

She shook her head so hard, the beads in her cornrows rattled against each 
other. “I really don’t want to,” she said softly. 

She pointed to the chubby girl with long brown hair, who sat on a camp 
trunk. “Meg and I were bunk mates last year,” Briana told Richard. “And we 
kind of wanted to be together.” 

Meg nodded. She had a round, baby face. Squirrel cheeks out to here. And 
she wore blue and red braces on her teeth. 

“I can’t sleep in front of the window,” I insisted. “I really can’t. I hate 
bugs.” 

Richard stared hard at Briana. “How about it?” 

Briana groaned. “Oh... all right.” She made a face at me. 

“Thanks,” Richard said. I could see he was studying me. 

He probably thinks I’m a real troublemaker, I thought. 

Briana climbed off the bottom bunk. She dragged her duffel bag across the 
room to the bunk by the window. “It’s all yours,” she muttered. 

She didn’t say it in a friendly way. 

I felt bad. My bunk mates hate me already, I thought. 

Why do I always do that? Why do I always get nervous and start off on the 
wrong foot with people? 

Now I’ve got to try really hard to make them my friends, I decided. 

But a minute later, I did something horrible. 



3 


“Hey—thanks for trading bunks, Briana,” I said. “That was really nice of you.” 

She nodded but didn’t say anything. Meg pulled open her trunk and started 
shoving shorts and T-shirts into her dresser drawer. 

The third girl smiled at me. “Hi. I’m Janice,” she said. She had a raspy, 
hoarse voice. “Everyone calls me Jan.” 

Jan had a nice smile. She had her blond hair pulled back in a ponytail. She 
had dark blue eyes and red cheeks. She seemed to be blushing all the time. 

“Were you here last summer?” I asked her. 

She shook her head. “No. Briana and Meg were here. But this is my first 
summer. I went to tennis camp last year.” 

“I’ve never been to any kind of camp,” I confessed. “I—I guess I’m a little 
nervous.” 

“Are you a good swimmer?” Briana asked. 

I shrugged. “Pretty good, I guess. I don’t swim much. I don’t really like it.” 

Meg turned from her trunk. “You don’t like to swim, and you came to a 
water sports camp?” 

Briana and Jan laughed. 

I could feel my face grow hot. I didn’t want to tell them that my parents 
made me come to this camp. That just sounded too geeky. I didn’t know what to 
say. 

“I... uh... I like other things,” I stammered. 

“Oh—I love that swimsuit!” Briana declared. She pulled a bright yellow 
swimsuit from Meg’s trunk and held it up in front of her. “This is excellent!” 

Meg tugged it back. “Like it would really fit you!” she muttered, rolling her 
eyes. Her braces clicked when she talked. 

Meg looked a little like a bowling ball next to tall, graceful Briana. 

“Did you lose weight over the winter?” Briana asked her. “You look great. 
Really, Meg.” 

“I lost a little,” Meg replied. She sighed. “But I didn’t get any taller.” 

“I grew about a foot this year,” I chimed in. “I’m the tallest girl in my 
school. Everyone stares at me when I walk through the halls.” 

“Boo hoo,” Meg said sarcastically. “You’ve really got it tough. Would you 



rather be a shrimp like me?” 

“Well... not really,” I replied. 

Ooops. I realized I’d said the wrong thing. 

I saw a flash of hurt in Meg’s eyes. 

Why did I say that? I asked myself. 

Why do I keep putting my foot in my mouth? 

I picked up my backpack from where I had tossed it on the floor. I carried it 
to my bunk to unpack it. 

“Hey—that’s mine! Put it down!” Jan came rushing over to me. 

I glanced down at the backpack. “No. It’s mine,” I insisted. 

I started to unzip it—and it fell off the bed. 

A whole bunch of things fell out and clattered across the cabin floor. 

“Oh!” I cried out in surprise. The stuff wasn’t mine. 

I saw pill bottles. Medicine jars. And little plastic inhalers. 

“Asthma medicine?” I cried. 

Jan dropped to her knees and began gathering it all up. She glared up at me 
angrily. “Thanks a bunch, Sarah,” she growled. “Thanks for letting the whole 
world know I have asthma. Why don’t you stand up at the campfire tonight and 
announce it to the whole camp?” 

“Sorry,” I murmured weakly. 

“I told you it was my backpack,” Jan snapped. 

Meg bent down and picked up an inhaler for Jan. 

“Having asthma is nothing to be ashamed of,” she told Jan. 

“Maybe I like to keep some things to myself,” Jan snapped. She shoved all 
the medicine into the pocket and grabbed the backpack away. 

“Sorry,” I said again. “Really.” 

All three girls glared at me. Briana shook her head. Meg tsk-tsked. 

They hate me already, I thought. 

I felt sick. Really sick. 

They hate me, and it’s only the first day. The first hour. 

With a sigh, I slumped down on my bunk. 

Can things get any worse? I wondered. 

Guess the answer to that. 



4 


Later that night, we had our first campfire. It was built in a wide, flat clearing 
near the woods. Smooth logs were placed in a circle to be used as benches. 

I dropped down on an empty log with my back to the trees. Flames from the 
big fire danced brightly against the gray evening sky. 

The fire crackled and popped. It smelled so sweet. I took a deep breath. 

Counselors tossed more sticks on the fire. Soon the flames rose up over 
their heads. 

The night air was hot and dry. My cheeks burned from the heat tossed off 
by the fire. 

I turned away and gazed into the woods. The dark trees shivered in a light 
breeze. In the gray light, I saw a squirrel dart between tall weeds. 

I wondered what other animals lurked in the woods. I imagined there were 
bigger animals than squirrels in there. Bigger and more dangerous. 

A loud POP from the fire made me jump. 

It’s creepy outside at night, I thought. Why can’t they have the campfire 
indoors? In a fireplace or something. 

I slapped a mosquito on my neck. 

When I turned back to the fire, I saw Briana and Meg on another log bench. 
They were laughing about something. Talking to two girls I didn’t know. 

I saw Aaron on the other side of the flames. He was goofing with two other 
guys. They were wrestling around, trying to shove each other off the log. 

I sighed. Aaron has already made a bunch of friends, I thought. 

Everyone has made friends—but me. 

Aaron saw me staring at him. He waved quickly, then turned back to his 
friends. 

On the next log, three girls had their heads tossed back. They were loudly 
singing the camp song. 

I listened carefully, trying to learn the words. But they had a giggling fit 
halfway through and didn’t finish the song. 

Two older girls sat down on the other end of my log. They looked about 
fifteen or sixteen. I turned to say hi to them. But they were busy talking. 

One of them had a bag of Gummi Worms in her hand. She kept pulling 



them out of the bag one by one and slurping them slowly like spaghetti noodles. 

Richard, the head counselor, stepped in front of the fire. He had a black 
baseball cap turned backwards on his head. His baggy shorts were torn and dirty 
from working on the fire. 

He raised both hands over his head. “Are we all here?” he called out. 

I could barely hear him. Everyone was still talking and laughing. Across the 
fire, I saw Aaron standing up, wiggling his whole body in a funny dance. 

His friends were laughing their heads off. One of them slapped Aaron a 
high five. 

“Can we get started?” Richard called out. “Can we start our welcoming 
campfire?” 

A log cracked in the fire. Red embers shot up all around. 

“Oh!” I let out a cry as a hand grabbed my shoulder. 

“Who—?” I spun around, startled. And stared up at Briana and Meg. 

They leaned over me. In the darting firelight, I saw their frightened 
expressions. 

“Sarah—run!” Briana whispered. 

“Get up—quick!” Meg tugged my arm. “Run!” 

“Why? What’s wrong?” I sputtered. 



5 


I jumped shakily to my feet. “What’s wrong?” 

“Those boys,” Meg whispered. She pointed across the fire. “They threw 
fireworks in the fire! It’s going to explode!” 

“Run!” both girls cried. 

Meg gave me a shove to get me started. 

I stumbled—and then lurched forward. As I ran, I shut my eyes tight, 
expecting the blast any second. 

Could I get away in time? Were Meg and Briana escaping it too? 

I stopped short when I heard the laughter. 

Shrill, gleeful laughter. 

“Huh?” Swallowing hard, I turned back. 

And saw half the camp laughing at me. 

Meg and Briana slapped each other a high five. 

“No. Oh, noooo,” I murmured. How could I fall for such a dumb trick? 

How could they play such a mean joke on me? 

They must have told everyone to watch. As I stood at the edge of the 
clearing by myself, I could feel all the eyes on me. 

And I could hear kids laughing and making jokes. 

I saw Jan laughing. And I saw Richard and some of the other counselors 
grinning and shaking their heads. 

I know, I know. I should have laughed too. I should have made a joke of it. 

I shouldn’t have let it upset me. 

But the whole day had been so terrible. I was so nervous. And so eager not 
to make any more mistakes. 

I could feel my shoulders start to shake up and down. I could feel tears 
welling up in my eyes. 

No! I ordered myself. You cannot cry! You cannot allow yourself to cry in 
front of the whole camp. 

Sure, you feel like a total jerk, Sarah. But so what? It was just a joke. Just a 
dumb joke. 

I felt a hand on my arm. I pulled away. 



“Sarah—” Aaron stood beside me. His dark eyes were wide in the shadowy 
evening light. 

“I’m okay,” I snapped. “Go away.” 

“You’re such a bad sport,” he said softly. “Why can’t you ever let things 
slide off you? It was just a joke. Why go nuts over a dumb joke?” 

Do you know what I really hate? 

I really hate it when Aaron is right. 

I mean, he’s my younger brother—right? What right does he have to be the 
sensible, calm member of the Maas family? 

It really steams me when Aaron comes on like the older brother. 

“Do I need your advice?” I snarled. “Take a hike.” I gave him a shove 
toward the campfire. 

He shrugged and hurried back to his friends. 

I crept to the campfire. I didn’t go to my old seat. It was too close to the fire 
—and too close to Briana and Meg. 

I dropped down on the edge of a log near the woods, outside the glow of the 
fire. The darkness cooled me and helped to calm me down. 

Richard had been talking for a while. I realized I hadn’t heard a word he 

said. 

He stood in front of the crackling fire. He had a deep, booming voice. But 
everyone leaned in to hear him better. 

I gazed around the circle of campers. Their faces glowed orange in the 
bright firelight. Their eyes sparkled. 

I wondered if anyone here would be my friend. 

I knew I was feeling really sorry for myself. I wondered if any other new 
campers felt the way I did. 

Richard’s voice droned on in the back of my mind. He was saying 
something about the main lodge. Something about the meal schedule. Then he 
began talking about towels. 

I started to pay attention when he introduced the head waterfront counselor. 
Her name was Liz. 

Everyone clapped when she stood up beside Richard. One of the boys gave 
a loud wolf whistle. 

“She’s awesome!” another boy called out. 

Everyone laughed. 

Liz grinned too. She knew she looked really awesome. She wore tight 



denim cutoffs and a dark blue midriff top. She waved for everyone to get quiet. 

“Are you all having a good time?” she called out. 

Everyone cheered and clapped. Several boys whistled. 

“Well, tomorrow will be your first day at the waterfront,” Liz announced. 
“And before you go in the lake, there are lots of water rules we want you to 
know.” 

“Like, don’t drink the water!” Richard chimed in. “Unless you’re very 
thirsty!” 

Some kids laughed. I didn’t. The thought of drinking that disgusting, slimy 
water made me sick. 

Liz didn’t laugh, either. She frowned at Richard. “We need to take this 
seriously,” she scolded. 

“I was serious!” Richard joked. 

Liz ignored him. “When you get back to your bunks, you will find a list of 
water rules on your bed,” she continued, brushing back her long, frizzy red hair. 
“There are twenty rules on the list. And you need to know them all.” 

Huh? Twenty rules? I thought. How can there be twenty rules? 

It will take all summer to learn twenty rules. 

Liz held up a sheet of paper. “I’m going to go over the list with you now. If 
you have any questions, just call them out.” 

“Can we go swimming now?” a boy shouted, trying to be funny. 

Lots of kids laughed. 

But Liz didn’t crack a smile. “That’s rule number eight,” she replied. “No 
night swimming, even if counselors are with you.” 

“Don’t ever swim with counselors!” Richard joked. “They have germs!” 

Richard is pretty funny, I thought. He seems like a good guy. 

But Liz seems so serious. 

The sheet of paper fluttered in the wind. She gripped it with both hands. 
Her red hair caught the glow of the fire. 

“The most important rule at Camp Cold Lake is the Buddy System,” Liz 
announced. “When you are in the lake, you must always have a buddy.” 

She glanced quickly at the campers seated around her. “Even if you are only 
wading in up to your ankles, you must have a swimming buddy with you,” she 
said. “You may have a different buddy each time. Or you may choose a buddy 
for the whole summer. But you must always have a buddy.” 

She took a deep breath. “Are there any questions?” 



“Will you be my buddy?” a boy shouted. 

Everyone laughed. I laughed too. The kid’s timing was perfect. 

But once again, Liz didn’t crack a smile. “As waterfront counselor, I will 
act as everyone’s buddy,” she replied seriously. 

“Now, rule number two,” she continued. “Never swim more than three boat 
lengths from one of our safety boats. Rule number three—no shouting or 
pretending to be in trouble in the water. No horseplay. No kidding around. Rule 
number four...” 

She talked on and on, reading off all twenty rules. 

I groaned. She talks to us like we’re five year olds, I thought. 

And there are so many water rules. 

“Let me repeat one more time about the Buddy System...” Liz was saying. 

Gazing past the fire, I could see the dark lake. Smooth and black and silent. 

The lake has tiny waves. No current. No dangerous tides. 

So why are there so many rules? I wondered. 

What are they scared of? 



6 


Liz talked for at least half an hour. Richard kept cracking jokes, trying to make 
her laugh. But she never even smiled. 

She talked some more about every rule on the list. Then she told us to read 
the list carefully when we got back to our cabins. 

“Have a safe summer, everyone!” she called out. “See you at the 
waterfront!” 

Everyone cheered and whistled again as Liz stepped away from the fire. I 
yawned and stretched my hands over my head. That was really boring, I thought. 

Eve never heard of a place having so many rules. 

I swatted another mosquito on my neck. I was starting to feel really itchy. 
That’s what being outdoors does to me. It makes me itch like crazy. 

The fire had died down. A blanket of purple embers glowed on the dark 
ground. The night air grew cool. 

To end the campfire, Richard told everyone to stand and sing the camp 
song. “You new campers probably don’t know the words,” he said. “You’re 
lucky\” 

Everyone laughed. Then Richard began to sing, and everyone joined in. 

I tried to follow along. But I couldn’t catch all of the words. I picked up 
pieces of the song.... 

“Wetter is better ... ” 

“Get in the swim. 

Show your vigor and vim... ” 

“Every son and daughter 

should be in the water, 

the cold, cold water 

of Camp Cold Lake. ” 

Yuck. I agreed with Richard about the words to the song. They were so 
lame! 



Gazing across the fire, I saw Aaron singing his heart out. He seemed to 
know every word already. 

How does he do it? I wondered, scratching my itchy legs. How does he 
manage to be so perfect? To fit in everywhere? 

As the song ended, Richard raised his hands for quiet. “I have a few final 
announcements,” he called out. “First of all, none of you can carry a tune! 
Second...” 

I didn’t hear the rest. I turned to find Briana and Meg standing beside me. 

I took a step back. “What do you want?” I snapped. 

“We want to apologize,” Briana said. 

Meg nodded. “Yeah. We’re sorry we played that dumb joke on you.” 

Richard’s voice droned on behind us. Briana put a hand on my shoulder. 
“We got off to a bad start,” she said. “Let’s start all over again. Okay, Sarah?” 

“Yeah. Let’s start fresh,” Meg agreed. 

A smile spread over my face. “Great,” I said. “Excellent.” 

“Excellent!” Briana repeated, smiling too. 

She slapped me on the back. “A fresh start!” 

Richard was still making announcements. “Tomorrow at four-thirty, those 
interested in windsurfing...” 

Aaron will probably try that, I thought. I watched Briana and Meg walk 
away. 

A fresh start, I thought. I began to feel a lot happier. 

The happy feeling lasted for about two seconds. 

Then my back started to itch. 

I turned to the fire and saw Briana and Meg staring back at me. They were 
both giggling. 

Other kids had turned away from Richard and were watching me. 

“Ohhhh.” I groaned when I felt something warm wriggle against my back. 

Something warm and dry, moving under my T-shirt. 

“Ohhhh.” It moved again. 

I reached one hand back. And poked it under my shirt. 

What is it? What did Briana put back there? 

I grabbed the thing and pulled it out. 

And started to scream. 



7 


The snake wriggled in my hand. 

It looked like a long black shoelace. With eyes! And a mouth that kept 
snapping open and shut. 

“Noooooo!” I totally lost it. 

I let out a shrill scream. And I heaved the snake with all my might. 

It sailed into the woods. 

My back still itched like crazy. I could still feel it wriggling against my 

skin. 

I reached back and tried to scratch with both hands. 

Kids were laughing. Telling each other what Briana had done. 

I didn’t care. I just wanted to rub away the feeling of that snake against my 

skin. 

My whole body tingled. I uttered an angry cry. “How could you?” I 
shrieked at Briana and Meg. “What is your problem ?” 

Aaron came hurrying over to be the grown-up again. 

Just what I needed. Mr. Mature Kid Brother. 

“Sarah, did it bite you?” he asked softly. 

I shook my head. “I can still feel it!” I wailed. “Did you see it? It was three 
feet long!” 

“Calm down,” Aaron whispered. “Everyone is staring at you.” 

“Think I don’t know it?” I snapped. 

“Well, it was just a tiny snake,” Aaron said. “Totally harmless. Try to get 
yourself together.” 

“I—I—I—” I sputtered. I was too upset, too angry to talk. 

Aaron raised his eyes to Briana and Meg. “Why are those two girls picking 
on you?” he asked. 

“I don’t know!” I wailed. “Because... because they’re creeps ! That’s why!” 
“Well, try to calm down,” Aaron repeated. “Look at you, Sarah. You’re 
shaking all over.” 

“You’d shake too if you had a disgusting snake crawling up and down your 
skin!” I replied. “And I really don’t need your advice, Aaron. I really don’t—” 



“Fine,” he replied. He spun away and hurried back to his friends. 

“I don’t believe him,” I muttered. 

Dad is a doctor, and Aaron is just like him. He thinks he has to take care of 
everyone in the world. 

Well, I can take care of myself. I don’t need my little brother telling me to 
calm down every second. 

Richard was still talking. But I didn’t care. I stepped away from the 
campfire circle and started back to the cabin. 

The path curved through a patch of woods, up the sloping hill where the 
cabins were perched. Away from the glow of the fire, I was surrounded by 
darkness. 

I clicked on my flashlight and aimed the yellow circle of light at my feet. 
My sneakers crunched over dry leaves and twigs. The trees whispered above me. 

How did I get off to such a bad start? I asked myself. 

Why do Briana and Meg hate me so much? 

Maybe they’re just mean, I decided. Maybe they’re total creeps. Maybe 
they’re mean to everyone. 

They think they’re so hot because they were at camp last year. 

Without realizing it, I had wandered off the path. “Hey—” I swung the 
flashlight around, searching for the way back. 

The light swept over tilting trees, tall clumps of weeds, a fallen log. 

Panic tightened my throat. 

Where is the path? Where? 

I took a few steps. My sneaker crunched over leaves. 

And then my foot sank into something soft. 

Quicksand! 



8 


No. Not quicksand. 

There’s no such thing as quicksand. I remembered that from some science 
book I read in fifth grade. 

I lowered the flashlight. 

“Ohhhh.” Mud. Thick, gooey mud. 

My sneaker sank deep into the ooze. 

I pulled my leg up with a groan—and nearly toppled over backwards. 

It’s just mud, I told myself. It’s disgusting—but it’s no big deal. 

But then I saw the spiders. 

Dozens of them. The biggest spiders I ever saw. 

There must have been a nest of them in the mud. 

They were crawling over my shoe, crawling up the leg of my jeans. 

“Ohhhh. Yuck!” 

Dozens of spiders clung to me. I shook my sneaker. Hard. Then I began 
batting at them with my free hand. 

“I hate this caaaaaamp!” I screamed. 

I beat some spiders away with the flashlight. 

And then I had an idea. 

I mean, why shouldn’t I pay Briana and Meg back for what they did to me? 

They embarrassed me in front of the whole camp. And I hardly did 
anything to them. 

I emptied the batteries from the flashlight. I took a deep breath. Then I bent 
down—and scooped a bunch of spiders into the flashlight. 

Yuck. I felt sick. I really did. 

I mean, can you imagine —me handling spiders! 

But I knew it would be worth it. Soon. 

I filled the flashlight with the squirming, black creatures. Then I screwed on 
the top. 

I stepped over a fallen tree trunk. Found the path. And carrying the 
flashlight carefully, I eagerly hurried to the cabin. 

I stopped outside the door. The lights were on inside the cabin. 



I peeked in through the open window. No. No sign of anyone. 

I crept inside. 

I pulled up the blanket on Briana’s bed. Then I emptied half of the spiders 
onto her sheet. I carefully pulled the blanket over them and smoothed it out. 

I was pouring the rest of the spiders into Meg’s bed when I heard a 
shuffling noise behind me. Quickly, I pulled Meg’s blanket back into place and 
spun around. 

Jan stepped into the cabin. “What’s up?” she asked in her hoarse, croaky 
voice. 

“Nothing,” I replied, hiding the flashlight behind my back. 

Jan yawned. “It’s Lights Out in ten minutes,” she said. 

I glanced at Briana’s bunk. I’d left one corner of the blanket untucked. 
Briana won’t notice, I decided. 

I realized I was grinning. I quickly changed my expression. I didn’t want 
Jan asking a lot of questions. 

She turned and pulled a long white nightshirt from her dresser drawer. 
“What did you sign up for tomorrow?” she asked. “Free Swim?” 

“No. Canoeing,” I told her. 

I wanted to be in a nice, dry canoe. Not flopping around in the dirty lake 
with fish and other slimy creatures. 

“Hey. Me too,” Jan said. 

I started to ask if she would be my buddy. But Briana and Meg came 
strolling through the door. 

They saw me—and burst out laughing. 

“What was that wild dance you were doing at the campfire?” Briana teased. 

“You looked as if you had a snake down your back or something!” Meg 
declared. 

They laughed some more. 

That’s okay I thought. Go ahead and laugh. 

In a few minutes, when you climb under your covers, I’ll be laughing. 

I couldn’t wait. 



9 


A few minutes later, Jan turned out the lights. I lay on the hard mattress, staring 
up at Meg’s mattress above my head, grinning. Waiting... 

Waiting... 

Meg shifted her weight in the bunk above me. 

I heard her gasp. 

And then both Briana and Meg began to scream. 

I laughed out loud. I couldn’t hold it in. 

“It bit me! It bit me!” Briana howled. 

The lights flashed on. 

“Help!” Meg cried. She leaped out of bed. Her bare feet hit the floor hard. It 
sounded like an elephant landing. 

“It bit me!” Briana cried. 

She and Meg were both on the floor now, dancing and wriggling. Slapping 
at their arms, their legs, their backs. 

I bit my lip to make myself stop laughing. 

“Spiders! Spiders all over!” Meg shrieked. “Ow! It bit me too!” She pulled 
up the sleeve of her nightshirt. “Ow! That hurts!” 

Jan stood at the light switch. I hadn’t moved from my bed. I was enjoying it 
all too much. Watching them squirm and dance. 

But Jan’s words wiped the smile from my face. 

“Sarah put the spiders there,” she told Briana and Meg. “I saw her messing 
around at your bunks when I came in.” 

What a snitch. I guess she was still angry at me because I spilled her asthma 
medicine. 

Well, that put an end to the fun. 

I think Briana and Meg wanted to strangle me. They both had to go to the 
infirmary and wake up the camp nurse. They had to make sure the spider bites 
weren’t poisonous. 

How was I to know that these were the kind of spiders that bite? 

It was just a joke, after all. 

I tried to apologize when they came trudging back from the nurse. But they 



wouldn’t speak to me. And neither would Jan. 

Oh, well, I sighed. So they won’t be my friends. I’ll make other friends.... 

The next morning in the mess hall, I ate breakfast alone. The room had two long 
tables that stretched from wall to wall. One for boys and one for girls. 

I sat at the far end of the girls’ table and spooned up my cornflakes in 
silence. 

All the other girls were chattering away. At the other end of the table, 
Briana and Meg kept flashing me angry looks. 

I saw Aaron at the boys’ table. He and his friends were laughing and 
goofing on each other. Aaron balanced a pancake on his forehead. Another boy 
slapped it off. 

At least he ’s having fun, I thought bitterly. 

I had the sudden urge to go over and tell Aaron how unhappy I was. But I 
knew he would just tell me to lighten up. 

So I sat at my lonely end of the table and choked down my cornflakes. 

Did things get better when I arrived at the lake for canoeing? 

Three guesses. 

Kids were already pulling their canoes off the grassy shore, into the water. 
They all seemed to be paired up. 

Liz walked over to me. Her white one-piece bathing suit glowed in the 
morning sunlight. She had her frizzy red hair tied behind her head. 

She let a silver whistle fall from her mouth. “What’s your name?” she 
asked, eyes on the lake. 

“Sarah,” I told her. “I signed up for canoeing, but—” 

“You need a buddy,” she said. “Find a buddy. The canoes are over there.” 
She pointed, then trotted away. 

Canoes splashed into the water. The slap of the wooden paddles echoed 
around the shore. 

I ran to the stack of canoes, searching for a buddy. But everyone had 
already chosen partners. 

I was about to give up when I spotted Jan, pulling a canoe to the water. “Do 
you have a buddy?” I called. 

She shook her head. 

“Well, can I come with you?” I asked. 

“I don’t think so,” she replied nastily. “Do you have any more spiders you 



want to set loose?” 

“Jan, please—” I started. 

“Are you two together?” Liz appeared behind us, startling us both. 

“No. I—” Jan started. 

“I want to be her buddy, but she doesn’t want to,” I said. I didn’t mean to 
whine, but it came out that way. 

Jan made an ugly face at me. 

“Get your canoe in the water,” Liz ordered. “You two are the last ones in.” 

Jan started to protest. Then she shrugged and sighed. “Okay, Sarah. Let’s 

go-” 

We pulled on life preservers. Then I grabbed a paddle and one end of the 
canoe. We dragged it to the water. 

The little boat bobbed against the shore. The lake current was stronger than 
I thought. Low waves plopped steadily against the grassy shore. 

Jan climbed in and took a seat in the front. “Thanks for embarrassing me in 
front of Liz,” she muttered. 

“I didn’t mean—” I started. 

“Okay. Push off,” she commanded. 

I tossed my paddle into the canoe. Then I leaned over and gave the boat a 
hard shove with both hands. 

It slid smoothly away from the shore. Then I had to wade out to it and pull 
myself inside. 

“Whoa!” As I struggled to hoist myself up, the canoe nearly tipped over. 

“Watch it!” Jan snapped. “You’re such a klutz, Sarah.” 

“Sorry,” I murmured. I was so grateful to have a buddy, I didn’t want any 
more trouble between us. 

I pulled myself into the canoe and dropped down behind Jan. 

The canoe bobbed up and down as we began to paddle. The rocking waters 
sparkled like silver under the bright morning sunshine. 

It took us a while to find the right rhythm. 

Neither of us spoke. 

The slap of our paddles and the rush of water against the little canoe were 
the only sounds we made. 

The lake gleamed in front of us like a giant, round mirror. I could see 
several canoes up ahead. Jan and I were far behind them. 

The rubber life preservers were hot and heavy. We pulled them off and 



dropped them to the canoe floor. 

We paddled steadily, not too fast, not too slow. 

I glanced back. The shore seemed miles away. 

I felt a chill of fear. I’m not that strong a swimmer. I suddenly wondered if I 
could swim all the way to shore from out here. 

“Hey!” As I stared back at the shore, the canoe suddenly started to rock. 
“Whoooa!” I grabbed the sides. 

I turned—and to my horror, saw Jan standing up\ 

“Jan—stop! What are you doing?” I shrieked. “What are you doing?” 

The little boat rocked harder. I gripped the sides, struggling to steady it. 

Jan took a step. 

The canoe tilted. Water splashed over my feet. 

“Jan—stop!” I cried again. “Sit down! What are you doing?” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “Bye, Sarah.” 



10 


The boat tilted more as she raised one foot to the side. She pulled off the T-shirt 
she had over her swimsuit and tossed it to the canoe floor. 

“No—please!” I begged. “Don’t leave me out here. I’m not a good 
swimmer. What if the boat tips over? I don’t think I can swim back from here!” 

“You ruined my summer,” she accused. “Now everyone knows I have 
asthma. So they won’t let me go on the six-day canoe trip.” 

“But—but it was an accident—” I sputtered. 

“And you’re messing up everything for Briana and Meg too,” Jan said 
angrily. 

“No. Wait—” I started. “I apologized to them. I didn’t mean—” 

She shifted her weight. 

Tilted the canoe the other way. 

Then she shifted her weight again. Again. 

Deliberately making the canoe rock. 

Deliberately trying to frighten me. 

“Don’t tip it over, Jan. Please—” I pleaded. 

She tilted it more. Made it rock so hard, I thought I’d tumble out. 

“I’m really not a good swimmer,” I repeated. “I really don’t think I—” 

She uttered a disgusted groan. Then she tossed back her hair. Raised her 
arms over her head. Bent her knees. Kicked off hard. 

And dove into the lake. 

“Noooo!” I let out a cry as the boat rocked violently. Jan’s dive sent up a 
tall, foamy wave of water. 

The canoe tilted... rocked... 

...and flipped over! 

I hit with a smack. Cold water rose up around me as I sank. 

Frozen in shock. 

I felt the canoe bounce above me on the surface. 

Then I started to choke as water invaded my nose and mouth. 

Sputtering and gagging, I thrashed my arms and legs. 

Pushed myself... pushed... pushed myself to the surface. 



And raised my head over the bobbing current. 

Still sputtering, I sucked in a deep breath of fresh air. Then another. 

Floating on the surface, I saw the canoe bobbing upside down on the water. 

I struggled to catch my breath, to slow my racing heart. 

Then I swam to the canoe. I grabbed on to it. Wrapped one arm around it. 
Held on for dear life. 

Bobbing with the canoe, I squinted into the sunlight, searching for Jan. 

“Jan? Jan?” I called to her. 

“Jan? Where are you?” 

I turned and searched in all directions. 

A feeling of cold dread tightened my chest. 

“Jan? Jan? Can you hear me?” I shouted. 



11 


I held on to the canoe with one hand and shielded my eyes with the other. “Jan? 
Jan?” I shouted her name as loudly as I could. 

And then I spotted her. 

I saw her blond hair glowing in the bright sunlight. And I saw her red 
swimsuit. Her arms moving steadily, smoothly. Her feet kicking up foamy 
waves. 

She was making her way to shore. 

She swam away and left me here, I realized. 

I turned and searched for the other canoes. Squinting against the sun, I 
could see them far ahead of me. Too far away to hear my shouts. 

Maybe I can turn the canoe over, I decided. Then I can climb in and paddle 
back to shore. 

But where were the paddles? 

I raised my eyes to the camp—and saw Jan talking to Liz. She was waving 
her arms frantically and pointing out to the water. Pointing to me. 

A crowd of kids gathered around them. I could hear excited voices. Shouts 
and cries. 

I saw Liz pull a canoe into the water. 

She’s coming to rescue me, I realized. Jan must have told her I couldn’t 
swim all the way back. 

I suddenly felt embarrassed. I knew all the kids on shore were watching me. 
I knew they were talking about what a wimp I must be. 

But I didn’t care. I just wanted to get back on dry land. 

It didn’t take Liz long to paddle out to me. When I pulled myself into the 
canoe, I started to thank her. 

But she didn’t let me get a word out. “Why did you do it, Sarah?” she 
demanded. 

“Excuse me?” I gasped. “Do what?” 

“Why did you tip the canoe over?” Liz asked. 

I opened my mouth to protest—but only a squeak came out. 

Liz frowned at me. “Jan says you deliberately tipped over the canoe. Don’t 
you know how dangerous that is, Sarah?” 



“But—but—but—!” 

“I’m calling a special camp meeting because of this,” Liz said. “Water 
safety is so important. The water safety rules must be followed at all times. 
Camp Cold Lake couldn’t exist if campers didn’t follow every rule.” 

“I wish it didn’t exist,” I muttered unhappily. 


* * * 


So Liz held a long meeting at the lodge. And everyone at camp had to be there. 

She went over the rules of water safety again. Rule by rule. 

And then she showed an endless slide show about the Buddy System. 

I sat way on the side and stared down at the floor. But every time I raised 
my eyes, I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan glaring angrily at me. 

Other campers kept staring at me too. I guess they all blamed me for this 
long, boring meeting. Jan probably told everyone in camp that I was the one who 
tipped over the canoe. 

“I want you to memorize all twenty water safety rules,” Liz was saying. 

More campers stared angrily at me. 

Everyone hates me, I thought, shaking my head sadly. And there is nothing 
I can do about it. 

Then, suddenly, I had an idea. 



12 


“I’m going to run away,” I told Aaron. 

“Good-bye,” he said calmly. “Good luck.” 

“No. Really!” I insisted. “I’m not kidding. I’m really going to run away 
from this camp.” 

“Send me a postcard,” Aaron said. 

I had dragged him away from the mess hall after dinner. I really needed to 
talk to him. I pulled him to the edge of the lake. 

No one else was down here. Everyone was still at the mess hall in the 
lodge. 

I glanced at the canoes, stacked in piles of three near the water. I pictured 
Jan’s blond hair, her red swimsuit. I pictured her swimming away, leaving me in 
the middle of the lake. 

And then lying to Liz. Getting me in trouble.... 

I shook Aaron by the shoulders. “Why won’t you take me seriously?” I 
cried through clenched teeth. 

He laughed. 

“You shouldn’t shake a person after they’ve just eaten the camp meat loaf.” 
He let out a loud burp. 

“You’re so gross.” I groaned. 

He grinned. “It’s a family tradition.” 

“Stop joking around. I mean it,” I snapped. “I’m really unhappy, Aaron. I 
hate this camp. There is no phone here we can use. I can’t call Mom and Dad. So 
I’m going to run away.” 

His expression changed. He saw that I was serious. 

He skipped a flat stone across the water. I watched the ripples spread out, 
then disappear. 

The lake reflected the gray evening sky. Everything was gray. The ground, 
the sky, the water. Reflections of trees shimmered darkly in the gray water. 

“Where are you going to run?” Aaron asked softly. I could see him quickly 
becoming the mature, “wiser” brother again. But I didn’t care. 

I had to tell him my plan. I couldn’t leave camp without letting him know. 

“Through the woods,” I said. I pointed. “There is a town on the other side 



of the woods. When I get to the town, I’m going to call Mom and Dad and tell 
them to come get me.” 

“You can’t!” Aaron protested. 

I stuck my chin out. “Why not?” 

“We’re not allowed in the woods,” he replied. “Richard said the woods 
were dangerous—remember?” 

I shoved Aaron again. I was so tense, so angry, I didn’t know what to do 
with my hands. 

“I don’t care what Richard said!” I bellowed. “I’m running away— 
remember?” 

“Give the camp a chance, Sarah,” Aaron urged. “We haven’t even been here 
a whole week. Give the place a chance.” 

That’s when I totally lost it. 

“I hate it when you’re so sensible!” I screamed. 

I shoved him hard. With both hands. 

His mouth flew open. He lost his balance—and toppled into the lake. 

He landed on his back in the wet mud just past the shore. 

“Ooof!” I heard the air shoot out of him. 

“Sorry—” I started. “It was an accident, Aaron. I—” 

He scrambled to his feet, pulling up greasy gunk and seaweed with him. 
Shaking his fists. Calling me all kinds of names. 

I sighed. Now even my brother was furious at me. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself. What can I do? 

As I trudged back to the cabin, another plan began to form in my mind. 

A really desperate plan. 

A really dangerous plan. 

“Tomorrow,” I murmured to myself, “I’m going to show them all!” 



13 


I thought about my plan all the next morning. I was frightened—but I knew I had 
to go through with it. 

Our group had Free Swim that afternoon. Of course, everyone had a buddy 
but me. 

I dug my bare feet into the muddy shore and watched everyone pair up and 
head into the water. Puffy white clouds floated overhead, reflected in the nearly 
still water. 

Tiny gnats jumped over the surface of the water. I stared at them, 
wondering why they didn’t get wet. 

“Sarah, it’s swim time,” Liz called. She hurried over to me. She wore a pink 
one-piece bathing suit under crisp white tennis shorts. 

I adjusted my swimsuit top. My hands were trembling. 

I really was scared by what I planned to do. 

“Why aren’t you swimming?” Liz demanded. She brushed a fly off my 
shoulder. 

“I—I don’t have a buddy,” I stammered. 

She glanced around, trying to find someone for me. But everyone was in 
the lake. 

“Well...” Liz twisted her mouth fretfully. “Go ahead and swim by yourself. 
Stay close to the shore. And I’ll keep an eye on you.” 

“Great. Thanks,” I said. I smiled at her, then trotted enthusiastically to the 
edge of the water. 

I didn’t want her to guess that it wasn’t going to be a normal swim for me. 
That I had something really terrible in mind.... 

I stepped into the water. 

Oooh. So cold. 

A cloud rolled over the sun. The sky darkened, and the air grew colder. 

My feet sank into the muddy bottom of the lake. Up ahead, I saw the gnats 
—hundreds of them—hopping on the water. 

Yuck, I thought. Why do I have to swim with mud and gnats? 

I took a deep breath and stepped out farther. When the cold water was 
nearly up to my waist, I lowered my body in and started to swim. 



I swam a few long laps. I needed to get used to the water. And I needed to 
get my breathing steady. 

A short distance away, Briana and some other girls were having some kind 
of relay race. They were laughing and cheering. Having a great time. 

They won’t be laughing in a few minutes. I told myself bitterly. 

A tall spray of water rushed over me. I cried out. 

Another wave smacked my face. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that I was being splashed—by Aaron. 

He rose up in front of me—and spit a stream of water into my face. 

“Yuck! How can you put this water in your mouth?” I cried, totally grossed 
out. 

He laughed and splashed away to join his buddy. 

He won’t be laughing in a few minutes, either, I told myself. He’ll treat me 
differently after today. 

Everyone will. 

I suddenly felt guilty. I should have told Aaron what I planned to do. I 
didn’t really want to scare him. I wanted to scare everyone else. 

But I knew if I told my plan to practical, sensible Aaron, he would talk me 
out of it. Or go tell Liz so that she would stop me. 

Well... no one is going to stop me, I vowed. 

Have you guessed my desperate plan? 

It was really quite simple. 

I planned to drown myself. 

Well... not really. 

I planned to dive down to the lake bottom. Stay under. A long, long time. 
And make everyone think that I had drowned. 

I can hold my breath for a very long time. It’s because I play the flute. I’ve 
really developed my lung power. 

I can probably stay underwater for two or three minutes. 

Long enough to scare everyone to death. 

Everyone will panic. Even Briana, Meg, and Jan. 

Everyone will feel sorry for how mean they were to me. 

I’ll get a new start. After my close call in the lake, everyone in camp will 
want to be nice to me. 

Everyone will want to be my buddy. 

So... here goes. 



I took one last look at all the laughing, shouting swimmers. 
Then I sucked in the biggest breath I had ever taken. 

And plunged down, down to the bottom of the lake. 



14 


The lake was shallow for only a few feet. Then the lake bottom gave way in a 
steep drop. 

I kicked hard, pushing myself away from the other swimmers. Then I pulled 
myself upright, lowering my feet. 

Yes. 

I dropped my hands to my sides and let myself sink. 

Down, down. 

I opened my eyes as I dropped to the lake bottom. I saw only green. Waves 
of pale light shimmered through the green. 

I’m floating inside an emerald, I thought. Floating down, down in a 
sparkling green jewel. 

I pictured the tiny emerald on the ring Mom wore every day. Her 
engagement ring. I thought about Mom and Dad, thought how sad they’d be if I 
really did drown. 

We never should have sent Sarah to that water sports camp, they would say. 

My feet hit the soft lake floor. 

A bubble of air escaped my mouth. I pressed my lips tighter, holding the air 
inside. 

I slowly floated up toward the surface. 

I closed my eyes. I kept my whole body still to make it look as if I’d 
drowned. 

I pictured the horror on Liz’s face when she saw my body floating so still, 
floating under the water, my hair bobbing on the surface. 

I almost laughed when I thought of Liz leaping into the lake to rescue me, 
having to get her crisp white tennis shorts wet, I forced myself to remain still. 

I shut my eyes even tighter. And thought about Briana, Meg, and Jan. 

They’ll feel so guilty They’ll never forgive themselves for the way they 
treated me. 

After my close call, they’ll see how mean they were. And they’ll want to be 
best friends with me. 

We’ll all be best friends. 

And we’ll have a great summer together. 



My chest began to feel tight. The back of my throat began to burn. 

I opened my lips and let out a few more bubbles of air. 

But my throat still burned, and so did my chest. 

I floated facedown. I kept my legs stiff and let my arms hang loosely at my 
sides. 

I listened for shouts of alarm. 

Someone must have spotted me by now. 

I listened for cries of help. For kids calling Liz. 

But I heard only silence. The heavy silence you hear when you’re 
underwater. 

I let out another bubble of air. 

My chest really hurt now. It felt about to explode. 

I opened my eyes. Was anyone nearby? Was anyone coming to rescue me? 

I saw only green. 

Where is everyone? I wondered. 

Liz must have spotted me by now. Why isn’t she pulling me up out of the 
water? 

I pictured her again in her white tennis shorts. I pictured her tanned arms 
and legs. I pictured her red hair. 

Liz—where are you? 

Liz—don’t you see me drowning here? You said you’d keep an eye on me, 
remember? 

I can’t stay under much longer. 

My chest is ready to explode. My whole body is tingling. Burning. My head 
feels about to pop open. 

Can’t anyone see me here ? 

A wave of dizziness swept over me. 

I shut my eyes, but the dizziness didn’t go away. 

I pushed out the rest of the air in my lungs. 

No air, I thought. No air left.... 

My arms and legs ached. 

My chest burned. 

With my eyes closed, I saw bright yellow spots. 

Dancing yellow lights. They grew brighter... brighter. They did a fast, 
furious dance all around me. 



Around my burning, tingling body. 

My chest... exploding... exploding... 

I’m so cold, I realized. Suddenly, I feel so cold. 

The dancing, darting yellow lights grew brighter. Bright as spotlights. 
Bright as flashbulbs, flashing in my eyes. 

Flashing around my still, cold body. 

I shuddered from the cold. 

Shuddered again. 

Cold, thick water filled my mouth. 

I’ve stayed under too long, I realized. 

No one is coming. No one is coming to save me. 

Too long... too long. 

I struggled to see. But the lights were too bright. 

Can’t see. Can’t see. 

I swallowed another mouthful of water. 

Can’t see. Can’t breathe. 

I can’t stay under any longer. I can’t wait any longer. 

I struggled to raise my head out of the water. But it felt so heavy. It weighed 
a ton. 

Can’t stay down... 

Can’t breathe. 

With a burst of strength, I moved my shoulders. Pulled them up. 

Hoisted up my head. 

So heavy... so heavy. My hair filled with water. My hair so heavy. The 
water running down my face. 

Over my eyes. 

I turned to shore. Squinted through the bright, darting lights. 

Squinted hard through the water running down my face. 

Squinted... 

No one there. 

I turned again. My eyes searched the water. 

No one there. No one swimming. No one on the shore. 

Where is everyone ? I wondered. Shivering. Shuddering. 

Where did everyone go? 



15 


I struggled to shore. 

My feet were numb. I couldn’t feel the muddy bottom as I staggered out of 
the water. 

I rubbed my arms. I couldn’t feel the touch of my hands. Couldn’t feel the 
water pouring off me, running down my back. 

Couldn’t feel anything. Numb. Numb all over. 

“Where is everyone?” I called. 

But did I make a sound? Did I have a voice? 

I couldn’t hear myself. 

I stepped onto the grass and shook myself. Like a dog trying to get dry. 
Trying to shake some feeling into my cold, numb body. 

“Where did you all go?” 

Hugging myself, I stumbled forward. I stopped when I saw the canoes. All 
tacked upside down by the shore and tied up. 

Weren’t kids canoeing today? Weren’t the canoes all out in the lake? 

“Hey!” I shouted. 

But why couldn’t I hear my shout? 

“Where is everyone?” 

No one on the shore. 

I spun around, nearly losing my balance. No one in the water. 

No one. No one anywhere. 

I stumbled past the life preservers and rubber rafts. Covered with a canvas 

tarp. 

Isn’t anyone going to use them? I wondered. Why are they covered up? 

Why did everyone leave the lake so quickly? 

Shivering, hugging myself, I made my way toward the lodge. I gasped 
when I noticed the trees. 

Bare. All winter bare. 

“Noooooooo!” a frightened wail escaped my throat. A silent wail. 

Could anyone hear me? 

When had the leaves fallen? Why had they fallen in the middle of summer? 



I started to trot along the path to the lodge. Cold. So cold. 

Something stung my shoulder. Something tingled my eyelids. 

Snow? 

Yes. Tiny white flakes drifted down, blown by a steady breeze. The bare 
trees rattled and creaked. 

I brushed snowflakes from my wet hair. 

Snow? 

But I knew that was impossible. 

All impossible. 

“Heeeeeeey!” My shout echoed through the trees. Or did it? 

Could anyone hear my frightened call? 

“Hellllllllllp!” I shouted. “Somebody hellllllp me!” 

Silence, except for the creaking tree limbs overhead. 

I started to run again. My bare feet moved silently over the cold ground. 

The cabins came into view as I made my way out of the trees. Their flat 
roofs were covered by a thin layer of snow. 

The ground was as gray as the sky. The cabins were all dark, the shingled 
walls gray. Gray all around me. 

A cold world of gray. 

I pushed open the door of the first cabin I came to. “Hey—I need help!” I 
cried. 

I stared into the empty room. 

No one there. No camp trunks. No clothes scattered about. 

I raised my eyes to the bunk beds against the wall. The blankets, the sheets 
—the mattresses—had all been taken away. 

I guess this cabin isn’t being used, I thought. 

I backed out of the door. Turned and ran down the row of cabins. All dark 
and silent. 

My cabin stood where the path curved up the hill. With a sigh of relief, I ran 
up to it and pushed open the door. 

“Briana? Meg?” 

Empty. And dark. 

The mattresses gone. The posters pulled down. No clothes. No bags or 
trunks. 

No sign that anyone had ever lived in here. 

“Where are you?” I shrieked. 



And then, “Where am I?” 

Where was my stuff? Where was my bed? 

Uttering another terrified wail, I lurched out of the cabin. 

Cold. So cold and numb. Running through the cold in my wet bathing suit. 

I tore through the camp. Pulling open doors. Peering into bare, empty 
rooms. Calling. Calling for someone—anyone—to help me. 

Into the main lodge. My cries echoing off the high, wooden rafters. 

Or did they? Was I really making a sound? 

Why couldn’t I hear myself? 

I burst into the mess hall. The long, wooden benches had been stacked on 
top of the tables. The kitchen stood dark and empty. 

What has happened? I wondered, unable to stop my trembling. 

Where did everyone go? Why did they all leave? How did they leave so 
quickly? How can it be snowing? 

I stumbled back out into the gray cold. Wisps of gray fog floated low over 
the gray ground. I hugged my frozen body, trying to warm myself. 

Terrified and confused, I wandered from building to building. I felt as if I 
were swimming again. Swimming in the thick gray mists. Swimming through 
endless layers of gray. 

And then I stopped when I heard a voice. 

A tiny voice. A girl’s voice. 

Singing. 

She was singing in a high, frail voice. 

“I’m not alone!” I cried. 

I listened to her song. A sad song sung so softly. 

And then I called out to her, “Where are you? I can’t see you! Where are 
you?” 



16 


I followed the tiny voice to the lodge. I saw a girl perched on the wooden steps. 

“Hey!” I called. “Hey! I was looking for someone! Can you help me?” 

She kept singing, as if she didn’t see me. As I walked closer, I realized she 
was singing the Camp Cold Lake song in her tiny, light voice. 

She had long curls of white-blond hair that flowed down the sides of her 
face. A pretty face, delicate and pale. So incredibly pale. 

She wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and white short shorts. Snowflakes fell 
all around us. I shivered. But she didn’t seem to notice the cold. 

She tilted her head from side to side as she sang. Her round blue eyes stared 
out at the sky. They reminded me of shiny blue marbles in her pale, pale face. 

I stepped up in front of her. I brushed snowflakes from my forehead. 

She didn’t turn to me until her song was finished. Then she smiled. “Hi, 
Sarah.” Her speaking voice was as soft as her singing. 

“How—how do you know my name?” I stammered. 

Her smile grew wider. “I’ve been waiting for you,” she replied. “My name 
is Della.” 

“Della—I’m so cold,” I blurted out. 

She rose to her feet. Turned. And pulled something out from behind the 
steps. 

A white bathrobe. 

She held it up and slipped it around my trembling shoulders. 

Her hands were so light. I could barely feel them. 

She helped me tie the belt. Then she stepped back and smiled at me again. 
“I’ve been waiting for you, Sarah,” she said. Her voice was a sigh, a whisper. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “Waiting—?” 

She nodded. Her white-blond hair fluttered with every move of her head. “I 
can’t leave without you, Sarah. I need a buddy.” 

I stared at her, trying to understand. 

“Where is everyone?” I cried. “Where did everyone go? Why are you the 
only one here?” I bmshed snowflakes from my eyebrows. “Della, how did it get 
to be winter?” 



“You’ll be my buddy—won’t you, Sarah?” Her blue eyes burned into mine. 
Her hair glowed around her pale face. 

I blinked. “I don’t understand—” I started. “Please answer my questions.” 
“You’ll be my buddy, won’t you?” she repeated, pleading with those 
amazing eyes. “I’ve waited so long for a buddy, Sarah. So long.” 

“But, Della—” 

She started to sing again. 

I shoved my hands into the pockets of the robe. I shivered. I couldn’t get 
warm. I couldn’t stop shaking. 

Why was she singing the Camp Cold Lake song so sadly? 

Why wouldn’t she answer my questions? 

How did she know my name? And why did she say she’d been waiting for 

me? 

“Della, please—” I begged. 

Singing her strange, sad song, she floated up the wooden stairs to the lodge. 
Her hair shimmered, golden in the gray light. Swirls of fog curled around her as 
she moved. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I realized I could see right through her. 

“Della—?” 

She floated over the stairs, tilting her head from side to side, singing in that 
breathy whisper of a voice. 

“Della—?” 

She stopped singing and smiled at me again. Snowflakes covered her blond 
hair. The fog still swirled around her. 

I could see the dark shingles of the lodge through her body. I stared right 
through her. 

“Sarah, you’re my buddy now,” she whispered. “I need a buddy. Everyone 
at Camp Cold Lake needs a buddy.” 

“But—but you ’re dead\” I blurted out. 

Della is dead, I realized. 

And I’m her buddy. 

That means... 

That means that I’m dead tool 



17 


Della floated over me. So light and pale. The wind fluttered her hair. It rose 
around her like a shimmering halo. 

“You’re dead,” I murmured. “And I am too.” 

Saying the words sent a cold shudder down my body. 

I began to realize the truth. I began to see what had happened. 

Della had probably drowned here. Drowned in the lake. 

That is why everyone at the camp is so crazy about water safety. 

That explains the endless water safety lectures. And the long list of rules. 
And why the counselors insist on the Buddy System at ah times. 

Della drowned here. 

And now I’m her buddy. 

I’m her buddy—because I drowned too. 

“Noooooooooo!” Along wail of horror, of disbelief, escaped my throat. 

I threw my head back and wailed like an animal. Wailed out my sorrow. 

Della floated over me, watching me. Waiting for me to stop. She knew what 
I was thinking. She knew I had figured everything out. 

She waited patiently. How long had she been waiting there for me? Waiting 
for a buddy? Another dead buddy? 

How long had she been waiting for another unlucky girl to drown? 

“Noooo!” I moaned. “No, I won’t do it, Della! I can’t do it! I won’t be your 
buddy! I won’t!” 

I spun around. So dizzy, I nearly dropped to my knees. 

I started to run. The white robe flew open. It flapped beside me like wings 
as I ran away from her. 

Ran barefoot over the snowy ground. 

Ran through the swirls of fog. Through the gray. 

“Come back, Sarah!” I heard Della call to me. “Come back! You have to be 
my buddy! I’m trapped here. Trapped as a ghost. I can’t leave this camp—I can’t 
get to the other world—without a buddy!” 

But I didn’t stop. I kept running through the camp. Past the cabins. Past the 
supply sheds at the edge of the woods. 



I kept running from her calls. Running from her ghostly voice. 

I don’t want to be her buddy, I told myself. I don’t want to be a ghost ! 

I blinked away snowflakes as I ran. Ran through the bare, creaking trees. 
Ran without looking back. 

I stopped when I reached the lake shore. Stopped when I felt the cold water 
lap over my feet. 

The cold, gray water. 

I struggled to catch my breath. But my chest hurt. Felt about to explode. 
Gasping, I turned—and saw Della floating through the trees. Floating 
toward me, her eyes glowing with blue fire. 

“You can’t leave without me, Sarah!” she called. “You can’t leave, Sarah!” 

I turned away from her. Turned back to the water. 

My chest. My head. 

Everything hurt so much. 

I couldn’t breathe. 

My chest was going to burst. 

I sank to the mud. 

As the gray faded to black. 



18 


Pinpricks of white light danced above me. 

I thought of fireflies, darting above the grass late at night. 

The tiny lights grew brighter. Round, like flashlight beams. 

Brighter still. 

Until I was staring into a glowing ball of gold. 

I blinked. 

It took me a long while to realize that I was staring up at the sun. 

I turned my head away. 

I suddenly felt heavy. I could feel the ground beneath me. I could feel the 
weight of my body on the ground. 

My body. My solid body, coming back to me. 

I heard a groan. Someone moved above me. 

I blinked several times. And squinted up at Liz. 

Her face was red. Her mouth was twisted in a hard scowl. 

“Ohhh.” I groaned as she pressed both hands on my chest. Raised her 
hands. Pressed again. 

I felt water slide from my open mouth. 

I choked. Felt more water pour down my chin. 

“She’s coming around,” Liz announced. She pressed hard on my chest 
again. “She’s alive!” Liz cried. 

Behind her, I could see bare legs. Swimsuits. Campers. 

Yes. The other campers. 

I groaned again. Liz continued to work over me. 

I’m lying on my back, I realized. I’m on the lake shore. Liz is giving me 
CPR. 

The other campers are standing around me. Watching. Watching Liz save 
my life. 

“I’m—ALIVE!” The word burst from my throat. 

I sat up. And gazed around. 

Everyone is back! I realized. It’s summer again. The leaves are back on the 
trees. The sun is beaming down. 



And everyone is back. Including me! 

Liz uttered a sigh and sank back on her knees. “Sarah, are you okay?” she 
asked breathlessly. She mopped sweat from her forehead with the back of her 
hand. “Are you okay?” 

“I... I think so,” I murmured. 

I had a sour taste in my mouth. I still felt a little dizzy. 

Behind Liz, some campers cheered and applauded. 

“We thought you were gone for a moment.” Liz sighed. “You stopped 
breathing. What a scare!” 

Two counselors helped me to my feet. I tried to shake off my dizziness. 
“I’m okay!” I cried. “Thank you, Liz. You—you saved my life!” 

I hugged Liz. Then I turned and hugged Aaron. 

Briana and Meg were standing nearby. I startled them by hugging them too. 

I was so happy to be alive! So happy to be away from that gray, gray winter. 
Away from that frightening ghost girl in the empty camp. 

“Sarah—what happened?” Liz asked, placing a hand on my still-wet 
shoulder. She gently brushed back my hair. 

“I’m not sure,” I told her. “I’m really not sure.” 

Liz shuddered. “When you stopped breathing, I... I got so scared.” 

“I’m fine now,” I told her with a smile. “Thanks to you.” 

“She did it for attention,” I heard someone mutter. 

I turned—and saw Jan whispering to another girl. “Now everyone has to 
say ‘Poor Sarah’,” Jan whispered nastily. “Now everyone has to be nice to her.” 

I felt hurt. I opened my mouth to say something to Jan. 

But I was so happy to be back, so happy to be alive, I just ignored it. 

I rested a hand on Aaron’s shoulder and let him walk me back to my cabin. 
“I’m going to enjoy the rest of camp,” I told my brother. “I really am.” 

The nurse checked me out carefully. Then I rested all afternoon. I took a long 
nap. 

When I woke up, I was starving. I realized I hadn’t eaten all day. 

I pulled on jeans and a camp sweatshirt and hurried to the campfire. As I 
trotted down the path toward the clearing by the woods, the aroma of hot dogs 
and hamburgers on the barbecue drifted out to me. 

Richard greeted me at the campfire circle. “Sarah, you look great!” he 
exclaimed. “I heard about... what happened at the lake this afternoon.” 



“Well, I’m fine now,” I told him. “I feel great.” 

“Hey—no more close calls,” he scolded. “Or else you have to swim in the 
kiddie pool.” 

“I’ll be careful,” I promised. 

“You’d better—because we don’t have a kiddie pool!” he joked. 

I laughed. 

“Take a seat,” he said, pointing to the circle of logs. “Take a seat, 
everyone!” he called out. “We’re going to have a meeting before we eat!” 

Most of the campers had already taken their places. I glanced around the 
circle quickly, searching for a place to sit. 

“Sarah—?” A voice called to me. 

“Sarah—over here.” 

I let out a shocked cry when I saw Della. 

Della. By herself on a log back near the woods. Her blond hair shimmering 
around her pale face. The pink evening sunlight shining through her body. 

Shining right through her. 

“Noooo!” I moaned. 

“Come over here, Sarah!” Della called. “Please—sit over here with me. Be 
my buddy!” 



19 


I raised my hands to my cheeks and let out a shrill scream. 

“No! You’re not here!” I wailed. “You’re a ghost! You don’t belong here! 
I’m alive now! I’m alive!” 

I turned and saw Richard and Liz hurrying toward me. 

Across the circle, Aaron jumped up and came running over. “Sarah—what’s 
wrong? What is it?” he cried. 

“Don’t you see her?” I shrieked. I pointed to the log near the woods. “She’s 
a ghost! But I’m alive!” 

Liz wrapped her arms around me. “It’s okay, Sarah,” she whispered. 
“You’re okay now.” 

“But—but she’s sitting there!” I sputtered. 

Everyone turned to the log. 

“There’s no one there,” Richard said. He narrowed his eyes at me. 

“You had a terrible shock,” Liz said softly. “A terrible shock. You’re still 
not quite yourself, Sarah.” 

“But—but—” I stammered. 

I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan huddled together, talking softly. Watching me. 

What are they saying about me? I wondered. 

“Do you want me to walk you back to your cabin?” Richard asked. 

I shook my head. “No. I’m starving!” 

Liz laughed. “Maybe that’s your problem. You’re so hungry, you’re seeing 
things! Let’s get you a hot dog—fast.” 

After a couple of hot dogs, I started to feel better. The campfire meeting 
began. I sat next to some girls from a different cabin. 

As Richard talked, I gazed around the circle. Stared at the campers’ faces, 
orange from the flickering campfire. Searching for Della. 

Della the ghost... 

Was she still here? Still watching me? Still waiting for me to be her buddy? 

I sat forward tensely. My whole body stiff. My eyes straining to see her 
pale, pale face. 

But she had vanished. 



For now. 

Liz took over the meeting. Most campers groaned when she started another 
lecture on water safety. 

“We had a close call today,” Liz said. “A frightening close call.” 

I knew everyone was staring at me. I could feel my face growing hot. I 
gazed into the yellow flames of the campfire. 

When I raised my eyes, I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan on the next log, 
whispering together. About me? 

“Our water safety rules are so important here at Camp Cold Lake,” Liz was 
saying. “Some campers joke that having so many rules is the curse of Camp 
Cold Lake, because we talk about the rules so much.” 

She pressed her hands against her sides. Her eyes moved from camper to 
camper. “But as we saw this afternoon,” she continued, “the Buddy System isn’t 
a curse—it’s a blessing.” 

A face rose up behind the darting flames of the fire. 

I gasped. 

Della! 

No. A girl from another cabin, climbing up to get more food. 

I sank back. 

I have to get away from this camp, I decided. I can’t have a good time here. 
Not if I always have to keep an eye out for Della. 

Liz rattled on about the water rules. 

Richard made a few announcements. 

Everyone sang some camp songs. 

When the campfire ended, I jumped up quickly and started along the path to 
my cabin. I had gone only a few steps when I heard fast footsteps behind me. 
And heard someone calling my name. 

Was it the ghost? 

I turned to see Aaron jogging up to me. “What was that screaming about?” 
he demanded. “Did you really think you saw a ghost?” 

“Why should I tell you?” I snapped. I continued along the path, walking 
rapidly. “You’ll only laugh at me.” 

“Try me,” he replied, running to catch up. “I won’t laugh. I promise.” 

“I saw a ghost girl,” I told him. “I swear I did. She called to me. She wants 
me to be her buddy.” 

Aaron laughed. “No. Really,” he said. “What did you really see? Be 



serious.” 

“I am serious!” I cried. “I have to get away from here, Aaron. I’m going to 
mn away. Get to a phone. Call Mom and Dad. Tonight. I’m going to tell them to 
come get me.” 

“You can’t!” Aaron replied. He grabbed my arm and forced me to stop 
walking. I could see kids staring at us as they walked past. 

“Mom and Dad won’t want to make more than one trip up here. So if you 
call them, they’ll make me come home too,” Aaron protested. “And I don’t want 
to leave. I’m having a great time!” 

“You don’t understand,” I told him. “I can’t stay here. I can’t—” 

“Please, Sarah,” he begged. “Try to stick it out. Give it a little more time. 
You’re just a little messed up because of the lake this afternoon. But you’ll be 
okay. Give it some time.” 

I didn’t say yes, and I didn’t say no. 

I just told Aaron good-night and headed to my cabin. 

I stopped outside the door. All the lights were on. I heard Briana, Meg, and 
Jan talking softly. 

They stopped talking as soon as I stepped inside. 

All three of them stared hard at me. Their expressions were tense. They 
moved quickly. 

Moved toward me as I started across the room. 

They formed a circle around me. Surrounded me. 

“What is it?” I cried. “What are you going to do?” 



20 


“We want to apologize,” Briana said. 

“We’ve been kind of rough on you,” Jan added in her scratchy voice. 
“We’re really sorry.” 

“We’ve been talking about it,” Briana said. “We—” 

“We decided we’ve been really unfair,” Meg interrupted. “We’re sorry, 
Sarah.” 

“I—I’m sorry too,” I stammered. I was so stunned by their apologies, I 
could barely speak. 

“Let’s start all over,” Briana suggested. She grabbed my hand. “Nice to 
meet you, Sarah. My name is Briana.” 

“Excellent. Afresh start!” Jan declared. 

“Thanks. I’m really glad,” I told them. And I meant it. 

Jan turned to Briana. “When did you do that to your nails?” 

Briana grinned and raised both hands. Her fingernails were a shiny, bright 
purple. “It’s a new color,” she said. “I did it after our swim.” 

“What color is it?” Meg asked. 

“Grape Juice, I think,” Briana replied. “They all have such crazy names.” 
She dug the bottle of nail polish from her pack and held it out to me. “Want to 
try it?” 

“Well... sure,” I replied. 

All four of us stayed up far past Lights Out, making our fingernails purple. 

Later, I lay in my bunk, drifting off to sleep. I had a smile on my face, 
thinking about my three bunk mates. My three friends. 

They had really cheered me up. 

But my smile faded when I heard a whispered voice float across the dark 
cabin. “Sarah... Sarah...” 

I gasped. 

And then the frail voice—soft as the wind—was so close... so close to my 

“Sarah. I thought you were my buddy, Sarah. Why did you leave me?” 

“No—please—” I begged. 


ear. 



“Sarah, I waited so long for you,” the ghostly voice whispered. “Come with 
me. Come with me, Sarah....” 

And then an icy hand gripped my shoulder. 



21 


“Ohhhhh!” 

I bolted up in the bunk. And stared out at Briana’s dark eyes. 

She let go of my shoulder. “Sarah,” she whispered. “You were whimpering 
in your sleep.” 

“Huh? What?” My voice quivered. My heart pounded. I realized I was 
drenched in sweat. 

“You were whimpering in your sleep,” Briana repeated. “Crying and 
moaning. I thought I’d better wake you.” 

“Uh... thanks,” I choked out. “Must have been a bad dream, I guess.” 

Briana nodded and crept back to her bunk. 

I didn’t move. I sat there trembling, staring out across the dark cabin. 

A bad dream? 

I didn’t think so.... 

“You can skip the long-distance swim today if you want,” Liz told me at 
breakfast the next morning. She leaned over my chair as I downed my 
cornflakes. I could smell the toothpaste on her breath. 

“Well...” I hesitated. “How long is the swim?” 

“We’re swimming halfway across the lake,” Liz replied. “Halfway out, then 
back. I’ll be in a boat at the halfway point. It isn’t really that far. But if you feel 
like skipping it today...” 

I set down my spoon. I could see Meg and Briana watching me from across 
the table. Beside me, Jan was struggling to choke down a half-toasted, frozen 
waffle. 

“Come on. Swim with us,” Briana urged. 

“I’ll be your buddy,” Jan said. “I’ll swim with you, Sarah.” 

Our frightening canoe adventure flashed into my mind. Once again, I 
pictured that horrible moment when Jan jumped from the canoe. Tipping it over. 
Leaving me there. 

But things were different now. 

We were friends. All four of us were friends now. I had to forget about what 
happened with the canoe. I had to forget about our bad start. 



“Okay,” I agreed. “Thanks, Jan. I’ll be your buddy.” I turned back to Liz. 
“I’m ready to swim.” 

The morning sun still floated low in the sky. It kept fading behind broad, gray 
clouds. And each time the sun disappeared, the air became as cold as the water. 

The lake was so cold in the early morning! 

As I waded in, I suddenly realized why it was named “Cold Lake”. 

We all stepped carefully into the water, shivering and complaining. The 
water lapped over my ankles, stinging them. I stopped with a gasp and waited to 
get used to the cold. 

I raised my eyes at the sound of a motorboat and saw Liz chugging to her 
place in the middle of the lake. When she reached the spot, she cut the engine. 
Then she picked up an electric megaphone. 

“Warm up first, everyone!” she instructed us. 

We all laughed. “Warm up? How are we supposed to warm up? It’s 
freezing!” 

Two girls near the shore began splashing each other. 

“Stop it! Whoooa! It’s collldV’ one of them shrieked. 

Taking another few steps over the soft lake bottom, I adjusted the top of my 
blue swimsuit. “We need wet suits,” I told Jan. 

She nodded, then waded out until the water lapped at her waist. “Come on, 
Sarah. Stick together.” She motioned for me to follow. 

I took a deep breath—and plunged into the water. 

A shock of cold swept over my body. But I dove under the water and swam 
out a few strokes. Then I raised my head and turned back to Jan. 

“Show off,” she muttered. She dipped her hands in the water, still 
struggling to get used to the cold. 

I laughed. “It’s refreshing!” I exclaimed, brushing my wet hair back. “Come 
on—just push off. It isn’t that bad.” 

Jan lowered herself into the water. Most of the swimmers were in the water 
now, moving in circles, floating on their backs, treading water. 

“Line up, everyone!” Liz instructed from her boat. Her voice through the 
megaphone echoed off the trees behind us. “Line up. Two at a time. Let’s go!” 

It took a while for everyone to get in place. Jan and I were second in line. 

I watched the first two girls begin to swim. One of them moved with 
smooth, steady strokes. The other one splashed and thrashed. 



Everyone cheered them on. 

Jan and I gave them about a two-minute head start. Then we began to swim. 

I tried to copy the first girl’s rhythmic stroke. I didn’t want to look like a 
klutz. I knew all the other swimmers were watching. But let’s get real. I’m not 
exactly headed for the Olympics. 

Jan pulled ahead easily. As we swam, she kept turning back to make sure I 
was keeping up with her. 

The turnaround spot was just past Liz’s motor-boat. I kept my eyes on it as I 
followed Jan through the water. It seemed very far away! 

Jan picked up speed. My arms started aching about halfway to the boat. 

I’m in bad shape, I told myself. I’ve really got to start working out or 
something. 

Liz’s boat bobbed gently up ahead of us. Liz was shouting something into 
the megaphone. But the splash of the water kept me from making out the words. 

Up ahead of me, Jan picked up the pace. 

“Hey—slow down!” I called. But there was no way she could hear me. 

Ignoring the aching in my arms, I struggled to catch up to her. I kicked my 
legs harder, splashing up water behind me. 

The sun dipped once again behind a high cloud. The sky darkened, and the 
water seemed to chill. 

Liz’s boat rocked in the water, just up ahead. I kept my eyes on Jan. 
Watched her steady kicks. Her hair bobbing on the lake surface like some kind of 
sea creature. 

When Jan turns back, I’ll turn back, I decided. 

I swam a little faster. Let’s turn, I pleaded silently. Jan, we’re here. We’re 
even with Liz’s motorboat. I’m ready to turn back now. 

But to my surprise, Jan kept stroking, kept swimming straight ahead. Her 
head ducked under the water. Her arms moved easily, gracefully, pulling her 
farther ahead of me. 

“Jan—?” 

My arms ached. My chest started to burn. 

“Hey, Jan—can we turn now?” 

She swam steadily ahead. 

With a burst of energy, I pulled myself forward. “Jan, wait—” I called. 
“We’re supposed to head back!” 

She stopped stroking. 



Did she hear me? 

Breathing hard, my chest burning, I swam up to her. 

She turned to face me. 

“Jan—■?” I gasped. 

No. Not Jan. 

It wasn’t Jan. It was Della! 

Her blue eyes sparkled as a gleeful smile spread over her pale, pale face. 
“Keep swimming, Sarah,” she whispered. “We’re going to swim farther. 
And farther. You’re my buddy now.” 



22 


She grabbed my arm. 

I tried to tug away. My wet arm slid in her grasp. 

But her grip tightened around my wrist. And she held on. Pulling me. 
Pulling me with her. 

“Owww!” 

She was strong. So strong for such a frail-looking girl. 

Such a frail-looking ghost ... 

“Let go!” I shrieked. 

I struggled, slapping the water. Kicking. Squirming and twisting. 

“Della—I won’t come with you!” 

I jerked my body around, spun hard—and broke free. 

And dropped beneath the surface. Lifting both arms, I rose up, coughing 
and sputtering. 

Where was she? 

Where? 

Was she right behind me? Ready to pull me with her, pull me out so far I 
couldn’t swim back? 

I spun away. The water rocked and tilted. 

The clouds overhead appeared to roar past. 

“Sarah... Sarah...?” Was she calling to me? 

Why couldn’t I see her now? 

I turned again. My eyes stopped on the boat. 

Yes. The boat. 

Ignoring my racing heartbeats, my aching arms, I plunged forward. 

The boat... got to reach the boat before she grabs me again. 

Swimming furiously, kicking with my last bit of strength, I dove for the 
boat. Stretching my arms out... stretching... 

And grabbed the side with both hands. Choking and gasping. 

Grabbed the side of the boat and tried to pull myself in. 

“Liz—help me.” The words escaped my throat in a hoarse whisper. 

“Liz—help me in.” 



The sun burst out from behind the clouds. I stared up into blinding golden 

light. 

“Liz—please...” 

Hands reached down for me. She bent to pull me into the motorboat. 

Leaned forward. Pulling me up. 

Blinking against the bright sunlight, I raised my eyes to her face. 

No! 

Not Liz’s face. Not Liz! 

Della! 

Della—pulling me into the boat. “What’s wrong, Sarah?” she whispered. 
Pulling me. Pulling me up to her. “Sarah, you’re okay. You’re perfectly okay.” 



23 


“Let go!” I wailed. 

I tore myself from her grip. 

And tried to blink away the sun. 

And stared up at Liz. 

Not Della. Liz. Her face twisted in concern. 

“Sarah, you’re okay,” she repeated. 

“But—” I stared up at her. Waiting for her face to change again. Waiting for 
her to become Della again. 

Had I only imagined Della’s face? Had the streaming sunlight tricked my 
eyes? 

With a sigh, I let her help me into the boat. 

I slumped to my knees. The boat rocked up and down. Liz narrowed her 
eyes at me. “What happened out there?” she asked. 

Before I could answer, I heard splashing outside the boat. 

Della? 

I froze. 

No. Jan pulled herself up on the side. She brushed her wet hair off her face. 
“Sarah—didn’t you hear me calling you?” she demanded. 

“Jan. I didn’t see you. I thought that—” My voice caught in my throat. 

“Why did you swim away from me?” Jan asked. “I’m your buddy— 
remember?” 

Liz drove me to shore. I changed my clothes and went to see Richard. I found 
him in his head counselor’s office, a little room about the size of a closet in the 
back of the main lodge. 

He was resting his feet on top of his tiny desk. He twirled a toothpick in his 
mouth. 

“Hey, Sarah—how’s it going?” He flashed me a friendly smile and 
motioned for me to take a seat in the folding chair across from his desk. 

I could see his eyes studying me. 

“I hear you had another little problem in the lake,” he said softly. He moved 



the toothpick to the other side of his mouth. “What’s going on?” 

I took a deep breath. 

Should I tell him there is a ghost girl who has been following me 
everywhere? Who wants me to be her buddy? 

He’d just think I’m nuts, I decided. 

“You had a bad shock yesterday,” Richard said. “We really thought that you 
drowned.” 

He lowered his feet and leaned over the desk toward me. “Maybe you went 
back in the water too soon,” he said. “Too soon after the shock.” 

“Maybe,” I murmured. 

And then I blurted out the question that was really on my mind. “Richard, 
tell me about the girl who drowned here.” 

His mouth dropped open. “Huh?” The toothpick fell onto his lap. 

“I know that a girl drowned in the lake,” I insisted. “Can you tell me about 
her?” 

Richard shook his head. “No girl ever drowned at Camp Cold Lake,” he 
said. “Never.” 

I knew he was lying. 

I had proof, after all. I had seen Della. And talked with her. 

“Richard, please—” I begged. “I really need to know. Tell me about her.” 

He frowned. “Why don’t you believe me, Sarah? I’m telling the truth. No 
campers have ever drowned at this camp. No boys. No girls.” 

I heard a soft sigh behind me. 

I glanced back at the open doorway—and saw Della standing there. 

I jumped to my feet. And pointed. “Richard!” I cried. “The girl who 
drowned! She’s standing right there! Don’t you see her?” 

Richard raised his eyes to the doorway. “Yes,” he replied softly. “I see her.” 



24 


“Huh?” I gasped and grabbed the edge of his desk. “You see her?” I cried. “You 
really do?” 

Richard nodded. He had a solemn expression on his face. “If it makes you 
feel better, Sarah, I’ll say that I see her.” 

“But you don’t really see her?” I demanded. 

He scratched his sandy-colored hair. “No. I don’t see anything.” 

I turned back to the doorway. Della grinned at me. 

“Sit down. Please,” Richard instructed. “You know, sometimes our mind 
plays tricks on us. Especially when we’ve been through a really bad scare.” 

I didn’t sit down. I stood in front of his desk and stared hard at Della. Stared 
right through her. 

“She’s not in my mind! She’s right there!” I shouted. “She’s standing right 
there, Richard. Her name is Della. She drowned at this camp. And now she’s 
trying to drown me too!” 

“Sarah—please calm down,” Richard said gently. He climbed around his 
desk and put a hand on my shoulder. Then he led me to the door. 

I was standing face-to-face with Della. 

She stuck out her tongue at me. 

“See? There’s no one there,” Richard said. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Why don’t you stay away from the lake for a few days,” he suggested. 
“You know. Just hang out and relax.” 

Della mouthed his words as he spoke. 

I turned away from her. 

She giggled. 

“Don’t go to the lake?” I asked Richard. 

He nodded. “Take a few days and rest up. You’ll feel much better.” 

I knew I wouldn’t feel better. I knew I’d still have Della following me 
everywhere, trying to make me her buddy. 

I sighed. “That won’t help,” I told him. 

“Then I have a different idea,” he said. “Pick a sport you haven’t tried, 



Sarah. Pick something really hard. Like water-skiing.” 

“I don’t get it,” I replied. “Why should I do that?” 

“Because you will have to think so hard about what you’re doing, you 
won’t have time to worry about ghosts.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Yeah. Right.” 

“I’m trying to help you,” he said sharply. 

“Well... thanks,” I replied. I didn’t know what else to say. “I guess I’ll go to 
lunch now.” 

I trudged out of the tiny office. And took a deep breath. The air was much 
cooler out in the main lodge. 

I turned the corner and headed toward the mess hall in the front of the 
building. As I turned another corner, I heard Della’s frail voice behind me. 

“You can’t get away, Sarah. You’re my buddy. There’s no need to run. 
You’ll always be my buddy.” 

The soft words—so close to my ear—sent shivers down my back. 

Something inside me snapped. 

I couldn’t hold in my fury. 

“SHUT UP!” I shrieked. “SHUT UP! SHUT UP! SHUT UP—AND 
LEAVE ME ALONE!” 

I spun around to see if she had heard me. 

And gasped in horror. 



25 


Briana stood behind me. 

Her mouth dropped open in shock. “Okay, okay. I’ll go away,” she said, 
backing up. “You don’t have to be so nasty, Sarah. I was just coming to see how 
you were doing.” 

Wow. I felt so bad. 

Briana thought I was talking to her. 

“I—I—” I stammered. 

“I thought you wanted to be friends,” Briana snapped. “I didn’t even say a 
word to you. And you bit my head off!” 

“I wasn’t talking to you!” I finally choked out. “I was talking to her!” 

I pointed to Della, who leaned against the wall behind us. Della waved to 
me and giggled. 

Sun from the open lodge window lit up Della’s blond hair from behind. I 
could see the window right through her body. 

“I was talking to her!” I repeated. 

Briana raised her eyes to the window. 

And the strangest expression spread over her face. 

The next morning, I gulped down some gooey scrambled eggs for breakfast. 
Then I made my way to the boat dock. 

Don’t ask why I decided to try water-skiing. 

I really don’t have an answer. 

I suppose I did it for Aaron. The night before, he begged me once again not 
to call Mom and Dad. 

Aaron really didn’t want to go home. He said he was having the best 
summer of his life. 

Sure, I thought. It’s easy for you to have a good summer. You don’t have a 
ghost following you around. 

“Please try to stay a while longer,” Aaron begged. 

I won’t go to the lake, I decided. I’ll hang around the cabin and read or 
something. 



But in the morning, I realized that was a bad plan. 

I’d be too scared to stay by myself in the cabin while everyone else was at 
the lake. I would have no way to protect myself against Della. 

Yes, I know I wasn’t thinking clearly. 

I was so stressed out, I could barely think at all! 

I should have stayed as far away from the water as possible. 

But I really didn’t want to be alone. So I followed Richard’s advice. And 
went to the boat dock. And told Liz I wanted to try water-skiing. 

“That’s great, Sarah!” Liz cried, flashing me a pleased smile. “Have you 
ever done it before? It’s easier than it looks.” 

I told her I’d never tried it. 

She pulled a yellow inflated life vest and a pair of skis from the equipment 

shed. 

Then she gave me a short lesson. Showed me how to lean back and how to 
bend my knees. 

A short while later, I was in the water waiting for the motorboat to come 
around. Meg was using the boat now, skiing behind it, sliding over the water. 
Her orange bathing suit glowed in the morning sunlight. 

The hum of the boat echoed over the water. The lake bobbed and rippled in 
the boat’s wake. 

Meg let out a cry and let go of the towrope as the boat sped near the dock. 
She splashed into the water, then quickly pulled off her skis. Then she came 
walking to shore. 

“My turn next,” I said softly. I felt a knot in my stomach. 

Meg flashed me a thumbs-up. 

I struggled with the skis, but finally got them in place. Then I pulled up the 
towrope, gripping it tightly in both hands. 

The boat motor sputtered and coughed. The boat rocked up ahead of me in 
the rippling blue water. 

I steadied myself. Lowered myself the way Liz had shown me. And took a 
deep breath. 

“Ready!” I called. 

The motor sputtered—and then roared. 

The boat pulled away so fast, the towrope nearly flew out of my hands. 

“Whooooooooaaa!” I opened my mouth in a long cry as the rope pulled me 


up. 



Yes! The skis bounced over the surface. I bent my knees and gripped the 
towrope tightly. 

I’m doing it! I realized. I’m water-skiing! 

The boat picked up speed. We headed in a straight line over the sparkling 
water. The cold spray swept over my face, my hair. 

I started to lose my balance. Tugged myself back up. Held on—and kept 
going. 

“Yessss!” I cried out loud. What an awesome feeling! 

But then the driver of the boat turned her head. 

And I recognized Della’s evil grin. 

As she worked the controls, Della’s white-blond hair flew up like wings 
around her pale face. Her blue eyes sparkled like the water. 

Her grin grew wider as she saw the horror on my face. 

“Turn around! Turn back! Please!” I begged. 

She made the boat swerve hard. 

I nearly toppled over. I gripped the towrope. 

My skis slapped the surface. Pain shot up to my knees. The cold spray 
washed over me. 

I gasped. Struggled to breathe. 

Della threw back her head and laughed. The sound was drowned out by the 
roar of the motor. 

I could see the sky through her body. The sunlight poured right through her. 

“Turn around!” I screamed. “Stop! Where are you taking me? Where?” 



26 


Della didn’t answer. She turned away from me, her hair flying wildly behind her 
head. 

The boat bounced over the water, sending up tall waves of foam and spray. 

The waves splashed over me. Chilling me. Blinding me. 

Gripped in panic, it took me a long time to realize that I had an easy escape. 

I let go of the towrope. 

My hands shot up. The tow bar snapped against the water. 

I skidded for a few seconds, my arms thrashing wildly. And then I toppled 
over and sank. 

The life vest pulled me back up. I bounced on the surface, gasping, spitting 
out water. My heart pounded. 

I felt so dizzy. The bright sunlight seemed to surround me. Which way was 
up? Which way to the shore? 

I spun around and saw the motorboat in the distance. 

“You didn’t get me this time!” I called to Della. 

But then I froze as the boat began to turn. Della swerved the boat, kicking 
up a tall wave of white water. 

Swerved it back around. Until it pointed to me. 

I gasped as I heard the motor roar. 

I bobbed helplessly in the water. 

The boat picked up speed, skipping over the rippling surface. 

She’s coming for me, I thought. She’s coming to make me her buddy 
forever. 

I’m trapped out here. 

She’s coming to run me over. 



27 


I treaded water, watching in horror as the boat sped toward me. 

I’ve got to dive under it, I realized. The only way to escape is down. 

I took a deep breath. Every muscle tensed. I knew I had to time my dive 
perfectly. 

The boat roared closer. I could see Della crouched over the motor. Guiding 
the boat. 

Aiming it. 

I took another deep breath. And then I realized I couldn’t dive. 

The life vest—it was holding me up. No way I could plunge beneath the 
surface. 

With a cry, I grabbed the front of the vest with both hands. 

And tugged. 

I can’t do this! I realized. I can’t get this thing off in time! 

The water rocked harder as the boat sped nearer. The whole lake seemed to 
tilt and spin. 

The boat—it’s going to tear me to pieces! I thought. 

I pulled at the vest. Pushed it. 

Please — please—slide over my head! 

No time. No time. 

I can’t dive! 

The motor’s roar drowned out my scream. 

With a frantic tug, I pulled the life vest up. Over my shoulders. 

Too late. 

The front of the boat bounced over me. 

Then the whirring motor blades sliced off my head. 



28 


I waited for the pain. 

I waited for the darkness. 

The water swirled around me. Blue, then green. 

Choking on a mouthful of water, I thrashed up to the surface. Struggling to 
breathe, I let the waves rock me back and forth. 

“The life vest!” I choked out. 

I held half of the vest in each hand. 

The motor blades had sliced the life vest in two. 

I tossed the two pieces away. And started to laugh. 

“I’m alive!” I cried out loud. “I’m still alive!” 

I turned and saw the boat speeding across the lake. Did Della think she had 
won? 

I didn’t care. I spun around. Found the shore. And started to swim. 

My close call gave me new energy. The strong, rocking current helped push 
me back to the camp. 

I heard girls calling to me as I stumbled onto the grass. And I saw Liz 
jogging quickly over. 

“Sarah—” she called. “Sarah—wait!” 

I ignored her. I ignored them all. 

I started to run. 

I knew what I had to do. I had to get away from Camp Cold Lake. I had to 
get away as fast as I could. 

I wasn’t safe here. Not as long as Della wanted me for her buddy. Not as 
long as Della wanted me to drown too. 

I knew no one would believe me. They all said they wanted to help. But no 
one could really help me—not against a ghost! 

I burst into the cabin and tore off my wet swimsuit. Tossing it to the floor, I 
frantically pulled on shorts and a T-shirt. 

I swept my wet hair back with both hands. Tugged on socks and my 
sneakers. 

“Got to get away. Got to get away,” I chanted to myself. 



What to do? Where to go? 

I’ll run through the woods to the town on the other side, I decided. I’ll call 
Mom and Dad. I’ll tell them I’m hiding in town. I’ll tell them to pick me up 
there. 

I stopped at the cabin doorway. 

Should I tell Aaron? 

No. No way, I decided. 

He’ll only try to stop me. 

I’ll get a message to Aaron from town, I decided. I’ll tell him where I am. 
But not until I’m safe. Not until I’m far away from this place. 

I poked my head out of the cabin and searched around, making sure the 
coast was clear. Then I stepped outside and made my way around to the back. 
And ran into Briana. 

She narrowed her eyes at me, studying my face. “You’re going?” she asked 
quietly. 

I nodded. “Yes. I’m going.” 

Once again, Briana’s expression changed. The light in her eyes seemed to 

fade. 


“Good luck,” she whispered. 



29 


Why is she acting so weird? I wondered. 

I didn’t have time to think about it. I gave Briana a wave. Then I ran past 
her and headed into the woods. 

I glanced back as I followed a path between the trees. And saw Briana still 
standing there behind the cabin. Watching me. 

Taking a deep breath, I turned and hurried along the path. 

The trees overhead cut off a lot of the sunlight. It grew darker and cooler as 
I ran. 

A hedge of sharp burrs and brambles scraped my bare arms and legs as I 
tried to edge past. I wished I had worn jeans and a sweatshirt. Something that 
covered me better. 

My sneakers slipped over a thick blanket of dead leaves. I had to skip over 
fallen tree limbs and clumps of thorny weeds. 

Tree roots rose up over the path. Tall, dry reeds leaned over me, as if 
reaching to grab me. 

The narrow path divided in two. I paused—breathing hard—trying to 
decide which path to take. 

Would they both lead me to town? 

I held my breath when I heard a voice. Singing. 

A bird? 

No. A soft voice. A girl’s voice. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned. Raising my eyes to the sound, I saw Della, perched on 
a low tree limb. She tilted her head from side to side as she sang. Her blue eyes 
sparkled, gazing down at me. 

“You—you followed me!” I stammered. “How did you know that I—” My 
voice caught in my throat. 

She giggled. “You’re my buddy,” she replied. “We have to stick together.” 

“No! No way!” I screamed up at her. “You lose, Della. I’m not going to be 
your buddy. Because I’m never going to the lake again. I’m never going to 
drown like you!” 

Della’s smile faded. “Drown?” She shook her head. “Sarah, what made you 
think that? You’re very confused. I didn’t drown.” 



“Huh?” My mouth dropped open. I stared up at her in shock. 

“Close your mouth, Sarah. A fly will fly into it.” Della tilted back her head 
and laughed. 

Then she shook her head again. “How could anyone drown at Camp Cold 
Lake?” she demanded. “They give a lecture about water safety every five 
minutes! No one ever drowned at Camp Cold Lake!” 

“You didn’t drown?” I cried. “Then how did you die?” 

She rested her hands on the tree limb and leaned forward, peering down at 
me. I could see through her body, see the leaves shaking in the breeze. 

“It’s a simple story,” Della said with a sigh. “One night I got tired of 
listening to the water safety lecture at the campfire. So I sneaked off into these 
woods.” 

She swept her hair back with a toss of her head. “I made one major 
mistake,” she continued. “I didn’t know the woods are filled with deadly 
poisonous snakes.” 

I gasped. “These woods? Snakes?” 

Della nodded. “It’s nearly impossible to cross through these woods without 
getting bitten,” she sighed. “I died of a snakebite, Sarah.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “But you were always at the lake,” I choked out. 
“Why did I always see you at the lake?” 

“Don’t you get it?” she replied. “That was my plan. I made you afraid of the 
lake, Sarah. I made you terrified of the lake. Because I knew you’d try to escape 
through the woods. I knew you’d run into the woods and die like me—and be 
my buddy.” 

“No—!” I protested. “I won’t. I—” 

“Sarah, look!” Della pointed toward the ground. 

I gazed down—and watched a fat black snake curl around my leg. 



30 


“Buddies forever,” Della sang cheerfully. “Buddies forever.” 

I stood frozen, gaping down in horror. Watching the fat snake wind itself 
around me. Feeling its warm, dry body scrape over my bare skin. 

“Nooooo.” A low moan escaped my throat as the snake arched its head. 

“It won’t hurt that much,” Della said brightly. “It’s like a bee sting, Sarah. 
That’s all.” 

The snake let out a loud hiss. It snapped open its jaws. 

I felt its body tighten like a warm rope around my leg. 

“Buddies forever,” Della sang. “Buddies forever...” 

“No! Sarah is not your buddy!” a voice rang out. 

I tried to turn toward the voice. But I couldn’t move. I felt the snake tighten 
its hold on my leg. 

“Briana!” I cried. “What are you doing here?” 

She hurried out from behind a clump of tall reeds. 

With one quick motion, she grabbed the snake in one hand. Slid it off my 
leg. And tossed it into the trees. 

Briana raised her eyes to Della. “Sarah can’t be your buddy, because she’s 
my buddy!” Briana shouted. 

Della’s eyes grew wide. She cried out in surprise. She gripped the tree 
branch to keep from falling. 

“You!” she exclaimed. “What are you doing here?” 

“Yes, it’s me!” Briana shouted up to her. “I’m back, Della.” 

“But—but how did you...” Della’s voice trailed off. 

“You tried to do the same thing to me last year,” Briana said. “You tried all 
summer to make me your buddy. You terrified me—didn’t you, Della?” 

Briana uttered an angry cry. “You didn’t think I’d come back. But I did. I 
came back to camp this summer... to protect the next girl!” 

“Nooo!” Della wailed. 

I finally understood. I stepped up to the tree beside Briana. “Briana is my 
buddy!” I declared. “And I’m coming back next summer to warn the next girl!” 

“No! No! Nooooo!” Della raged. “You can’t do that! I’ve waited so long! 



So lonnnng!” 

She let go of the tree limb and shook her fists at Briana and me. 

Lost her balance. 

Her hands flew up as she started to fall. 

She grabbed for the limb. Missed. 

And dropped silently to the ground. 

Then she was gone. 

Vanished. 

With a weary sigh, I climbed to my feet. I shook my head. “Is she gone for 
good?” I murmured. 

Briana shrugged. “I don’t know. I hope so.” 

I turned to Briana. “You—you saved my life!” I cried. “Thank you for 
following me. Thank you for saving me!” 

With a happy cry, I stepped up to her. “Thank you! Thank you!” 

I wrapped my arms around her to hug her. 

And my hands went right through her body. 

I gasped. I grabbed her shoulder. But I couldn’t feel a thing. 

I jumped back in shock. 

Briana narrowed her eyes at me. “Della killed me last summer, Sarah,” she 
said softly. “On the last day. But I didn’t want to be her buddy. I just never liked 
her.” 

She floated forward, raised herself off the ground, hovered over me. 

“But I need a buddy,” she whispered. “Everyone has to have a buddy. 
You’ll be my buddy—won’t you, Sarah?” 

I saw the hissing snake in her hand. 

But I couldn’t move. 

“You’ll be my buddy—won’t you?” Briana repeated. “You’ll be my buddy 
forever.” 
